Topic 1 Why go to university?
University is no longer a fresh word to people nowadays.
Since the beginning of this century, more and more
youngsters choose to enter university after they have
completed the study in high schools rather than to join
the army or become an apprentice. Therefore, it is kind
of interesting to find out the reason behind.
First of all, students can only learn fundamental knowledge
during high school while they are able to focus on
their own interested majors in universities. This period is
the key to knowledge accumulation, which will contribute
a lot to the future of an individual. Moreover, university
is no doubt the symbol of high education. It offers
more than pure knowledge. A degree from a university
gives people certain identity that makes them stand out
among their competitors. It can be seen from the fact that
most international companies will only hire those who
have at least a Bachelor's degree.
Sincere dreams might also be the reason for university or
college. For instance, in the 60s and 70s, people in China
experienced hard times. Many of them had to give up
advanced education and take up the burdens of life at
their early age. Now, as they became parents or even
grandparents, their dream for university education had
no doubt realized by their younger family members.
Those young people, as reported, often study very hard
in order to fulfill the expectations of two generations.
There is no doubt that university can be the turning point
of one's future, because higher education will provide
people with not only knowledge prepared for their careers,
but also the fulfillment of their life goals. Meanwhile,
the society has improved its strength to sponsor
higher education. Compared with the past, people now
attend universities also because they are able to secure
various scholarships and supports from different channels.
A very good example is that many Chinese students
are now studying in the U. S. Their incentive for application
should be attributed to not only to their own performance
but also the comprehensive education frameworks
in the U. S.
Broadly speaking, people who study in universities have
their hopes: to fulfill themselves. At the same time, our
society generously provides such an environment for
people to achieve such goals. Therefore, when we see
more and more fresh smiles on the campus of universities,
let us just wish them a promising future.
Topic 1 Why go to university?
A university degree often helps a person achieve his goal
with more ease. However, do we attend university just in
pursuit of a degree? Does a university only provide us
nothing beneficial besides a paper-made diploma? As far
as I am concerned, we enjoy university education in the
following aspects:
Firstly, with the knowledge learned at a university, we
will have a deep understanding of our society. It is true
that genuine knowledge comes from practice, but it cannot
be denied that genuine knowledge tells us how to
practice. A systematic study in a college or a university, of
course, enables us to realize how the society works and
how to cope with certain problems arising from it in a
more efficiently, and more skillful way.
Second, a university education usually makes it possible
that we get hold of a decent job. As a result of the accomplishment
of a four-year study, it is not difficult for us
to find a good job in most cases. How can we imagine
that a graduate majoring in astronomy has to be a vendor
in the street! No doubt, he/she should sit in his/her laboratory,
doing research on aircraft science before a computer.
Obviously, a university education assures him/her a
decent job.
Last but not least, we can help others much better if we
put what we have learned at a university into practice. A
university education fortifies our values, enhance our
skills, and broaden our horizons. With those, we are
more capable of giving a hand to those who are in need
of help.
Knowledge is power. When achieving a degree at a university,
we can get a better understanding of the society,
find a decent job in an easy way, and help others better.
All of those are due to the knowledge learned at a university.

Topic 2 Are parents best teachers?
Obviously, the first teachers we have in our lives in most
cases are our parents. They teach us to walk, to speak,
and to have good manners before we reach “the real
world. ” More than even the professional teachers that we
have at school, parents are generally the most involved in
the development and education of children.
Almost for sure our parents are the best teachers at the
beginning of our lives, which actually corresponds to the
parents' role in nature. Parents are most committed and
involved in teaching their children; they have a kind of
instinct to sacrifice a part of themselves for the betterment
of their children. They love us and have great patience
while passing down their knowledge to us. They
wish us a success and thus will not teach us bad things.
And of course, implicit learning occurs when children
unconsciously copy some of their parents' habits and
styles of behavior.
During the second stage of child development, adolescence,
parents can still be in the best position to offer
advice even though the children might not accept it. In
this case, perhaps the child's friends would be the best
teachers. Adolescents are notoriously rebellious in many
cultures and may automatically reject any advice from
their parents. My first marriage for instance, was solely a
matter of doing the opposite when my parents tried to
intrude in offering their advice. So in such matters, parents
should be much more flexible and be rather the
partners with their children. So we can see that being a
teacher of growing child become more and more complicated
case as the time passes and many parents are simply
not able to meet the increased demands.
On the other hand, I would say that parents are not pro-
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
6
fessional teachers and they tend to be very biased by their
love of their children. So wishing good things and an easy
life may prevent children from maturation. In any case,
parents usually can present only one viewpoint of the
world, while good teaching should be based on different
attitudes. Thus, when children go to school and have a
great diversity of teachers, they learn much more than
their parents could probably give them. Furthermore,
once our parents get older, they become more conservative
and cannot always be objective in regard to modern
trends and fashions. Thus we need to take their advice
with caution during that period. However, some kind of
intuition that I believe shared between relatives about
what everybody needs and great love that exists in families
still makes our parents very good teachers and advisers
at any time.
In conclusion, while parents are not the ideal teachers,
and well-rounded children will generally need a great
diversity of teachers in their lives in order to have a more
accurate view of the world, parents are generally the most
committed of all teachers and have the greatest emotional
investment in their children and their future.
Topic 2 Are parents best teachers?
Our entire education system is based on what we accumulate
each day of our life. In spite of the fact that school
teachers are those who give us lots of information in a
variety of fields, our parents are still the best teachers;
they start their educational process as soon as we were
born and never stop teaching us.
In the initial years of our life, our parents are involved in
guiding us, in modulating our personality and making us
understand the differences between right and wrong.
When I was five, my parents bought me a dog; they
taught me how to take care of him, feed him, play with
him and bath him. Thus, I learned that we all have responsibilities.

Even if parents are not specialized in education, their role
in teaching the children to be aware of the need of improving
their knowledge at school is tremendous. Our
parents are not supposed to teach us Math, Chemistry or
Biology, but they are very much involved in giving us lessons
about being independent, strong and confident in
ourselves. As my mother said to me, "fight your own battles
because I will not be always able to protect you."
Teenagers have to be informed about all the negative effects
that can occur if using drugs, drinking alcohol, or
smoking. Regarding this issue, parents have to cooperate
with school teachers to make children aware of those
possible risks.
I believe that parents are the best teachers because their
lessons last forever. My parents are old now. Even when I
am a grown up person, I consider that they can still give
me very good advices when I need them, based on their
life experience. My parents have the most important roll
in my education during my life and I will always be grateful
for everything they have taught me.
Topic 2 Are parents best teachers?
Parents are the most committed, the most influential, and
almost the best teachers any child can have. The amount
of time a child interacts with parents makes them the
most influential force in a child's life. The child gets to
learn the most basics of things like walking, speaking and
interacting with others. It is under the protections of parents
that a child learns to behave in society and to comfort
him or herself.
Although parents are the most influential teachers in
their children's life, they may not be regarded as the best
teachers. Parents generally provide a biased view of the
world; they always favor their child, and thus they cannot
provide a complete panoramic view of the society. Also
parents may set a bad example for their child by abusing
and fighting amongst themselves. Psychologists and recent
crime charts have proved that young outlaws generally
come from disrespectful families, and have grown up
in extreme environments.
A child interacts with many kinds of teachers at schools
and colleges. Although these teachers, being professionals,
have limited time to devote to a child, they provide a
complete and diverse view to their students. They provide
unbiased guidance to a child.
During the years of adolescence, children tend to be aggressive
and non-conforming to others' views. So parents
need to act like friends rather than teachers. Eventually, it
is the parents who provide an environment for a child to
develop and mature, and thus have the capacity to be the
best teachers to their child. What is important is to provide
an unbiased view to their child, to motivate independent
thinking and actuate timely maturation.
Topic 3 Has the easiness of cooking improved life?
People work hard to fulfill their principal necessities, and
food is the one thing that is really important to their survival.
Although sometimes belied by other things that
seem important, food is the core objective that drives all
people to work. But the outcome of the efforts of these
people is not a direct supply of food; rather it is in the
form of money. Thus these people use the money they
obtain to prepare their food.
In old days, preparing food was cumbersome and timeconsuming
work for those who do it solely for eating
purposes. This kind of preparing food in due tie could
not comply with the kind of life people lead today. The
use of technological advancement makes preparing food
practical even for the clumsiest person. This helps a great
deal for those who work against time to make their living.
It also avoids the waste of considerable amount of money
from hiring a cook.
The development in the preparation of food is highly
effective for those people who have no know how of it. A
person who does not know how to prepare his/her own
food would go to a restaurant or some other place where
food is served everyday. But with the advanced food
preservation technology, now he is free, completely independent
of restaurants and other places. He can prepare
his own food and enjoy the feeling of "home, sweet 
ToeflEssays.com
7
home".
For people at work, life has just become easy for them.
They will not have to worry all day long about what they
are going to prepare for their supper. They can fully concentrate
on their jobs, and work with a mind full of peace.
In general this new way of preparing food has helped
those who are concerned about their daily meals -- almost
everyone. Not only that, it would enlighten those who
are frustrated with their jobs just because of the worry of
that tiresome work -- preparing food.
Topic 3 Has the easiness of cooking improved life?
Food has always been the one of the greatest wants of
humankind. It has influenced almost every step that humankind
has taken. The search for food is the essence of
life. Therefore if food is easier to get and prepare it is a
real boon to humankind.
Food is the most important of the three basic amenities
of life (water, food and shelter). Though it can be argued
that water is the sustenance for any life form, food is
more important because if you do not have water you
will surely die. But if you are left with a scarcity of food it
will lead to a very sickly and torturous life. Nutritious
food is very essential for life, food has been the cause of
many a battle. Thus if food was easier to prepare it will
take away from the mind of the humankind a great burden.

Though the preparation of food becoming easier is considered
a great blessing for humankind. The sudden rise
in processed and canned food and all the junk food that
one gets over the counter is not totally a boon. People
who are so busy that they are not able to spend time to
prepare their food, develop a liking for these ready-to-eat
junk food. Though it might be thought of as a great way
to save time, this is a shortsighted idea that could actually
lead to a world of harm. Because one must understand
that even though junk food saves us a lot of time, the
nutritional value of the food is not so good. In reality the
preservatives used in these foods are often found to be
toxic in nature. Hence it defeats the purpose it is supposed
to serve i.e., to provide nutritional value.
Moreover since people do not take time to prepare food,
the art of cooking is slowly vanishing. Actually cooking is
a good way of releasing pressure that builds up from our
professional commitments. Cooking can easily provide
relief from all the tensions that prevail in our life. In the
past family weekend get together was considered to be a
good time to know each other and they used to spend
time cooking food for the entire family. They used to exchange
recipes and it was a way of rewinding after the
hard weeklong labor. Thus this junk food has denied the
human kind of one of humankind's oldest arts. It could
even be termed as a retrograde step in human culture.
Therefore I believe though the processed food has made
the preparation of food much easier, it is not a good step
for mankind.
Topic 3 Has the easiness of cooking improved life?
Recent technological advancements have changed the
way people live radically. They have also made food easier
to prepare - fast foods and preserved foods are everywhere.
The days when cooking of food was a major errand
of the day have long become the past. Nowadays it's
only a matter of minutes to cook food. However this improvement
does not come without a price.
The most important loss we suffer due to these fast foods
is quality. These fast foods are lower in nutritional value
and contain less minerals and vitamins. Further they have
high calories that result in weight gain, and that in turn
leads to heart diseases and other problems. Further, they
have added flavors, colors and preservatives that are not
always very helpful to our health.
These preserved food have also taken away the natural
taste and benefits of fresh foods from our lives. We now
depend upon artificial flavorings to make a fish taste like
a fish. However we cannot get the natural taste of fresh
foods from preserved foods.
We have lost the fun of cooking because of these fast
foods. Cooking used to be an art and people enjoyed
cooking and the satisfactions they got by cooking a tasty
meal. Further, cooking is the time when family members
gathered and enjoyed their time together. However with
less time devoted to cooking, the chances for such meals
are now rare.
All these illustrations point out that although fast foods
and preserved foods are unavoidable in today's busy
world, we must not totally neglect the advantages of fresh
foods. We must sometimes take time with our families to
prepare a delicious meal and enjoy it together with the
ones we love the most.
Topic 4 Books and experience
Books are considered to be the source of all knowledge,
but all that one learns through a book is only of theoretical
nature in the form of ideas and concepts. It is essential
to utilize them in a real environment and experience
the knowledge that is learned from books.
Learning is nothing but understanding the world around
us. Books, no doubt are a great source of knowledge as it
gives us an idea about a particular subject in detail. But
all that one could learn from it is limited to the level of
knowing how a certain phenomenon occurs, or how a
certain concept works. The knowledge gained through
books alone cannot help anyone, because what one
learns through the books should be put in to use to harvest
the benefits. For instance, a person who wants to
learn driving can go through various manuals and guides
that teach people how to drive, but all this knowledge is
useful only when you are actually driving the car on the
roads. It would be an utter waste of time if one just reads
the books and does not use them for practical purpose.
Learning through experience is always a lot different from
learning through books. Let us consider the same example
of a person wanting to learn to drive: even if he goes
through every book that is available on driving, still it 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
8
cannot qualify him as an expert driver. This is because of
the fact that books about driving can only teach people
traffic rules and provide solutions on how to handle certain
situations. The situations faced by a driver could be
totally different from what he had learnt from a book.
Sometimes we find that the real environment is quite
different from the one perceived by us through reading
books. This is the very reason why, even in educational
institutions, all theoretical classes are followed by practical
sessions.
Learning through experience can also be more effective
than learning through books because one does not envision
everything on his own, but is given a chance to experience
the reality. The art of driving can be enjoyed
only when we are behind the wheels and not when reading
it in books. Moreover, any book is actually an account
of past experiences, i.e. it is based on the experiences of
people who tried to develop a new idea. The books are
their experiences, telling us what they already have tried.
Thus from their experiences we can correct ourselves and
thus save valuable time and resources. It helps us to concentrate
on their failures and to correct them, but they
alone cannot teach us everything we need to know. The
knowledge learned through books alone cannot help us
to face all the exigencies that we would face in real life
situations; we have to practice on our own.
Books are like a guiding light in one's pursuit for knowledge.
But it is left to everyone of us to experience it first
hand and learn new things for the betterment of their
lives. So the notion "experience is the best teacher" is
perfectly true.
Topic 4 Books and experience
It is true that "Not everything that is learned is contained
in books." A person can learn a lot and retain what he
learns through experience. In my opinion life's valuable
lessons are learnt from experience and so the knowledge
gained from experience is more important.
Books are a great source of information. A person in his
lifetime cannot experience everything, but by reading a
book on a particular subject he can gain knowledge over
that subject in less time. There are books available on any
subject that one needs. However experience seems more
important to me.
Suppose a person living in the United States wants to
learn about India. He has two options: he could visit India
and learn about the people and places there or he
could just pick up a book about India and read it. The
first option will be expensive and time consuming, but at
the same time it gives one first hand information and a
sense of satisfaction while the second option is less expensive
and saves time.
A person can gain knowledge and learn many valuable lessons through his/her own practical experiences and
also the experiences of others. The knowledge learnt
from experience is very likely to be retained in our memory
for a long period of time. The conclusions that we
draw from what we learn would be from our practical
experience instead of accepting the conclusion drawn in
the book by the author.
So in my opinion knowledge can be gained both by reading
books and by experience but the knowledge gained
through experience is more important.
Topic 4 Books and experience
Learning, as the name indicates has lot many meanings as
to which source one would choose to understand things
of his own interest. Books have always been an inevitable
part of one's life as they have the ability to make people
aware of the different things happening in our world. It is
said that not everything that is learned is contained in
books. This is in fact true because books can offer us
knowledge regarding the things that have happened and
sometimes the ways to deal with a situation that one can
encounter in his life. I would appreciate the fact that the
knowledge gained from experience is much more important
than that we receive from books. I would like to further
illustrate my reasons as follows:
Everyone would admit the fact that knowledge gained
from experience is one that remains in our mind forever.
It is correctly said, "Experience is the teacher of man."
Being a science student, I have gone through different
books where we come across different reactions and experiments,
where the results will be shown in the form of
diagrams or may be expressed in a simple language.
Unless we conduct that experiment we will not know the
problems or the difficulties we will have to overcome
during the experiments. Textbook knowledge is merely a
description of facts and outcomes, whereas the same
knowledge when gained through experience teaches us a
lot, right from the start till the end and its a journey
through the various aspects of one process which one
might not be aware of and might not be described in the
books.
During my undergraduate years I had only knowledge
from books and I used to wonder how the experiments
are designed and how they are carried out. But, during
my post graduate days I had to do a two month nutritional
trial on fishes where I had to cope up with everything
like procuring tubs and fishes, arranging aeration
facilities, preparation of food for the fishes, daily water
exchange, samplings, analysis and so on. Now, I am confident
of carrying out similar works and the experience
that I have gained will remain with me as long as I live.
When similar instances occur, we will have more selfconfidence
and when such aspects are passed on to our
juniors, they would also feel happy and confident.
Needless to say books are also very important. What I
have mentioned is from my viewpoint as a science student.
There are many different subjects where the conduct
of work is tough and in such circumstances we gain
information from books. Some aspects would be time
consuming and tedious and performing such a work with
a limited period of time would not be feasible. In such
cases, books definitely open a person's eye towards various
aspects and give him first hand information about
what he wants to know.
A person who has learned from experience never forgets
what has happened and if it was proved a bad thing then
he would certainly try to avoid that situation in the future.
If something good has happened then he will put his best 
ToeflEssays.com
9
to further improve it; that in turn will enhance his skill
and boost his self-esteem. Knowledge gained by experience
can be passed over to others who also are supposed
to face the same situation and that helps the person to be
aware of what he intends to do. He can even avoid those
factors that can affect his performance.
In fact I would rather say that knowledge gained from
experience lingers in our minds forever and that boosts
our confidence when taking up a similar task. On the
other hand, the fact that books are knowledge providers
cannot be ignored, because books provide us with lot
more information about the different things that are very
difficult to be experienced. Hence it can be concluded
that knowledge gained from books is second hand knowledge
whereas knowledge that are gained from experience
is firsthand and it takes a person through the different
hidden intricacies of the task and makes him learn the
knowledge in a practical manner.
Topic 4 Books and experience
To my opinion, books and real experience are two completely
different sources of knowledge. It is really difficult
to determine which of the two to be of much greater importance,
because normally knowledge gained from experience
complements that acquired from books, but not
substitutes it. Comparing the features of the two sources,
I would stress the following points of differences.
First, the knowledge gained from books is, to a certain
extent, of abstract nature. Books are normally the collections
of facts and general rules. Books give us the most
complete overview of a subject in a more or less structured
manner, covering all known details and exceptions.
In some way, books are concentrations of knowledge and
experiences of many generations of people, given in a
concise and comprehensive way. Obtaining such knowledge
just from the personal experience would take an
immense amount of time or even would not be possible
at all. The practical experience, gives us not general
knowledge, but particular skills. Without these particular
skills, all the knowledge gained from books might be just
a useless collection of facts and rules. The best example
of the importance of practical experience that comes to
my mind is learning a foreign language. One can learn a
lot of vocabulary and grammar rules, memorize many
exceptions, but without actual applying of all this knowledge
in real life conversations, writing letters and listening
to real speeches, one can hardly be proficient in the
language. The importance of having practical skills is also
proved by the fact that most employers appreciate working
experience above all grades and diplomas.
Another point of contrast between books and experience
is that for subjects such as economy of sociology, a book
may represent a point of view of its author or authors.
The conclusions given in the book might be out of date,
or might be biased by the personal attitude of the authors.
In this case, practical experience helps to build up personal
perspective on the matter, to bring the matter up to
date.
On the psychological grounds, learning from experience
is much more efficient than reading books. Reading
books is in most cases a passive action, which can be
done without much effort. Despite the fact that there are
people who can memorize thousands of papers, for a
normal person, such work does not result in a deep,
comprehensive knowledge base. On the contrary, doing
things in practice, people have to overcome various difficulties,
get through unknown areas, and pay attention to
small details. The reward for these efforts is much more
comprehensive and profound knowledge.
Both books and practice is important in the process of
learning. While none of the two can be considered as
absolute substitute for the other, I would place the practical
experience in a little bit advance position.
Topic 5 A factory in your community
As the company has announced to build a factory right
here in our community, I am so eager to say a few words
toward this issue. I really think that if the plan is carried
out in the near feature finally, there will be much more
disadvantages than advantages to be brought to the quality
life of our social community.
Of course, during these years' high unemployment rate,
introducing of such a large factory will consume unemployed
workforce in some respects. A family may increase
their income by taking account of its new employed father
during or after the construction of the factory, local
government can increase its tax income and retail dealers
of our community may sell a little more because of the
increasing of population that may be the result of the
new build factory. However, all these benefits may seem
to be so small when compared with all those disadvantages
the new build factory may lead to.
The most hateful thing is that you may not able to smell
the fresh air in the sunny Sunday mornings because this
huge industrial monster will probably deliver a great deal
of waste fume and waste materials every day, far more
than the amount you can imagine. And far more disappointed
than this, those rumbling, non-stopping stream
lines in the factory can make noises loud enough to bereave
people of our tranquil town out of sweat dreams.
And you will no doubt feel uncomfortable to drive your
family to the camping place because maybe the establishment
of the new factory will bring more than 20%
increases in population as well 30% increases in using of
private cars and trucks, imaging how could it be in the
street in rush hours, or even in the holidays. So, you can
see clearly that increasing in population is not always
good news for a small community like ours.
Basic food prices may probably rise and public transportation
will burden more, which usually means poor services,
public schools and community facilities which once
made us feel so convenient living in this small town may
get harder and harder to be attended or utilized as the
increasing of population, upon all those disadvantages,
why should we give applauses to the announcement of
the company? 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
10
Topic 5 A factory in your community
I am from Arroz e Feijao, a small town in the northeast of
Brazil. If I can change one thing about my home town, I
would like to build a factory here. Building a factory in
there will bring a lot of advantages and disadvantages,
but I believe that Arroz e Feijao will mostly benefit from
the building of a new factory because it is largely populated
by poor people and the factory would bring many
benefits to this small town. However, of course, a factory
has disadvantages as well.
As you know, factories usually bring pollution. If this factory
is not managed very effectively and efficiently according
to specific rules, it's prone to polluting the local
air and water. What's more, factories usually make noise.
Beside clean drinkable water and fresh air, an ideal community
should be quiet. If the factory cannot maintain
this standard to the community, it will not last long. A
factory that is too noisy or pollutes too much will eventually
be relocated to a new area.
On the other hand, a factory could bring a lot of benefits
to the community. So I would support the plan to build a
factory to my community for all the reasons I will describe
below.
First of all, the construction of a factory will surely improve
the local infrastructure. To run smoothly, the factory
will have to have a steady, reliable supply of water
and electricity. Some old pipes will be changed, and
some facilities will be renovated. The residents' living
standard get improved as a result of these widespread
changes, an important benefit in Arroz e Feijao, where
many people do not have access to clean water.
Secondly, to make sure the shipping of materials and
products and the employees' commute more convenient,
the local roads will have to be rebuilt and broadened,
resulting in improved public transportation. The town's
residents can take a public bus to go shopping or go to
work. As a result, air pollution and fuel consumption
might be reduced.
Most important, a factory's establishment will bring up a
lot of employment opportunities for the community. A
factory needs experts from various fields. The residents
can take just a few minutes to go to the factory to work.
So, the local residents can benefits from this factory.
Generally speaking, I would like to build a factory near
my community if I have a chance. If the factory can be
managed successfully, the factory and the local residents
can have benefit mutually.
Topic 6 Change about my hometown
If I could change one important thing about my hometown,
it would be air pollution problem, and I will give
the following reasons to explain why I want to solve the
problem.
The first and most important reason is that I hope that
my hometown can become a beautiful city. As an old industrial
city, my hometown has made a great deal of contribution
for the country’s economic development. At a
result, the natural environment of the city has been badly
damaged. The forest has disappeared; the mountains
have become bald, and the most awful thing is that the
air quality becomes more and more worsen. People seldom
see the blue sky during most time of year.
Another reason why I want to change my hometown’s air
pollution situation is that the city’s development needs
clean and tidy environment to attract investors. Nowadays
people have come to know that the city’s environment,
which is so called “software facility of the city”,
plays an important role in the city’s future. For example,
due to the fact that the environment of the city is very
poor, many local students who pursue their study out of
the city would rather find themselves a job in other cities
than coming back to their hometown after they graduated.
In addition, nowadays people have paid more and more
attention to their health. If the air pollution problem cannot
be solved as quickly as possible, people’s requirement
for a healthy body will never be realized.
In my mind, changing air pollution will apparently be my
first choice if I can change one important thing about my
hometown. Fortunately people in my hometown are
gradually aware of the serious problem and start doing
something about it.
Topic 7 How do movies or TV affect people?
"Reel life is based on real life," they say. But how far it is
true is left to the judgment of the individual's intelligence.
The impact that movies and television have on our lives
can never be over-emphasized.
Nowadays television and movies are the only sources to
keep in pace with the latest trend in the global environment.
Every part of our lifestyle is somehow influenced
by what we see in the television or in movies. The advent
of the motion picture has been one of the greatest influences
of the cultural activities of the humankind. It does
not require great intelligence to ascertain this fact. If we
just give a glance to see hanging or posted on the walls
are the photos of our favorite celebrities from the tinsel
world, mounted on the table are things from our favorite
T. V. show, the music blaring out of the system of the latest
excuses for musical excellence, in your wardrobe are
outfits last seen on our favorite stars, the hair cream,
shampoo, paste, and what not, the list is endless. This
does not stop with just what we wear and own it also
extends to the way we behave in our peer group.
Some time back, my friend and I were at the cafeteria
near our college when were suddenly mobbed by a
group of students who were dressed up as people
straight out from prehistoric age. They were carrying contraptions
that resembled like weapons for a battlefield,
which made us wonder whether they were struck in a
time warp. And what followed actually bemused us completely,
the group started speaking to each other in a very
laboriously slow manner in a language which sounded
nothing of this world. My friend and I were not able to
understand a single word of it, we left that day with a
really confused mind and were in the same state for quite
some time. But it all ended on the day we decided to
watch the movie "Lord of the Rings" Peter Jackson's adaptation
of J. R. K. Tolkiem's novel of early 1900s. We understood
the costumes and the weapons were the film's 
ToeflEssays.com
11
souvenir collectibles, and the language they spoke was
that of the elves originally created by the great author.
Thus we see people talking about 'molecular disintegrators',
'laser swords', 'elves', 'hobbits' etc., and also tend to
act and perform like what they have seen in movies and
television. We also see that big FMCG companies bringing
in newer products inline with the latest movies. There are
several institutions, which glorify such attitude. Those
who dare to ignore are considered archaic and become
the butt of all jokes. This can be easily acknowledged by
the fact the elves language has already been recognized as
part an official curriculum in a British university.
Thus the line between real and reel life is fast becoming a
blurred one. The whole behavior and cultural activity of
the human race is left to the mercy of the next big moviemaker.

Topic 7 How do movies or TV affect people?
Movies are popular because people are great watchers.
They like to watch other peoples' lives. They like to live
vicariously. By going to movies, we can escape our own
lives, share other people's emotions, and imagine ourselves
as someone else.
Many of our lives are not as adventurous or glamorous as
the lives in movies. We do not battle evil all day long and
then go back to our luxurious penthouse apartment. We
just go to school, do our homework, eat, talk to our
friends, and sleep. We need a little excitement in our lives
and we find excitement at the movies.
Humans are very emotional people. We all like to cry and
laugh. Fortunately, there is not much to cry about in my
life so I like to go to sad movies where my heartstrings
can be tugged. I also like to go to comedies so that I can
laugh. I tend to cry and laugh more in a dark movie theater
than I do in broad daylight.
Now I am a student, but I know someday I will be a scientist
or a politician or a famous model. When I go to the
movies, I can see my role models. I see how they act,
what they wear, how they talk. I can prepare myself for
the day when I will be like them.
Even though my life is quiet, I can go to the movies and
watch someone else's life. I can share their emotions and
their everyday life. I wonder if they would like to share
mine.
Topic 7 How do movies or TV affect people?
Every human being tends to take some time off from his
or her chores for relaxation. There is no doubt that movies
and television play a major role in get tiredness and
boredom away from us. Though primarily intended for
entertainment, these media do influence the behaviors of
human beings. I would like to discuss the effect of the
media on the demographic divisions of children, teenagers
and the adults.
No doubt that children are the most fascinated and fond
of watching movies and television. Though parents are
temporarily relieved from baby-sitting their children who
are indulgent in watching television, they are certainly
worried about the influence of this media. Today's movies
are filled with violence. Heroism is being portrayed as the
capacity to destruct (the enemies). This easily influences
children. The fondness of children to watch WWF wrestling
on television bears testimony to it. This proclivity
towards violence tends to show up at schools, where they
start to bully their classmates.
While teenagers tend to show some maturity over the
issue of violence, there are separate gamut of factors in
the media that influence them. Teenage is the important
period during which one choices his career and subsequently
his direction of life. This media greatly influence
the choice of ones career. Today's rock concerts and music
televisions create an impression that becoming a rock
star or a video jockey is the best profession in the world.
Numerous teenagers are drawn into this whirlpool and it
becomes too late when they come to realize the reality in
life.
Adults watch this media mainly for entertainment and to
relax themselves. However they too are relieved from
being bitten by the media bug. The constantly running
television advertisements have a negative bearing on the
adults. The ostentatiously displayed by a Porsche car driving
by the hero in our favorite films inadvertently propels
our instinct to go for a similar car. Seldom do we think
about the aftereffects and get entangled in the spider web.
We tend to sink our ship by the exorbitant interest rate,
mortgage and the overflowing credit card bills. Once
overloaded with these, we tend to become peevish losing
our natural gregarious behavior.
Hence I feel that the media has an influence on each one
of in what ever above said categories we are in. While
there are also many things which positively influence
people's mind, I have purposefully chose to deal with
negative aspects as understanding these problems instigates
us to seek a suitable solution. We as a parent, a
teacher and a good friend can help some of our friends
who need help to get themselves out of these problems.
Topic 7 How do movies or TV affect people?
Our life has gone through great changes since television
and movies came into being, which provides a totally new
and different way of using our spare time to the traditional
way. As a matter of fact, with the wide spread of
this mass media such as movies and television all over the
world, people's behavior and thoughts have been
changed a lot since it has become an inalienable part of
our daily life. Movies and television influence people's
behavior by altering their views of value, beauty, and the
world.
People become more confident and seldom give up after
watching the movie Forest Gump, they stop smoking and
begin to do exercises after watching the TV program
about smoking ruins one's health, and girls try hard to
lose weight after actresses in movies and television tend
to be thinner and thinner. All these changes, indeed, has
much to do with mass media. It is obvious that, teenagers
talk a lot when gathered together about sports games or
newest Hollywood movies, whereas adults discuss the
world's political situation or social problems when having
time in their offices. The topics that they focus on, in 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
12
most cases, are acquired either from television programs
or from movies, and so forth.
Movies and television influence people's behavior by satisfying
their imagination. Heroes and heroines achieve
great success of their business, attain sweet love of their
life, and gain high respect of their fame so easily within a
two-hour long movie. When watching it, audiences can
experience the same evens, share the same feelings, and
this whole process would fulfill their fantasies, as a result,
cause them to find balance in their lives, or, to some degree,
lose the balance, which depends on not only the
movies but also the audiences themselves. All in all, mass
media, including movies and television, has a significant
correlation with people's behaviors. To put it differently,
tasks are arduous for mass media to bring people laughter,
joy and relaxation, and at the same time some pedagogic
meanings.
Topic 8 Has TV destroyed communication?
To agree or disagree with the statement that television
has destroyed the communication among family and
friends is a matter of balancing its pros and cons. However,
if one considers the following reasons, he or she
may disagree with the title statement as I do.
First, some people may hold the view that friends and
family would easily fight with each other for the programs
on the television that he or she wants to watch. For example,
the child may be likely to switch to the cartoon
channel while the father wants to see the news program,
and the mother prefers a romantic movie. However as far
as I am concerned, the scenario is an exaggeration. I do
not think such a trivial quarrel would destroy anything
important, and as friends or family, the one result is to
attribute to the communication. Each person would present
their reasons for watching the program, so that next
time they would not argue for the same thing again. They
know the taste of each number of the family and they will
probably try to avoid such conflicts.
In addition, television offers us numerous topics to talk
about. Television informs us of what is happening around
the world. Everybody has his/her own reaction towards
these events. Without television, we may hold the idea
that no one would have the chance to share. When the
friends and the whole family sit tighter in front of a television,
a nice and intimate atmosphere is provided for
communication. Through such kind of communication,
family members can understand each other better. A
small example may give some light to this point. Once I
had some disagreement and had not talk to my dad for
several days. One night, when my dad and I were watching
television together, we found an interesting topic that
both of us wanted to say something about it, so we said a
little first and talk much later and all the unpleasant disappear
out of existence.
So, in my point of view, nothing has been destroyed by
television. On the contrary it might improve our communication.

Topic 8 Has TV destroyed communication?
There are always good and bad consequences following
technological developments. Television has served many
needs of people. But, unfortunately, it has destroyed
communication among friends and family. The reasons
are that people are getting maximum information, entertainment
and time pass through various channels. I will
explain these reasons in detail further in my essay.
Though there are many sources of gathering information
we rely on people for information most of the times. This
is gradually replaced by countless advertisements coming
up in television. They show different products, their
prices and their availabilities in stores. They even give
phone numbers to order by calling. Certain products
which, we don’t even know the purpose is also explained
these days. For example, I have seen an ad about a hair
dryer stand 2 days back. Initially, I didn’t even understand
its purpose but as it continued, I could easily make
out and so I bought it the very next week with out even
bothering to ask any of my friends.
Man is a social animal. He likes to be in society among
people, which keeps him entertained by gatherings with
friends and family. In television, different serials and
movies are played. There are thousands of channels offering
variety of programs. Once we get used to watching
these programs, we don’t see any point in going out and
meeting friends. For instance, when I was a child, our
family members and friends used to gather every weekend
and watch a movie in a theatre. But now, every one
watches movies in their own homes as there are some
paid channels where we can watch latest movies. It saves
time and money.
People are anyway busy these days with personal and
professional works. On top of this, some channels like
discovery, BBC, CNN, ESPN keep people occupied with
all the knowledge they need. They don’t see any time to
meet friends or family. For example, they are even having
dinner watching television.
There are advantages and disadvantages of everything
created on earth. It depends on human beings to utilize
or exploit them.
Topic 8 Has TV destroyed communication?
What do you usually do to relax yourself and have some
fun after a whole day's work? How do you spend most of
your spare time with a lowest cost of both money and
energy? Most of us will give the same answer: watching
TV. As promoted by the development of modern science
and technology, television programs today attract a vaster
group of audiences by tremendously enriched contents
and a 24-hour rolling schedule than ever before. The fact
that television seems to control our choice of leisure and
entertainment has recently brought a problem to focus:
whether has television destroyed communication among
friends and family? Those who agree with the statement
insist that such lack of communication should attribute to
television. However, I hold just an opposite point of view
and I will demonstrate my opinion as followed.
First of all, the advantages of television will speak for it-
ToeflEssays.com
13
self. As known to all, what we find in television is not
only some enjoyment or recreation to kill time but also
an important source of knowledge and information.
Imagine how television makes us familiar with the miracle
creatures in the deep ocean that is unavailable otherwise.
Undoubtedly television is an indispensable channel
for us to learn the world outside.
As far as the interpersonal communication is concerned,
television also plays a key role in improving, but destroying
like someone thinks, the relationship and understanding
among friends and family. A good case in the
point is that television often focuses the attention of public
by broadcasting current events, social news and popular
teleplays. It is always easy to find interesting topics
with friends and colleagues if you have watched the same
TV program lately and want to share your ideas about it.
Besides, in my own family, my parents and I enjoy the
time when we are sitting together and watching tele-films.
Because it is the moment for us to feel and enjoy the
peacefulness and happiness of family life.
I do not deny that there may be some cases that people
are so addicted to television or some other habits that
he/she will probably ignore communication with friends
and family. Yet it is the wrong attitude of the person
him/herself that results the problem but television. Thus,
for the reasons above, I shall say: television, like many
other important inventions of human beings, benefits our
life with both enjoyment and knowledge.
Topic 9 A small town vs. a big city
I grew up in a small town and then moved to a big city,
therefore I have experienced the good and bad sides of
both. I never thought that I would like living in a big city,
but I was proved wrong. After ten years of living in one, I
can't imagine ever living in a small town again.
Small towns and big cities both have some problems in
terms of transportation, but in different ways. In a small
town, you have to own a car to ensure a comfortable living.
You can't get around without one because there isn't
any kind of public transportation. Big cities generally
have heavy traffic and expensive parking, but then you
have a choice of taking public transportation. It's not free,
but it's often cheaper than driving when you consider gas
and insurance. Especially if you don't have a car, you're
better off living in a city.
I love the excitement of big cities. Small towns have a
slow pace. Large cities mean you have to adapt to a variety
of situations, like finding a new route to work or trying
a new restaurant. I enjoy that challenge very much.
Another aspect of the excitement of city living is the variety
of cultural activities available. There is a wide assortment
of theatres, music and dance performances available
in big cities. These things are rare in small towns.
The final thing I like about large cities is the diversity of
the people. The United States is made up of people of
different races, religions, abilities, and interests. However,
you seldom find such a variety of people in a small US
town. Living in an area where everyone is just like me
would quickly make me bored.
Of course, security is a concern, and that's one area
where small towns are superior to big cities. Still, I would
rather be a bit more cautious and live in a large city than
to feel secure but bored in a small town.
Topic 9 A small town vs. a big city
In English, there is a well-known fairy story about a poor
country boy, Dick Whittington, who goes to London because
he believes that the streets of that city are "paved
with gold." The story is a tale of "from rags to riches."
Dick eventually becomes the Lord Mayor of London. Like
the hero of that story, I always find wonder and adventure
in cities.
Cities contain a great assortment of people. Whenever I
walk around a shopping precinct at midday on a weekend,
I am fascinated by all the different types of people
hurrying around the shops. Sometimes, I just sit on a
public bench and simply watch the variegated streams of
shoppers. Today, in the age of globetrotting transport and
communications, city life is more mixed than it has ever
been. Capital cities are not cosmopolitan, and eager to
attract foreign trade and currency. There is a contemporary
English joke that tells, "You can never find an Englishman
in London."
Whether rightly or wrongly, governments and local authorities
usually build public amenities in the big cities.
Money is invested in transport, libraries, parks and museums.
Often, countries will compete with each other for
the best "show-case" building. Malaysia has built a skyscraper
that is taller than is anything in New York. In large
countries, region will compete against region: New York
against Chicago, Shanghai against Hong Kong and Beijing.
All of this is good for the citizen. The magic of the Dick
Whittington story is rekindled in me when I enter a library
in a magnificent building. If a person is at university
studying art or music, a large city usually offers galleries
and public performances. Even as a teenager, I appreciated
the worth of living in a city because two or three
times a year there was a rock concert by a favorite band.
Architecture is the urban landscape. If a person has an
appreciation of architecture, a city can be as visually exciting
as the Himalayas. A modern metropolis is a mountain
range of height, light and solidness. And then there are
the old buildings: the quaint, unspoiled side street or
shops and homes from a distant age. If a person lived all
of his life in one large city, he would continue to discover
its architectural secrets into his old age.
Man is a 'social animal'. He talks, mixes and creates. Cities
offer the libraries, universities and cafe bars for him to
meet others of his kind.
Topic 9 A small town vs. a big city
Where shall we live? Some may choose to live in big cities,
while other like the natural and quiet surroundings in the
countryside. As far as I am concerned, I would like to live
in a big city because living in a big city has more advantages
than living in the countryside.
To begin with, the city is the symbol of human civilization
and there are a many facilities for living, recreation and 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
14
health care. Therefore, living there is more convenient
than living in the countryside. For example, we can find a
plenty of malls around our neighborhood, where we can
buy everyday necessities at a low price. Furthermore,
people concern more about their health and safety than
other things in their lives. In big cities, medical facilities
and emergency services are easily accessible than in the
countryside. Big cities also have convenient transportation
and utility systems. They also offer faster Internet
connections. These all make our life easier in big cities.
In addition, we can take part in a variety of events in big
cities. Human being likes to live together and need to
interact with each other. In a big city, the population
density is high therefore there are always plenty of social
activities, sports events and concerts. There are more recreational
places in big cities, such as opera houses, movie
theatres, clubs, and swimming pools. You will have many
kinds of entertainment in big cities, and meet many people.
In countryside, however, the life may be dull and
quite, and you may only have a few neighbors. Living
alone with few activities can easily cause mental diseases.
Some may argue that the pollution in cities makes people
sick. However, with automobiles and modern highways
we can easily take a break to expose to fresh air in the
countryside and sunshine on the beach.
In conclusion, I strongly hold that living in big cities is
much better than living in the countryside because of the
advanced facilities and social activities in cities. Moreover,
the autos and highways enable us to enjoy the natural
and quiet surroundings in the countryside.
Topic 9 A small town vs. a big city
The environment where a person grows up and lives
molds his personality to a greater degree. He becomes a
part of the culture of that community where he lives and
the ideals, the line of thinking, the way people dress, the
way they speak, the types of food they like, all of these
are influential and somehow makes the person what he is.
Taking this into consideration, I would prefer living in a
big city.
I would like to be aware of a lot of things. I would like to
be up to date as to the current technologies that would
help lighten up activities of daily living, such as the Internet,
washing machines, microwave ovens, cable television
and the like. I would like to experience the benefits of
living in the era where high technology is the trend and
make total use of it. I would like to be exposed to things
that would make me an achieving professional in order to
succeed in life. It is not that I belittle those who would
prefer to stay in a little town. I think they have the advantage
of having a peaceful life, free of noise, air, and water
pollution, live abundantly with fresh fruits, vegetables,
milk and meat.
Also, the intimacy of having a small community far outweighs
the crowded city. But they are deprived of what is
new or if it comes to them, like television, people in the
city are using far more advanced tools and gadgets, such
as palm top computers or watching through their cell
phones already. For example, it is very difficult for electricity
to reach far fetched places and so how can they
make use of the Internet over there. Nowadays, it is very
easy to travel publicly, especially with the metro rail train
in the city. In a matter of minutes, you are already in your
destination without the hassles of traffic. But in a small
town, one has to walk by feet or if they become lucky,
some improvised moving carts made of plywood are the
means of their transportation.
I would not prefer living in a situation where I think I
would not grow as a person; where if ever I would learn
things, those are still way behind those of the urban people.
I want diversity. I want an evolving environment. I
want to be at pace with the challenges of the place I am
living at and not stay drowned in the stunted growth I
may have if I choose to stay in a little town.
Topic 9 Country and City
People are always wondering whether the country or the
city is the ideal place to live. If there is one preferencewhich
I take leave to make a conclusion-then it is the
country rather than the city that provides people with
optimal living conditions. There widespread testimonies
for it and the primary ones are listed as follows.
The foremost reason for dwelling in the countryside is
the soothing and comfortable life provided by the pastoral
view. Hardly anyone could resist the clean atmosphere,
the friendly neighbors, the closeness to nature and
the gentle pace of living. Those who have enjoyed the
first cock crow in the morning, the twittering of birds in
the tress and the breathtaking sight of the rising sun
would go into rapture at only mere mention of the idyllic
life. Relaxed and suburban dwellers are able to hold a
more positive attitude for life and achieve more accomplishment.

Oppositely, the obvious things brought about by noisy
and flashy city life are more pressure and forever-lasting
anxiety, agonizing and torching people's mind day in and
day out. Another subtle explanation rests on the fact that
country habitants are fortunate enough to enjoy the cozy
and pleasant ambience of the family without exhausting
social life. How satisfactory and refreshing it must be to
have dinner together with your loved ones in the spacious
and pastoral surroundings after a frustrating day!
Furthermore, nothing can be compared with the joy of
watching heart warming TV programs, playing convivial
games and sleeping in the tranquil and relaxing atmosphere.

On the contrary, it would be far more difficult to acquire
such pleasure for those urbanites. Consecutive and excessive
recreations not only thrift money but also deteriorate
people's health, which is the last thing one would
like to encounter. Naturally, it is possibly to reckless to
assert that nothing beneficial combines with city life since
several accompanying merits also come along with it.
Living in the metropolis means having more accesses to
various people involved in multiple attractive cultures.
Living in the metropolis also provides plentiful opportunities,
both in career and studies.
Nevertheless, the fact that city life makes it more convenient
to purchase a job does not prevent us from concluding
that country life is more enjoyable as well as healthful 
ToeflEssays.com
15
and placing a certain amount of reliance on the notion
that country life is always the sensible choice.
Topic 10 Luck and hard work
There is a humorous saying in English "The grass is always
greener on the other side of the valley." The saying
is used ironically to point out that there is a temptation in
us all to insist that others are more fortunate than we are.
This is nowhere more true than on the question of luck
and hard work. When faced with the "bad times", we often
find comfort in the idea that we are special in our
degree of misfortune. I feel that such an attitude is negative,
and that it can bring only further misfortune.
Many famously successful people have begun from small
origins. Mao was the son of a (modestly prosperous)
peasant; the explorer Captain Cook was so poor that, as a
child, he had to work by day and study by night; many of
the affluent Americans of today are the children of the
poor immigrants of yesterday. Beethoven, it should be
remembered, became deaf before the end of his career.
There are many, many more people who have also made
genuine, though Jess spectacular, successes against the
odds.
Within his own terms, a person who is born into poverty
in India is a great success if he manages to own a house
in later life. Poverty cannot be reduced by merely complaining
and blaming others: no matter how guilty other
people are, each individual must reach out to success for
himself. Indeed, some economists believe that the world
operates by what they call "the rule of the jungle." They
believe that in economics a person a1ways attempts to
gain profit from his neighbor: that given the chance the
poor man would quickly make himself rich by trading to
his own advantage.
Also, it is presumptuous to judge another according to
his or her apparent fortune. No man can ever truly understand
the sufferings of his neighbor. A man who appears
comfortably rich may have suffered elsewhere in his
life - through the death of a loved one, for example. Retired
businessmen have often worked long hours in their
youth. Surely, it must be wiser to respect achievement
than to deny that anyone has achieved good in the world.
To rely on notions of luck - to believe that life is a kind of
lottery - is an attempt to escape reality. Paradoxically, the
only time a person can claim that luck is more important than work is when he reflects on his own success. Because
of that modesty, the great man then becomes even
greater.
Topic 10 Luck and success
Some people believed that they achieved success by their
own ability, whereas other people believed that they did
it by luck. As for me, I would like to side with the former
people. I am willing to discuss it by proposing two main
reasons.
First, As for the genuine meaning of the term 'success',
luck is not the dominant aspect to gain success. What is
success? I like to say that success is a great integration of
a good motivation, a good procedure, and a good result.
That is, success means not only the self-realization or economic
abundance, but also enduring endeavor or firm
belief. Being a rich man or powerful man without hard
work is never a 'success'.
Second, for the social cohesion, I support the former
point of view. If we acknowledge that a person who becomes
a rich man due to luck as a successful man, we
would lose the moral principle that makes our community
safe and harmonious. That is because most people
are willing to buy lottery or play gambling instead of
work hard. 'No pain, No gain' is not fallacy.
As for me, I would like to live in a society where there is
no luck for success. I believe that hard labor and great
endeavor rather than luck is the origin of human happiness
and success.
Topic 11 Sports or library?
I disagree strongly with the idea that the same amount of
money should go to university sports activities as to university
libraries. Although playing sports is a wonderful
way to learn about teamwork, strategy and reaching your
goals, it should not be the principal focus of a university
education.
Students need the most up-to-date library facilities available
to get the best education. Many of those facilities are
very expensive to buy and maintain. These include computerized
programs and access to Internet research databases
that students can use to find information all around
the world. If a university is only offering its students resources
of a decade ago, it's depriving those students of a
tremendous amount of information.
Even the book and magazine budget of universities has
gone up tremendously in the last decade. More is being
published on every subject, and every university wants to
have this information available to its students.
It also costs money for universities to keep their libraries
open. Students need to have access to all the libraries`
research tools as much of the time as possible. Because
students are young and can stay up all night studying,
many universities are starting to leave their libraries open
all night during exam periods. This costs money, because
the staff has to be paid extra to be there. It also costs
money to run the building (electricity, heat) during that
time.
Students at universities are only going to benefit from
their education if they can get to all the tools they need
to learn. Sports are secondary to the resources that students
need from university libraries. For this reason, libraries
should always be better funded than sports activities.

Topic 12 Why do people go to museums?
As a tour guide for a Japanese woman in the city of Beijing
three years ago, I was amazed that she would be interested
in the Chinese Culture and History Museum,
which even Chinese pupils does not like to visit. Museum
in my eyes used to be a really boring place, which could
only display items that are dull and motionless. I thought
Museums were dead. Until after I traveled to some places
myself did I start to realize the life of museums. 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
16
A place consists mainly of its past and present in terms of
time. When you are visiting one place, the existing scenery,
streets and buildings give you chances to understand
its present easily. But when it comes to the past of a place,
things are different. With time going by, the past is always
staying in the past. Sometimes with the new constructions,
a place's past can even be burnt into ashes.
In most cases, museums preserve part of the original appearance
of a certain place and present plenty of information
in terms of objects and pictures that one cannot
obtain from the present. Only when information from the
present and that from the past are combined could one
obtain a relatively integrate image of the place. That is
why the Japanese woman insisted that she visit the Culture
and History Museum in Beijing. Like most of other
cities, Skyscrapers, glass walls and the modern street
scenes are all over the place in this city. The red and gray
walls, the palaces and small courtyards, which were typical
scenes in the past, can only be found in the vintage
photographs in the museum.
Thus, visiting museums is a very effective way to understand
a place's past, therefore one can get a whole picture
of a place that one visits.
For free essay discussion forums and more sample essays,
please visit http://www.toeflessays.com.
Topic 13 Eat out or eat at home?
Nowadays, some people like to eat at home and prepare
food by themselves, but others prefer to eat out side in
restaurants or at food stands. As far as I am concerned, I
prefer to eat at home.
Of course there are some advantages to eat out. Firstly,
restaurants offer a more comfortable environment to eat
and the food there tastes more delicious than homecooked
meals. In addition, eating at restaurants is a good
way of getting together with friends. People also do not
need to worry about washing dishes and cleaning. For
people who are too busy to cook, eating out is certainly
an ideal choice. Furthermore, for people do not know
how to cook and do not have some one to cook for them,
eat out seems to be the only choice.
However, I prefer to cook and eat and home. The main
reason is that at home, family members can prepare their
meals and enjoying their food together, which can enhance
their relationships. Family members can talk, make
jokes and exchange feelings on current affairs with each
other while preparing a meal. Parents have a chance to
communicate with their kids and keep track of what they
are thinking and doing; while children can learn to help
with some household tasks and develop intimacy with
their parents. Image that you and your brothers and sisters
help your mother to cook on a weekend, and enjoy
the food later on, and you feel everything is so nice.
Another reason is that eating at home can save money.
The same amount of money that you spend on a meal in
a restaurant can buy a lot more foods from a supermarket.
You can use the money saved to buy a new cloth, or attend
a concert.
General speaking, eating out side is comfortable and convenient,
but eating at home has more benefits. I prefer to
eat at home.
Topic 14 Should students be required to attend
classes?
Should university students be required to attend classes?
There are two different opinions. Some people claim that
attending classes is a must to students. Other people,
however, argue that it should be up to the students to
decide whether they need to go or not. As far as I am
concerned, no matter whether students like it or not,
they must attend classes.
Students who do not like to go to classes have their reasons.
The main one is, they can learn knowledge by
themselves. If they were asked to attend the class in
which the professor teaches something they already have
known, it would be a pain. By not attending class, students
can control their time more freely and are likely
not to waste time.
Although I agree that there are maybe one or two advantages
of not attending classes, I insist that the advantages
of attending classes far overweigh that of not attending.
In the first place, professors can teach students a lot of
things that are not written in the books, such as the way
of thinking. In the dictionary, a university is defined to be
a place where teachers lecture what they know to students.
Books normally offer just concentrated knowledge.
How the authors developed their ideas and reached their
conclusions is usually not written in the books. How to
answer these questions? Go to the classes. The professors
will not only teach you knowledge, but also teach you
methodologies and answer your questions, face to face.
In the second place, students will benefit from seminars
and group discussions with their classmates when they
attend classes. It is a society that emphasizes on the importance
of communication and listening to other people's
opinions and ideas. It is very important to share
your ideas and knowledge with other people. In a class,
the professor often gives some topics for students to discuss.
In the discussions, a student will be surprised that
he/she can get so many fresh thoughts and ideas from
his/her fellow students.
In conclusion, I believe that students should attend
classes not only because professors can teach you knowledge
and methods, but also because students can learn
from each other in the classes. In short, one must attend
classes if one chooses to attend university.
Topic 14 Should students be required to attend
classes?
Some people may believe that going to classes should be
optional, but I really disagree with them about it. I do not
understand how a university student can expect to learn
much knowledge if he doesn't attend classes. Although
self-study is a good way to acquire knowledge, students, I
believe, need to be in class.
In classes students receive the benefit of the teacher's
knowledge. A teacher does more than just going over the
material in the textbooks; she draws her students into 
ToeflEssays.com
17
discussions that may lead further understanding of the
teaching material. She not only teaches acknowledge and
theories, but also presents opposing opinions that help
students think and absorb what they have learned. Additionally,
she may invite guest speakers to give her students
extra information from another prospect, or play
some documentary films on certain subject.
Besides teaching knowledge, a teacher impart her students
the right method of study. In that way, the students
can understand how to study efficiently, how to find information
from proper resources, and how to apply what
they have learned into practice. In other word, if there is
no teacher to lead them to the right way, the students
may go into a roundabout and waste lots of time.
The last reason for attending classes is that going to
classes can train students to be more responsible and
have good sense of teamwork. In classes, the students
may be given some group assignments. To achieve assignments,
they can know what is their respective responsibility
and how to cooperate with others. Meanwhile,
they can learn from each other because each student
has his strong points, different background and experience.

In short, going to classes give students more knowledge,
help them to become more responsible, cooperative and
thoughtful. I believe that attending classes cannot be optional,
but should be a essential part of university education.

For free essay discussion forums and more sample essays,
please visit http://www.toeflessays.com.
Topic 15 Qualities of a good neighbor
When I think about my childhood years, I my first friends
come to my mind, those who were the first people besides
my family I got to know, who became my friends
and grew up with me. Most of them were classmates,
relatives and of course, neighbors. Neighbors are those
people who share the street, block and fences with us.
Their existence has always been taken for granted, and
they haven't been given the importance or attention that
they deserve.
For some people, neighbors can mean “troublesome” or
“annoyance." For others, neighbors are considered as
relatives, and they enjoy having a good and close relationship
with their neighbors. Of course, the opinions
depend on personality of individuals, culture, type of
housing (house or apartment), place (a big city, a small
town, or the country) among others. But both points of
view may come to an agreement when determining “what
makes a good neighbor?”
In the first place, a good neighbor should be considerate.
Knowing that you should treat others the way you expect
to be treated is a quality that makes people respect
boundaries (physical, social and emotional). For instance,
a neighbor who can tell when the noise of his stereo
makes may bother the people next door, and is able to
turn it down taking into consideration of his neighbors'
needs.
In the second place, being sympathetic is another characteristic
that a neighbor should have. Putting yourself in
someone else's shoes makes you understand better the
feelings of somebody who is in trouble, and consequently,
offer appropriate help. An example could be a situation
where you know that your neighbor divorced recently
and is going through a hard time. Maybe you will be
more understanding when you see her in a bad mood,
and avoid an unnecessary conflict, because you can see
the way she feels.
Finally, good manners and a polite way to address your
neighbors can polish even the toughest relationship.
When a neighbor is rude, even if we excuse him or her by
saying, “that's the way he/she is”, we feel a little rejected.
A nice smile or a “Hello” helps a lot to start a friendly
conversation, and to avoid misunderstandings such as
“He never speaks to me, so he must be mad at me or
something." Manners do help to start friendships.
There are so many more characteristics that we could list,
and there are many ways we could make a more accurate
picture of the perfect neighbor we all want to have. But I
guess the best way to “edify” our neighbors is by being
good neighbors ourselves. We cannot demand others to
do something for us that we cannot offer to do for them.
We should stop complaining about what our neighbor
always does that bothers us; we'd better start analyzing
what we are doing to make the relationships with “the
people next door” flourish. Let us start setting the example.

Topic 15 Qualities of a good neighbor
Neighbors are the people who live near us, and their behavior
influences our daily life. Good neighbors can make
us feel comfortable and give us many help, and everyone
will benefit from a good relationship among neighbors.
In my point of view, these are three conspicuous aspects
of the qualities of a good neighbor.
One of the most important characteristics of good
neighbors is that they have a good living habit and are
friendly to others. A person with bad habit will affect your
daily life. For example, children are most likely to be influenced
by bad neighbors and carry on bad habits. On
the other hand, being friendly is also an important nature
of good neighbors. If neighbors are unfriendly, they are
hard to approach and difficult to get along with.
Another important aspect of good neighbors is that they
should be willing to help others. In our daily life, emergency
situations may occur, and we may encounter difficulties
that cannot be resolved by ourselves. The quickest
help we can get is probably from our neighbors. To some
degree, neighbors are as important as relatives to us, because
they could provide the immediate help. In the
same way, a neighbor who likes to help others will get
help in return. Help each others can form a friendly and
harmonious relationship among the neighbors.
All in all, a good neighbor is someone who has a good
living habit, is friendly and is willing to help others. Taking
into account of all these factors, we may reach the
conclusion that a good relationship among neighbors
need the maintenance from us. 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
18
Topic 15 Qualities of a good neighbor
Speaking of the word 'neighbor', it arouses different responses
among people. Some people may frown upon it,
others might nod their heads at it with their wholehearted
smile on their faces. No matter which category
you belong to, as a person, especially as a person who
has to live next to a neighbor, the concern on the qualities
of a good neighbor is always a popular issue to bring
about and to desire for. In my opinion, a good neighbor
must be a friendly person, while at the same time, a person
who is willing to offer help to you when you need
the most.
As an important and fundamental quality of a good
neighbor, she or he must be kind and nice. Neighbors are
those persons we meet in every day life when we go in
and out of the building. They are usually the people we
meet at the very beginning of the day, and whom again
we will encounter at the end of the day. A nice and sincere
smile on their faces, or a simple 'hello' as a warm
greeting on the way, may bring us a joyful mood for a
start of a day. In a very same way, a caring 'how was your
day?' on your way home might be treated as a big comfort
on your tiredness at the end of your working day. As nice
neighbors, they have provided us a very cordial living
environment through their care and friendship.
Other than that, being able to help you out when it is
necessary is also considered as a significant trait of a good
neighbor. Through our entire lives, there are numerous
difficulties or troublesome situations that we have to deal
with. When those particular moments come into life, the
first person come into our mind is often our best friend
or one of the relatives. However, most of the time, they
cannot be the real person who we can rely on at those
hard times. We will soon realize they are either too far
away or they are unavailable right now. We all have once
had these similar experiences. Then here is the moment
where good neighbors should begin to play their helpful
roles so that we can immediately turn to them for help
and useful advice for dealing and solving the emergency,
and so that we do not have to lose our minds in trying to
find everyone's phone number.
These are the precious and indispensable qualities of
good neighbors. They are friendly and nice, and they will
always be there ready for you when you need someone's
help. Living with such a neighbor, you may start to sway
at your old image of neighbor, and you may no longer
frown upon that topic at the time we talk about it.
Topic 15 Qualities of a good neighbor
It seems, among so many qualities such as reliability,
honesty, helpfulness, and patience, very difficult to prefer
one to another because each of them has its unique advantages.
Yet that does not mean that they are of the
same weight to me. To be frank, I would prefer reliability
and helpfulness.
Why I vote for reliability? I stand behind it because I can
trust my neighbors only if they are reliable people. That
makes me feel safe to associate with them. Imagine if
your neighbor is not reliable, will you put your worries to
rest to let your neighbor look after your children even
when she offers to do so? Do you dare leave your key to
your neighbor when she says she will keep it for you? Will
you lend your car to her when your neighbor promises
that she will return it within two hours? Obviously, reliability
is not only a quality of a good neighbor, but also a
quality of a good person, and it is the foundation of a
good relationship.
Being helpful is another quality that I have chosen to illustrate
here. A neighbor should be kind and helpful,
because they live close to you, and you never know when
you might need help. For example, when you go for a
vocation, your neighbor can help you water the plants,
and pick up the mail. It is always good when you know
that if something happens, your neighbor is there to help.
Of course, other qualities such as honesty and patience
are also important to some extent, but everybody has his
or her own preferences. I chose reliability and helpfulness
as the qualities of a good neighbor because reliability
helps us develop a good relationship and helpfulness
keeps the relationship remaining for a long time.
Topic 16 A new restaurant in your neighborhood
A new restaurant in my neighborhood would be the most
exciting event for me. I personally have positive feelings
towards this proposal and also believe that the people of
my neighborhood shall also feel excited about such an
event.
Life in the fast lane today has turned out to be so hectic
and tedious to us that at times we feel exhausted and
therefore unwilling to prepare our food. We also feel a
strong urge towards a change in the type and flavor of
food that we eat. A new restaurant at such times near by
shall make a difference to our lives.
In occasions of happiness, get-togethers and enjoyment,
having a restaurant nearby is always a convenience for
people here. For example, the restaurant can be a convenient
place to hold a wedding reception, or a birthday
ceremony.
A new restaurant shall certainly add lots of enthusiasms
and excitements to people here and people who have the
greatest amount of enjoyment would be the younger people.
They can relax in a new environment with the experience
of a new atmosphere and people around and
most of all, tasting something new. On the other hand, a
new restaurant in our neighborhood gives hope to young
people who would like to make money through a part
time or full time job.
In conclusion, a new restaurant will bring convenience to
our community. So I personally welcome such a plan.
Topic 17 Learn by yourself or with a teacher?
Some people prefer to learn by themselves. They think
they can learn better in this way because they have more
freedom, independence, and pressure in their self-study.
There is some truth in their way, but they fail to see the
many advantage of learning with a teacher. Especially,
when you learn something more complicated, it is always
best to have a teacher. My arguments for this point are
listed as follows. 
ToeflEssays.com
19
First, a teacher can act as a guide to lead you to success.
When you grope for knowledge, you need help and advice.
A teacher, who treats you as if you were his own
child, will give you a hand when you encounter difficulties;
he will render his advice when you are in a dilemma.
Without a guide, you would be searching in darkness
without a torch to light the way for you.
What is more, a teacher exerts real pressure on you. If
you study by yourself, you must be strong-minded
enough to keep on. You may become indolent for lack of
a strong will. Studying under the guidance of a teacher,
however, you will feel there is always someone to supervise
you. The teacher may assign you some books to read
or some homework to do. You must complete the assignments,
or you will not pass the course. You are urged
to go no by your teacher.
Last but not least, studying with a teacher will receive the
benefit of the teacher's knowledge. In class, the best
teachers do more than just go over the material in the
textbook. They teach students how to learn, how to absorb
information and then apply what you have learned
to other situations. They guide all of you on classroom to
develop discussion of the material and provide extra materials
to broaden the scope of the topic. Without the
help of teacher, it is nearly impossible to get these skills
just by reading the textbook yourself.
In short, I prefer go to class, studying with teacher to
guide and urge me. I choose to learn in a big family----my
school. If I was obliged to learn by myself without a
teacher or classmates, I would feel very sad and lonely.
There would be no fun, no pressure, and no motivation. I
could not learn well in such dull and depressing circumstances.

Topic 18 Qualities of a good supervisor
Though everyone will work in different places such as a
company, a college or university, a factory and so on, I
think there are the same standards judging a good supervisor
in several aspects.
Firstly, a good supervisor treats his/her staff fairly. He
knows how to balance the workload. He will not let some
members of his staff do many things while others only do
a few things. If he gives you a task, he will tell you in advance.
Moreover, he will not ask you complete a project
in a few days that actually needs half a month to do. A
poor supervisor never considers his employee's feelings.
A poor supervisor is usually not a good planer, so he is
very nervous when a project comes to its deadline, and
he will use his fault to punish his staff. A supervisor like
this would certainly not benefit the company.
Secondly, a good supervisor praises or criticizes in a
straightforward way. If you do very well, he will praise
you, and encourage you to do better. If you have made a
mistake, he will criticize you face to face, and he will not
complain to your co-workers. He will also analyze how to
improve your work and point out the ways to do thing
right. Furthermore, he will encourage you and trust that
you will do well next time.
Thirdly, a good supervisor cares for his staff. He is aware
of your feelings and emotions. When you are sick, he will
send you flowers or visit you, or he will arrange other
members of staff to see you if he is busy. He treats his
staff like family members. He is gentle and cheerful. Smile
often appears on his face when he greets you. On the
contrary, a poor supervisor often pretends to be serious.
He never understands what his subordinates are thinking.
His staff will never have a good mood when he is present
at work.
Finally, a good supervisor must set a good example to his
staff. He must work hard, and has a strong sense of responsibility
about his company. He must understand the
operation of the company, and can do every staff's job in
his department when necessary. That way he will win
respect from his stuff and his spirit can motivate them.
In short, a good supervisor treats his workers fairly, cares
for their feelings, treat them as family members, and set a
good example for them.
Topic 19 Highways or public transportation?
In this modern society, governments always confront the
dilemma whether spending more money on improving
roads and highways or on improving public transportation.
This problem is a much-debated one in that it affects
everybody in his or her daily life. Personally speaking, I
would be one of those who argue that governments
should spend more money on improving public transportation.

Though it is quite rational for average people to choose
roads and highways because of the obvious reason that a
better road condition could suspend more vehicles and
accelerate the speed of them. A close scrutiny of the potential
benefits of choosing roads and highways would
reveal how flimsy it is to stick to the propensity. A better
road condition would bring with it more vehicles, thus a
much more crowded traffic. Have you ever been caught
in a traffic jam? Then how could just spending more
money on improving roads and highways do?
Besides, putting the discussion in a wider context, a further
reason why I advocate the later lies in the fact that
improvement of road condition would stimulate more
people to use cars and hence more energy would be used
and more pollution would be exposed. This would be the
last thing that everyone would like to see. But if we
choose to improve public transportation, a quite different
result could be. This can be demonstrated by the undeniable
fact of our city. We have greatly improved the bus
network and reduced the parking places since several
years ago. Now more and more people shift from cars to
buses and other public transportation, and an azure sky
can be highly savored again.
Finally, frankly speaking, there is also a more practical
reason why I choose to improve public transportations.
Public transportation encourages a sense of community.
People who travel to work together all the time get to
know each other better while cars isolate us from
neighbors. An improvement in public transportation
would make it fit more people's schedules and more
people would choose to take public transportation to 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
20
enjoy communicating with each other.
When taking into account all these merits and drawbacks
I have numerated, we may safely arrived at the conclusion
that we should put more money and concerns more
about public transportation. We would experience more
convenience when traveling as well as an appreciable
nature environment.
Topic 20 Countryside or city?
There are advantages and disadvantages for a child to
grow up in the country or in a city. It's hard to say which
is better. Growing up in the country means a certain degree
of isolation. You're in a small town or on a farm with
few people. In addition, the people you meet everyday
tend to be just like you. Most have the same background
with you, and go to the same schools with you. In the city,
people you meet are all different. People come from different
culture backgrounds.
City people tend to come from a lot of different places
and move around a lot. So, there is not a sense of community
in the city like what you have in the country. People
in the city can live in the same apartment building for
twenty years even without getting to know each other. In
the country, however, everybody knows everybody. A
child can get lost or hurt in the city and have no one to
turn to. In the country, everyone is a neighbor, and people
feel connected to each other.
A child in the city has a lot of interesting and exciting
places to visit. He or she can go to a zoo, museums, art
galleries and concerts. There are a lot of restaurants with
different kinds of cuisines. It's easy to see new movies
that come out. Children in the country don't have many
activities to go to.
To my opinion, a childhood in the city is better because it
prepares a child more for what real life is like.
Topic 21 Why do people live longer?
With the development of human society, people are living
longer now. Many factors interact together to enable
a longer life. There are three most important causes: the
quality of food has been greatly improved; people could
have access to medical services; more and more people
realize that regular sports benefit their health.
The improving quality of our food is the most important
factor of the longer life. We could have not only enough
food as we want, but also more healthier food. When we
preparing food, we no longer consider the cost, but pay
more attention to the nutritious value of the food. With
the development of transportation systems, inland people
now could also enjoy seafood and tropical fruit.
Furthermore, governments are paying more and more
money on medical establishments. Citizens could have
access to medical services more easily. Because of the
convenient medical service, more illnesses could be detected
at an earlier stage. Also, many illnesses that had
been considered fatal could be cured today. The better
detection and cure enable people's longer life.
Last but not least, people care more for their own health.
Every morning you could see people doing sports outside.
More and more people have realized the saying “life
is in motion." Regular sports build up a strong body.
Naturally, people with stronger body could resist more
diseases.
To sum up, the development of our society ensures that
people have longer life. People now enjoy better food
and better medical services, and they spend more time
on sports and exercises to build up stronger bodies. As
we could predict, people are going to live even longer in
the future.
Topic 22 Important qualities of a co-worker
We spend more time with our co-workers during weekdays
than we do with our family. Thus, it's important for
our co-workers to be the people we can get along with.
In my opinion, there are certain characteristics that all
good co-workers have in common. They are cooperative,
considerate and humorous.
We no longer observe now a time that worships individual
merits with great enthusiasm. Everyone should cooperate
with each other. Teamwork is curial to a business. A
good co-worker is willing to contribute to the office
community and not too stubborn to accept advice. He
realizes the fact that if one's work is left not done in time,
it may hold up everyone else.
Besides, a good co-worker is very considerate. He may
change his own schedule to accommodate another's
emergency. He may be a sympathetic listener, comforting
others when they are miserable.
What is more, a good co-worker should have a sense of
humor. His positive attitude may create a pleasant environment.
When we are under the great stress of work,
what we need most is not a delicious meal but merely a
few good jokes to relax our nerve cells.
What I have listed is not the complete set of characters of
a good co-worker, however, we can feel how comfortable
it is to get along with a good co-worker. Being a good coworker
is not difficult but really very necessary. Such experience
of being a good co-worker will definitely contribute
to other aspects of life such as friendship and a
healthy lifestyle.
Topic 23 Should teenagers work?
In some countries, teenagers have jobs while they are still
students. After thinking about it from several aspects, I do
not believe it is a good idea. The reasons are presented
below.
Part-time jobs may affect students' academic studies.
Working several hours a day consumes a lot of time and
one might be too exhausted to study. The main purpose
of school life for teenagers is to learn scientific knowledge
and techniques in preparation for their future. It is
generally suggested that in order to master what they
have learned at school, students must spend at least 3
hours each day on their homework. It would be impossible
for a student to work part-time while maintaining a
high standard of academic learning. As a result, they may
find it hard to adjust to what the school and society expects
from them as well as what their employers expect
them to perform on the job. 
ToeflEssays.com
21
Another reason why I do not approve teenagers to work
part-time is that working while studying will deprive their
time of sleep and will do harm to their health. Teenagers
are in the process of building up their body. They need
time to do exercises and engage in other activities, and
they also need plenty of rest. If they work, they may sacrifice
their time for sleep, club activities, exercise, and recreation.
Sometimes, teenagers have jobs that consume
more strength than they can afford. This will be definitely
harmful to their health.
Finally, working part-time and making extra money may
contribute to their bad habits. Teenagers are not mature
enough to spend money wisely. However with part-time
jobs they make money that allow them to spend whatever
way they like, such as playing electronic games, smoking,
drinking, and even gambling.
Based on the above discussion, I do not think it is a good
idea for teenagers to work while they are still students.
Compared with their whole lifetime, school life is a short
period. Teenagers should value their school life and make
full use of the time. Only by working hard during school
life can they find their proper jobs in their future life.
Topic 24 The advantages of living in my city
It is almost always the case that a person who has been
living in a rural area for a while confronts certain conveniences
and inconveniences of living in a city. One convenience
is the number and diversity of stores and shops
available in a short distance in a city. A big inconvenience
is the traffic congestion that takes place in many places.
One big thing I remind my foreign friend who is planning
to move to my city is that there is cultural diversity, or
even conflicts. My friend is an international student from
Japan who is living in a small town in California. As a foreigner,
he confronts with cultures of local people everyday.
On the other hand he realizes that there are few
stores and restaurants that are native to his culture. It is
very normal that such a person gets homesick and starts
missing people and foodstuffs from his own country.
Moving to a big city will satisfy such needs of him because
there are many stores, restaurants, and supermarkets that
are run by Japanese companies so he will less likely to be
homesick any more.
However, there is one big inconvenience about living in a
city, which is traffic. Especially people who drive often
feel stressed on the streets that are always packed with
cars lining up in the streets. It is always difficult to find
parking spots either in the parking lots or on the street.
Furthermore, apartments do not always provide sufficient
parking spots to their residents. A lot of people who live
in city feel less convenient to keep cars and choose to use
public transportation. However, unfortunately, the public
transportation system is not perfectly great around my
neighborhood.
My city satisfies and dissatisfies my foreign friend who
drives. The availability of stores and shops that are native
to his country soothes his dissatisfaction about being surrounded
by different cultures. However, on the other
hand, traffic jam that is always the problem in big cities
gives new stress that he is currently free from. It is a matter
of balance between the two features that he needs to
settle in.
Topic 25 A new shopping center
There are both advantages and disadvantages of establishing
a shopping mall in our neighborhood. I am worried
about the traffic and how it will affect our community.
However, I believe it will benefit local businesses and
increase appreciations for our local area. Overall, I think
it is a good idea.
For those that I am worried about, traffic congestion and
parking problem are obvious. First of all, traffic congestion
is always a concern when building something new.
Our streets are narrow, with parking on both sides. A
shopping center will certainly bring more traffic than ever
before, and heavy traffic means big congestion. At the
same time, parking is also a problem in this area. There
are few garages attached to houses. Most of residents depend
on finding spaces on the street for parking. If a
shopping mall is built, we must compete with customers
and patrons for those parking spaces. Furthermore, if the
shopping center offers valet parking service, it would be
even worse because valet parking works in terms to grab
every possible space available in street.
On the other hand, building up a shopping center will
give this neighborhood more opportunities and benefits.
Residents in this area could certainly take the job that
shopping center offers. People would earn more money
and spend on other businesses, such as entertainment
and education, which are operating in our neighborhood
or adjacent communities. As a result, not only local businesses
but also inter-community businesses are boosted
up and a prodigious amount of fortune will be accumulated
to our neighborhood. A shopping center can also
attract people to visit our community. When they drive to
the shopping center, they will see what a nice place this
area is to live. Therefore, we would have an increasing
number of residents in the next couple of years. It is very
important to introduce new population because we have
lost many residents to suburbs during recent years.
In short, there are several details to consider when planning
a shopping center. In my part, I support to have a
new shopping center in my community because its advantages
outweigh disadvantages.
Topic 26 A new movie theater
Some people will say that a new movie theater in our
neighborhood would be a bad thing. However, I fully
support the plan to build one. I feel that a movie theater
would bring more opportunities for recreation, reduce
teenage delinquency, and lead to several improvement in
the town.
As it stands there is little to do in my town. There are no
parks here, and there is certainly no nightlife. Additionally,
the nearest movie theater is more than thirty minutes
drive away. That is inconvenient for anyone here. Many
movies end late at night. Who wants a long drive at 11:30
p. m. or midnight? A new movie theatre near our homes
will certainly welcomed by people living here. 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
22
Building a new movie theater here will reduce juvenile
delinquencies. Like every one else, teens here are bored.
They need activities to keep them busy and out of troubles.
The jobs that the theater will provide will help teens,
too. We also need more businesses that are willing and
eager to employ young people.
Overall, the new theater will bring many improvements
to the town. For example, it will help other business. The
movie theater will attract customers from neighboring
towns. Those neighbors do not have a reason to come to
this town now. However, if they are coming here for a
movie, they will be more likely to spend time and money
here. If we get more visitors, we will need more roads.
While this may be costly, it will also make travel easier for
people living here. We will be able to get around faster.
Safety will be improved with the new roads, because they
will be in better conditions than many that we have now.
I believe that our town needs a new movie theater. Again,
I support it fully. I hope that others in our community
will join me to convince residents and local government.
Topic 27 Should people do things that they do not
like?
When it comes to the topic should people sometimes do
things that they do not enjoy doing, optimistic and pessimistic
people have different attitudes toward this topic.
For me, a person who likes changes a little, I would prefer
to do some different things sometimes even if I do not
like them. There are many reasons why I should sometimes
do things they do not enjoy doing.
The first reason is that I could get more experiences from
the things I am doing, no matter I enjoy it or not. There
are pros and cons for every experience. What I learned
from doing something I dislike is to conquer the similar
situation and take the advantage of good changes I may
encounter again in the future. In addition, I will see such
a disagreeable thing as diversity to my routine life.
Secondly, many things which I do not enjoying doing can
actually do well to me. For example, I do not like to
sweat because it makes me uncomfortable with those
sticky clothes and bad smell. But for exercise, the activity
will cause me to sweat, surely keep me in good shape
and benefit my health. Besides, I feel happy whenever I
see my figure become more slender. Moreover, Overcoming
displeased things gives me a sense of achievement.
All in all, it is not bad for me to do something I do not
enjoy doing. Therefore, I agree that people should sometimes
do things that they do not enjoy doing.
Topic 28 Media and celebrities
In this global information age where newspapers or
magazines are always handy and TV has already turned so
many people into couch tomatoes, few people concern
about what these mass media has brought to us; we just
accept it anyway. While I think the current focus on personal
lives of famous people by these media requires further
consideration.
Admittedly, it is reasonable for those media to continuously
pay great attention to celebrities, the present fierce
competition of the various media, the hard-to-pleased
audiences' taste, the bombastic effect of coverage of these
shining figures. No surprise sometimes that we feel we
just know more than those famous people than themselves.

However, the consequence of such intense coverage on
public figures' personal lives not only violate those beingfocused
on a certain level, but also do harm to us beinginformed
in some ways. Firstly, the privacy of those celebrities
is ineluctably encroached from time to time.
Sometimes the result is sad - do not forget the tragedy of
Princess Diana. Secondly, our attention is certainly being
diverted by such tide of craziness about celebrities. What
about those viewers who want to see something about
ordinary people' lives? How can mass media not concern
more about those people suffering from pain and poverty?
Furthermore, one of the significant results of the current
fad on famous figures is that their behavior is so influential
while at the same time the media have little guarantee
to ensure what the say and do will not mislead the mass
public and even cause more problems. For example, if a
famous figure is being asked about his or her point of
view in a field he or she is not quite acquainted, the
words presented to the audience may be misleading. This
is especially harmful to those young people who are
more likely to watch those programs of their idols, and
also are mostly vulnerable to influential but harmful sayings.

In a sense, I don not quite appreciate the coverage of
people in the center of spotlight, maybe once the mass
media turn a little bit from their current focus to other
aspects of the society, they may find out that the world is
wonderful all the same.
Topic 28 Media and celebrities
With the prosperity of both science and culture, people
are accustomed with an abundant supply of information.
Modern media, such as television, newspapers magazines,
reinforce our accesses to news and information of all
kinds, the most prevalent t of which are those about public
figures and celebrities. Now there is a growing awareness
that media now pay too much attention to the personal
lives of famous people. As far as I am concerned, I
cannot agree more with the statement and my point of
view is well founded.
Nowhere in the history has the condition been more visible
that reports about famous people, like music stars,
movie actors/actresses and sports figures are easily available
and unusually in details. When we turn on the TV,
we may be led to the new apartment of a fashion star;
when we glance at the paper, we may see dim pictures of
an actress and her new boyfriend; especially when we get
online, it is almost impossible for us to get ride of the
latest affairs of a talented football player. It seems that the
personal lives of public figures weigh much more important
than the contributions they make to the society. All
those absurd attention paid to their privacy is a waste of
resources and degradation of public interest.
Another equally important aspect is that most of reports
on lives of famous people are always focused on brilliant 
ToeflEssays.com
23
achievements and extravagant enjoyment, which overstate
the gorgeous part and understate the painstaking
part. Therefore, young people are often biased and tend
to pursue such kinds of lives but with little endeavor. In
addition, since the teenage are inclined to adore their
idols with such a passion that mass of negative news and
information of popular figures may even twist some
youths' view of life.
Besides, public attention excessively paid to individual
privacy of celebrities not only deteriorate social morality,
but also derive the regularity and peacefulness of daily
lives from those figures. Furthermore, tragedies are
sparked in some extreme cases. One of the most well
known examples is the death of Princess Diana of Britain.
Certainly I do not deny that some decent habits or features
of the famous individuals add to his/her attraction
and help to characterize him/her better. But our interests
and curiosities should be properly controlled. All I want
to assert here is a rational attitude to public figures and
respect for individuals.
Topic 29 Has human harmed the Earth?
People have learned how to turn wild natural areas to
farm land, how to exploit minerals to adapt their needs,
how to build roads and houses to expand their territories.
People continuously improve their knowledge and develop
technologies to improve their lives. It is undeniable
that these activities of human beings make their lives better
than ever before. Nevertheless, those activities also
cause side-effects to the Earth because of pollution, deforestation,
and exaggerated natural resource exploitation.

Nowadays, pollution becomes one of the most concerned
problems. Because of the increasingly expanded factories,
the industrialized areas, the burning of population etc,
too much pollutant spills out everyday. Consequently, all
of these things cause bad effect to the Earth. The purity of
atmosphere is reduced seriously, the Earth is continuously
warmed up, and ozone layer is holed.
Additionally, forest is asking for help in desperation. For
last few decades, the forest areas have been reduced to
50 percent because of human deforestation. Green forestland
of the Earth can be compared to the lungs of human.
How healthy you are if their your lungs are trespassed. I
am sure that you will get more difficult with aspiration; as
a result, your health will be affect badly. From this example,
we can infer that how serious problem our Earth has
to face with. I wonder how long it can endure.
Researchers show that the natural means is limited, but
today, they are exploited so increasingly to adapt infinite
human needs that someday, all mineral can be ended up.
Because of serious pollution, alarming deforestation and
progressive mineral exploitation, the ecosystem becomes
unbalance. Consequently a lot natural calamities happen
each year such as flood, hurricanes. A lot wild living creatures
are exposed to narrow place of shelter and lacking
foods. For these reasons, the Earth will become unhealthy.

In conclusion, the human beings harm the Earth. Human
beings as well as their dear planet, the Earth, have been
badly suffered by what caused by humans themselves. I
hope that humans are soon aware of those problems so
that they can have suitable policies in order to not only
improve their lives but also keep and maintain the Earth
fresh and green.
Topic 29 Has human harmed the Earth?
Although the quality of life has improved over the past
decades due to new technological advances but the damages
made to the earth weigh more. Damages include
increase in pollution and change in climatic patterns.
Irreversible damage to earth can include depletion of
natural resources.
As the technology advances more factories are built.
These factories dispose waste material into natural water,
which could be harmful to aquatic life. Emissions from
the factories and automobiles pollute the air, which we
breathe. Nuclear waste and radiation from power plants
are harmful to our health.
There can be drastic changes in the climatic pattern due
to the increase in the carbon dioxide released into the
atmosphere, which is the main cause of global warming.
Global warming would increase the temperature of earth
and make it inhospitable. We are cutting more and more
trees for furniture's, and wood. Trees purify the atmosphere
by absorbing the carbon dioxide from the atmosphere
and releasing the oxygen. Furthermore, the roots
of tree hold the soil and prevent floods.
Resources of petroleum, oil, and minerals are not endless.
There is shortage of water all over the world. Once depleted
of these resources, our life would be difficult. Killing
elephants for their teeth, and other species for their
furs disrupt the food chain. For example killing of carnivorous
animals would cause increase in the number of
herbivores, which would consume more plants. We also
depend on plants for food so there can be shortage of
vegetables and cereals for us.
We should preserve the earth and respect all its valuable
resources. Pollution and climatic changes can make earth
inhospitable. Our future would not be good without sustainable
development.
Topic 30 A high school in the community
I support the plan of building a new high school in my
community, as currently there are no high schools in my
community and the nearest one is almost three miles
away from the community.
Students in my community have to travel a long distance
either by any available conveyance or independent transportation.
As all of them cannot afford to have their own
transport and the parents are also finding it difficult to
drop their children daily at the school that is far away
from their work places. As the high school is far away and
many children have to take either auto rickshaws or
buses, there is a traffic problem caused in the route during
the school days. There are also potential dangers as
the auto rickshaws tend to transport more children than
it can carry, therefore there is a risk of accidents causing 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
24
by these overcrowded autos.
Also the land that was allocated for high school construction
is being encroached by private people. Our community
mostly consists of middle class people, and they cannot
afford to send their children on school buses and
there is a lot of time being wasted on transportation to
the school. Our community consists of other facilities like
a university and a hospital, but lacks a high school. It
would also be comfortable for small children to go to the
school if it is made in our community and the parents
would not worry about dropping off their child at school.
Finally the high school that is going to be built in the
community can also provide employment opportunities
to college graduates who are unemployed in the community
and ready to take up the teaching profession. In
sum, I support that a new high school should be built in
my community.
Topic 31 Stay at one place or move around?
Staying in one place or moving in search of another place?
Some people prefer to living in one place because they
enjoy a harmonious relation with their neighbors and
environments. While others prefer to moving from one
place to another because of various reasons, a better job,
house, community, or even climate. Looking back to my
education and looking forward to my future career, I
have been and will be moving a number of times. But
considering my personality, I would rather live in one
place when I am old.
For a student, a good education opportunity is the most
important concern. Students leave their homes for good
university education. Different schools have different
teaching styles. It is very common for students to choose
among different schools to find a most suitable one. I did
pursue my bachelor's degree far from my hometown, and
I am pursuing my master degree at another university,
and would like to pursue a ph. D abroad.
Career development is another important issue. In order
to have a strong experience and to get a fulfilling job,
people would work in a number of companies. In different
companies, we could experience different cultures
and ways of doing things. The variety of people and culture
will do much good to our future career development.
However, frankly speaking, I am not an aggressive person.
I would rather enjoy my live in a stable pace. When I am
old and without the pressure to struggle for a better job,
I would prepare to stay in a peaceful and quiet place,
where I could chat with my old friends everyday.
Taking into account all these factors, I would like to present
myself such a solution: To try a number of places for
better education and job opportunities when I am young;
to stay in a peaceful place to enjoy live with my wife
when I am old.
Topic 31 Stay at one place or move around?
Living in one place all your life may seem very convenient.
For my part, I am inclined to believe that not everyone is
born in the place that is best for him/her, and thus one
should take the chance and move to a place that is more
suitable. For me at least, in this particular time of my development
I find it better to stay in a place for a while,
and then move on, to another place. However, as I would
grow old I do believe my opinions in this matter will
modify.
When I had decided for a career in art history, in a way, I
had also chosen for a life on the road. I had always seen
myself traveling from one place to another, organizing an
exhibition here and there, and moving from one university
to the next. In the five years before I started my undergraduate
education I had been enrolled in four universities
in three different countries. At a first glance,
such a way of living seems really appealing. It is always
exciting to see new places, and meet new people.
Also the idea of moving in order to find a more interesting
and challenging job seems to be quite legitimate.
However, one needs to consider that not everyone moves
during his/her life because he/she wants to, but on the
contrary because he/she have to. There are people that
are running away from their pasts, or for one reason or
another they simply cannot stay in the place of their
choice. Moreover, moving from here to there have disadvantages
even for those who enjoy moving. Family and
friends are often left behind. Most likely, they miss the
places that they have left. A piece of our soul remains in
every place we spend a considerable amount of time. And
what are we left with in the end? Probably with nothing
more than the pain of being away from so many relatives,
friends, and places we love.
Best thing to do, in my opinion, is travel all around the
world, see as many places and cultures, make friends, but
always keep a special place to return to, even if this place
is not the one where you were born.
Topic 32 Spend money or save them?
Some people say that it is better to enjoy your money as
soon as you earn it while others prefer to save the money
for later. It's a difficult choice faced by lots of people because
of the different attitudes they hold towards money.
As far as I am concerned, I vote for the former choice,
which is that it is better for one to enjoy his or her money
as soon as it is earned. Spending money as soon as possible
is my preference because of three reasons as follows.
First, we can observe easily in the modern society that the
dominant philosophy nowadays is 'enjoy your life when
you are still young'. Most young adults like to work for a
period of time and then go on for a trip to visit some
places they have never been to. Those trips not only
helps them to keep in shape but also provides them different
kinds of knowledge and new perspective in looking
at their environment. Other people spend the money
for their leisure, which helps them to relax and go back
to work with enough energy.
In the old days, it is said that people who save money in a
bank understand the philosophy of thrift. Actually,
economists say that in the modern world saving money in
a bank is the quickest way to lose it. Moreover, none of
the rich people became rich by getting interests from the
bank. Living in a constantly changing world, we should
adjust ourselves to accept the new ways of investing our
money to different areas in order to get the most of it. 
ToeflEssays.com
25
That is probably the reason why most of the people
nowadays put their money into business to get a better
payback.
The third obvious reason why I prefer spending money
rather than saving them is that it is part of the contribution
for the economic growth in our country. If nobody
has the needs to buy stuff from others and the market,
nobody will think about how to produce useful products
and sell them to make the most profits. Some countries
continue to lower the interests in order to force people
to spend their money and therefore benefit the society as
well as the people themselves. In this broad view, I prefer
spending money rather than saving them.
In conclusion, I prefer spending money because it benefits
ourselves as well as people around us. It's also important
for kids to know how to save money as a sense of
thrift. Nevertheless, spending money is still the best way
to make our lives enjoyable and worthwhile.
Topic 33 Jewelry or concert?
People make money for living first and then use the
money for other things that lead them to a happy and
healthy life, such as buying something they like, watching
a movie, or eating a big meal. In my opinion, if I have
received a gift of money, I would like to buy a ticket to a
concert.
For me, music is always attractive. When I have completed
a whole day's study or finished the discussion on
some academic problems, my spirit will be eager to relax
for a while. When people want to relax, it is a wonderful
thing to go to a concert: the music playing on the concert
is the best thing to set your mind free. If you spend the
money to listen to a concert, you will fell that the cost is
valuable.
In addition, you can attend the concert with your friends.
It is a good chance to build up the relationship between
your friends and you. People are always busy with their
work and study, losing many occasions of communicating
with each other, a splendid concert and link us together.
The music, the conductor and all the musicians on the
concert can offer us a common topic; we can discuss
those things together.
Furthermore, listening to a concert let me learn more
about music and all kinds of instruments, it also culture
the appreciatory ability. To think that I spend the money
to buy a piece of jewelry, I can acquire nothing but being
a little bit beautiful at one of my friend's birthday parties.
In that case, I just fell that the money has gone.
Money, even a little money, can make your life more valuable,
for this reason, I prefer to buy a ticket to a concert
than to a piece of jewelry.
Topic 34 Should business never fire people?
In the modern society, people are taking a fresh look at
whether companies should offer employees job security
for their entire lives, since many businesses are now realizing
that job security make employees less motivated to
work and this leads to less profit for the company. Even
though job security also has its own merits, it is becoming
a conspicuous obstacle to develop businesses. Consequently,
after pondering this question on many occasions,
I believe that offering job for entire life is not a
wiser choice for the development of a company and the
society. My arguments for this view are based on the following
points.
The main reason is that job security has an obvious disadvantage
to motivate employees' work attitudes. Further,
it leads to decreased productivity for companies. Workers
who are certain that they can never lose their jobs tend to
work less efficiently. Many government workers are so
indolent that it can take them days and months to complete
a task that should only take a few days to finish.
Moreover, it is not uncommon to walk into a government
office and see employees filing their nails, making personal
calls on the office's telephone, or surfing the Interment
for fun.
The above reason is but one of many factors, in addition
to, for the employees, there is a growing awareness that
job security is not absolutely beneficial. With improvement
of the society, workers are more eager to choose a
better job, because a new job means a higher salary as
well as challenges. Even some career consultants are
starting to recommend that employees should find new
jobs every three to five years.
Admittedly, job security has its own advantages, as a
proverb says, "Everything has two sides." The most extreme
manifestation is the fact that employee represents
an investment because of the number of hours of training
required and the company will continue to have a return
on this investment. However, we have no complete evidence
to agree that businesses should hire employee for
their entire lives.
Generally speaking, taking into account of all these factors,
I do strongly disagree that companies should offer
their employees jobs for entire life. Job security was regarded
as an outmoded way of conducting businesses.
Nevertheless, the temporary professional jobs are proving
to be the most effective way to raise the standard of living
of a country.
Topic 34 Should business never fire people?
Whether businesses should hire employees for their entire
lives is relatively a subject of discussion as hiring employees
for the lifetime increases the level of commitment
and an undying loyalty and gives the feeling of security to
employees whereas hiring new employees brings fresh
blood into an organization.
I personally believe that businesses should hire new employees
from time to time as this process brings new
ideas, new expertise, new motivation, new energy, new
technology, new beliefs, new culture, motivated spirit
and other similar features which is very necessary for an
individual and organization growth.
The inculcation and stirring of fresh blood in an organization
keeps the company/organization/business going towards
achieving more sales and more profits as new employees
are better motivated to take new challenges with
a positive attitude and proactive approach. They embrace 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
26
new culture and offer their values, they bring potential
ideas for the internal and as well as the external employees.
Rejuvenating new employees helps the company
from many perspectives as after certain period of time old
employees becomes less contributing because of the
same monotonous work, same environment, same relationships
and no new challenges and risks to take on.
If you look at all the new multinationals i.e. Microsoft,
HCL, HP, etc., they are achieving stunning annual growth
and profits because their policy is to bring the best in an
organization and keep hiring new employees. Employees
are the back bone of every organization and pumping
fresh blood to it after certain period becomes evitable for
growth.
My advice to all will be to adopt a policy to inculcate
fresh employees from time to time and investing time and
money on them to help them deliver their best and also
to retain some amount of old employees because it is
said “OLD IS GOLD” to get the ship going through hard
times and conquers at last.
Topic 35 Live vs. television broadcast
To many people, attending a live performance, such as a
melodrama, a concert, or a sporting event is so incredibly
attractive that they will go all out to get a ticket, regardless
of the expense or the difficulty involved. But why not
enjoy the performance on television while you can comfortably
lie in your sofa or couch with popcorn at hand?
That is because attending a live performance provides
you with far more enjoyment than watch it on TV.
In a live performance, you will feel that you are in the
company of many friends who are indulged in the same
interest, who can share your sorrow or pleasure or excitement.
This kind of resonance at heart is so rarely
sensed in our daily life that this one reason itself is sufficient
enough for many people to attend a live performance.
While watching it on TV, we certainly find it hard to
feel the emotion sharing, and our loneliness is hardly
mitigated.
Furthermore, attending a live performance gives you a
sense of participation that cannot be replaced by watching
on TV. Live performance is an interaction between
the audience and the performers, and both parts of the
performance decide whether it will be a wonderful one.
In this way, you may lament or laugh, may sob or smile as
you are so influenced by the misfortune or happiness of
the characters. You may fall into the indescribable intoxication
while listen to a favorite piece of music. And correspondingly,
the performers will receive the response of
their audience and act accordingly. So the final success of
the performance results also from the participation and
interaction of the audience, of which you are a member.
With these foregone advantages, we may say that attending
the live performance is definitely much more enjoyable
than TV watching.
Topic 36 A vehicle that changed people's lives
An airplane is a form of transportation that has changed
people's lives. Thanks to the plane, our lives are now
faster, more exciting, and more convenient that before.
You cannot deny that a plane is fast. For example, the
Concorde flies at supersonic speed. A businessman can
leave Paris at 11 a.m. in the morning and arrive in New
York at 8 a.m. the same morning in time for a day's work.
Many business people in Europe will fly to London for a
noon meeting and then return home to Rome or Madrid
for dinner.
It is always exciting to take a plane trip. When you take a
trip by plane, you know that you might cross many time
zones, many oceans, and many countries. When you get
off the plane, you could be in a place that speaks a different
language. A plane is like a magician's trick. You get in
a box and you come out somewhere totally different.
Nothing can beat the convenience of a plane. In the old
days, it might take you days to do what the plane can do
it an hour. Boats, for example, only leave on certain days
of the week and take a long time to get to their destination.
Planes give you the option to leave several times a
day and get you to your destination quickly.
Although other forms of transportation may be more
comfortable, none has changed the way we do business
and live our lives more than the plane. Thanks to the
speed, excitement, and convenience of the planes, our
lives are richer.
Topic 37 Is progress always good?
Is progress always good? Scientific progress brings us
many conveniences and advanced machines, such as
computers, automobiles, and so on. Progress seems to
have made life simpler and more comfortable. But if we
analyze it carefully, we will find that progress is not always
good.
Modern industry brings us many conveniences. But at the
same time, some problems emerge. For example, “the
green-house effect” is a very serious problem that scientists
try to solve. It increases the earth's temperature,
causes icebergs to melt and the ocean level to become
higher and higher. Maybe someday the oceans will swallow
some big cities nearby them.
Progress enhances the efficiency of industrial production,
but it also brings us another serious problem -pollution.
Pollution in some countries is so serious that ecological
balance is damaged and many animals and plants lose
their living environment and become extinct eventually.
The air is polluted and it is not suitable for people. The
water is also polluted and people are facing deficiency of
drinking water.
Progress makes the pace of life faster and faster because
of the application of computers and automatic machines.
People have to work faster than before and it makes them
nervous. More and more physical and psychological
problems disturb people's life. Many people do not have
time for recreation.
From the above statements, it can be concluded that progress
is not always good. It has its own negative influences
on our life. Let hope those problems can be solved
by more progress. 
ToeflEssays.com
27
Topic 38 Is learning about the past useful?
It is often argued that spending much time on studying
history is unreasonable, since the information people
obtain lacks the practical implementation. However, after
careful thought, I have come to disagree with it. I believe
that history provides valuable sources for understanding
different people and societies, predicting future trends
and building a person's identity. History generates past
experiences and formulates the steps of development. It
provides us with numerous examples of “cause-effect”
events, which help to understand different social mechanisms.

Everything that is happening today stems from the past
and will have direct effect on the future. Being aware of
our history helps to avoid old mistakes and make right
decisions. The majority of all the political conflicts have a
long history, for instance the Middle East or RussiaChechnya
tensions. A closer study of their deeper reasons
and the measures taken beforehand can prove to be invaluable
in finding the right solution today. It can save
thousands of lives.
At the same time, studying history of our own country or
region builds up our identity, gives us a feeling of belonging
to a certain group of people. Therefore, if we face a
problem of communicating with a person of other culture,
the basic knowledge of his history can prove absolutely
necessary for a successful and productive interaction.

To sum up, I strongly believe that it is highly beneficial for
modern people to posses a good knowledge of the history,
because it assures a profound understanding of social
mechanisms, helps to avoid many mistakes and promotes
a better communication between different nations.
Topic 38 Is learning about the past useful?
Every country, every nation, even every person has its
own past, present and future. Events from our past reflect
on our present. Events from our present will reflect on
our future. The time-line is unbreakable. Therefore no
one should live only for today isolated from the past or
without any connections to the future.
Every one of us is a member of the society. Living without
learning about our history is the same as building a
house without foundations. Furthermore, everyone is
strongly connected with his past even when he does not
comprehend it thoroughly sometimes.
Our life is a result of a series of events from our past. Our
success today is a consequence of hard work or some
victory in the past. Our present failure is maybe a result
of not taking our chances in time or not making a proper
decision in the past. I truly believe that everyone makes
his own destiny and fate has nothing to do with it.
In my opinion, learning about the past is of great importance
to all of us. Even if we are completely devoured by
our present existence we should look back to the past as
carefully as we can. Thus we can avoid our previous mistakes
or to find an easier way to success. In this case history
is our best teacher. And if we learn the lessons of the
past we will make progress much faster in the present.
We have made our history step-by-step and day-by-day.
Those of us who live only in the present and only for today
are like trees without roots-so easily 'fragile' in a
stormy day. The past is the base on which countries; nations
and communities build their present. That is why I
think learning about the past has really no value because
learning about our history is invaluable.
So let us take a look back to learn a little more about ourselves.

Topic 39 Can new technologies help students?
“With the help of technology students nowadays can
learn more information and learn it more quickly." I
agree with this statement. Technology has helped a student
cross national boundaries, open up new views and
increase the speed at which he imbibes information.
New technology in the form of Internet has helped
breach the limitations of a country's frontiers. A student
sitting in a small town of India can access the latest
course material released by MIT on his topic of interest.
He can gain access to the latest info that his happening in
physics and thus improve his existing warehouse of
knowledge. He can browse through the previous papers
in physics and dwell deeper and deeper in his specialized
study. And how long does this all take? A click of a mouse.
Compare this with searching through the mazes of his
small hometown library, only to find some outdated articles
and consuming a great part of his daily activity.
Technology has helped open up many new avenues that
previously were considered impossible. Take for example
the simple LCD projectors. They give a visual feel of the
subject that the student is studying helping him to learn
not only quickly but also effectively. Or for that matter
video conferencing. A student can ask questions and clear
his lingering doubts when he interacts with a professor
considered as the authority in his field.
An overlooked aspect of technology is the transportation.
With rapid advances in transportation, a student in Japan
does not think twice before signing up for a program in
the US. Would this have been possible 100 years back?
Certainly not.
In concluding I would like to say that technology has
played a major role not only in increasing the speed at
which students learn but also in bringing a radical change
in the way they learn it.
Topic 40 Never, never give up
Continuous exertion may sound very exhausting and
thus, it is understandable even if some people suggest it
should be better to give up sometimes. It is true at some
points because the human race is not almighty creature.
However I would say it is not about giving up, but just
changing a goal. Recognizing life events as a sequence, I
think even when giving up something, it is just adjusting
the goal to more reachable level and processes for previous
goals always play a role in reaching next goal.
In the first place, I would like to emphasize that this is
not only about the youth becoming competent, but also 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
28
about all the people making their own lives more comfortable
and enjoyable. For instance, both following examples
I present can be seen as continuous exertion: a
young person trying to become a professional musician
and a person on the verge of death exercising hands in
order to move them better than the previous day. If their
goals are too high for them, the young person may have
to change it to be working in a related field such as becoming
a commentator, a voice trainer or so, and the dying
person may have to change it to exercise fingers instead
of hands. That is, people naturally keep trying in
any case until the last minute they accept death.
Furthermore, there are also two advantages of indomitable
attitudes. Firstly, some different approaches to a goal
are necessary, other than blind efforts. Such a contrivance
activates brain and makes human beings more alive. I do
not think it is exaggerative to say.
Secondly, this attitude is also important when trying to
achieve something extraordinary, because chances and
right ideas do not always lie all together. Other chances
and ideas never show up if it is given up. Totally different
idea or better chances sometimes appear after groping in
the dark.
There is no doubt about favorable influences of continuous
exertion. Whether agree or disagree with the statement
of this topic, people keep trying by nature and it
does make us alive. When I have no energy left to keep
trying, I simply keep it on my mind so as not to miss any
possibilities. In other words, it is possible to keep trying
even when feeling like giving up.
Topic 40 Never, never give up
To me personally the expression "never, never give up"
sounds pretty optimistic, but not terribly encouraging
anyway. No matter how good this nice piece of advice is,
it would not always be easy to do exactly what it tells you,
that is, to brace up and to keep your head above water no
matter what happens. I am not sure it is worth discussing
whether this happy-go-lucky motto is in the right or in
the wrong. I simply believe that for different people
placed in different situations it may mean totally different
things.
It goes without saying that for some this expression may
sound like their personal life slogan. In my view, category
of people has the whole life planned out for them in advance.
They are very likely to have a set of short-term and
long-term goals and to do their best to achieve them all.
They would work hard, try many different ways to get to
their aim and finally, they would most certainly succeed.
Which at first may seem to be a fairly natural run of things.
Their second favorite expression may be at first you failed,
try, and try again. This is what they do and this is something
they are good at. Sometimes it may also seem that
they are just awfully stubborn and even stupid, not being
able to see that some of their goals are just beyond them.
But they still prefer to try to work for their so-called goals,
regardless. No one wants to be a loser.
At the same time, I have the impression that once in a
while? And quite good once in a while it is? it might be
useful to be able to face up the facts and realize that
some of your goals are too much of a job for you. I don't
think it means being pessimistic, by no means. This can
be called realism though. If you have already tried to do
some particular task a hundred of times and it still didn't
get you anywhere, what's the use of trying? Wouldn't it be
more reasonable to admit the hard truth, rather than to
go on with the same senseless grind for ages? I believe
that this capacity to admit your own failure is a highly
important, but incredibly difficult thing to do.
Anyway, I suppose that giving up is not a part of the human
nature. Because if it were, the rate of suicide will be
incredibly high, because as I understand that is the greatest
giving up ever. But well, things don't happen this way.
So, if you don't succeed, you try again because first of all
you don't have much choice left. If you failed the second
time and the third time and then over and again. You just
realize that you failed. And even if you did fail, what are
you left with? You just have to put up with that and start
getting by it. It's the easiest way, after all. The one many
people go for.
Topic 41 Should land be saved for animals?
In the past, there have been many endangered animals.
Now they are extinct. Does it matter? Has our environment
been affected by their absence? Has the quality of
our own life been changed? The answer to these questions
is "Yes. "
It does matter if we destroy an endangered species habitat
to develop more farmland, housing or industrial parks.
There is a delicate balance of nature. If one small part is
removed, it will affect all the other parts. For example, if
certain trees are cut down, bats will have no place to
roost. If they cannot roost, they cannot breed. If there are
no bats, there will be no animal, or bird to eat certain
insects that plague our crops.
Our environment has been affected by the absence of
certain animals. Certain flowers are pollinated by butterflies
that migrate from Canada to Mexico. Some of the
breeding grounds of these butterflies were destroyed.
Now these flowers are disappearing from certain areas.
We will no longer be able to enjoy their beauty.
The quality of our life has been changed. America used to
be covered with giant trees. Now we have to visit them in
one small park. Rainforests around the world are being
cut down to make room for humans. We will never be
able to see or study this fragile ecosystem.
I would encourage us humans to look for other alternatives
for our farmlands, housing, and industries. We have
alternatives; the animals do not.
Topic 42 An important skill
Success has been an issue broadly discussed and defined
by different approaches. Some say that being successful
means being wealthy. Others associate success with
popularity and power. A third approach would relate success
with social and emotional well-being. So we come to
the questions: “When can be someone considered successful?”
and “What skills make success easier to achieve?"
In order to answer the second question, we should have
a point of view about what success is. I consider that 
ToeflEssays.com
29
someone is really successful when that person is able to
handle and enjoy social relationships. A leader can be
powerful and recognized, but if he is unable to enjoy his
leadership and feels lonely because he cannot establish a
deep friendship, can we really say such leader is successful?
On the other hand, a wealthy person may have all the
possessions money can buy, but again, what if he cannot
manage a marriage or a friendship? This person is likely
to feel lonely and unsatisfied.
Developing social abilities may be a very helpful skill for a
person to learn, in order to be successful in the socialemotional
side of his or her life. One ability to develop
could be effective and assertive communication. Many
misunderstandings and conflicts can be prevented if we
express our ideas clearly and respectfully, and if we learn
to ask for clarification when we feel threatened or offended
by something someone told us. Another ability
could be learning to handle teamwork. We need to learn
to work with others at work, at home, at school, in our
community. Getting into an agreement with our parents,
children, coworkers and friends is a situation that can
become hard to handle sometimes. Dealing with teamwork
can be really helpful. Finally we could add the ability
to deal with conflicts with others and conflicts with
our own wishes or decisions. We will always find obstacles
in our paths; it can be quite useful to know how to
overcome them.
In my opinion, I would define success as being able to
enjoy what you have, what you do and who you deal with
everyday. And to achieve success, you should have skills
that help you handle relationships with your peers. We
are social creatures; we need each other to succeed, and
to enjoy our success.
Topic 42 An important skill
“It is never too late to learn” is an English proverb meaning
that people should never stop learning all his life. In
other words, life is a process of constant learning, which
enables an individual to make continuous progress to
perfect him or her as a human being. Therefore, I deem
the ability to learn is the most important skill of a person
in the world today to achieve any accomplishments.
We are living in an era of knowledge explosion. There are
too many skills to be grasped by a single individual within
a comparatively short period of time. Skills considered
necessary nowadays include English, computer, driving,
etc. It is not very likely for a fresh college graduate to be
proficient in all these skills. The most possible occurrence
is that a person first chooses his field of profession
and then starts to master those required skills in his field.
Thus, I argue that the ability to learn new skills is more
essential than the skills themselves.
Another reason for my avocation for the learning ability is
that if a person is capable of acquiring new knowledge
soon, he must be a smart, trainable and adaptable person
who is what the rapidly developed society needs. In a
society fraught with new difficulties and problems, a
quick-witted person, when faced with them, will come up
with solutions more easily than those who only know
“the skills." That is why I believe the capacity to acquire
knowledge carries more weight than “the knowledge”
itself.
In short, in a time teeming with many unprecedented
events, the problem-solving ability or new knowledgeacquiring
skill is the most crucial one necessary for a person
who wants to be successful.
Topic 42 An important skill
Nowadays people say that we have stepped into “The
Information Age”, therefore computer skills are one of
the most important skills in today's society. Being able to
operate a computer is an advanced technique and can
increase one's work efficiency and simplify many works.
Using a computer can help people do many complex
works. You can calculate a very complex arithmetic problem.
Many arithmetic problems in engineering are too
complex to work out by hands. A computer can do these
works conveniently and easily. You can also look for
some references from a foreign country from a computer
if you login in the Internet. You can save your documents
in some discs on a computer no matter how large they
are and you do not need to take a lot of paper.
Using a computer can increase your work efficiency. With
its help, you can book plane tickets and hotel rooms for a
business trip. You can easily compile your files in a
shorter time and retrieve them whenever you need. If
you are an engineer, you can control machines automatically
with the help of a computer. The products are more
precise than those controlled by hands and the product
efficiency is higher. You can save a lot of time to consider
other things and this is important for your success.
If you can operate a computer, you can sit down in your
own home and control distant work. All you need to do is
pressing some keys. With the help of a computer, your
work can be simplified. You also can use a computer to
communicate with your friends by e-mails and it is
quicker and safer than ordinary means.
There are many other skills a person should learn to be
successful, but I think that being able to operating a computer
is the most important.
Topic 43 Dangerous sport
Have you experienced the fear of bungee jumping? Have
you ever enjoyed the excitement of car racing? Nowadays,
more and more people are attracted to such dangerous
activities, especially the young people. Wondering why?
After thinking about the lifestyle of those people, the reason
goes as follows.
While the world is becoming more and more competitive,
the tasks on each person's shoulders become heavier and
heavier. People's everyday activities are very intense. The
best way to relax and get relieved is to go in for dangerous
activities, because while you are doing something
dangerous, you have to concentrate on it, and you cannot
think about anything else. Hence you relieved all the unhappiness
and the troubles you had in the daily work.
In addition, to take risks and try out new things is one of
human being's basic instincts. People always like to do
something new, especially when something is popular as 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
30
well. According to some statistics, the dangerous activities
are becoming extremely popular among young people. If
you do not try some dangerous activities, people will
think that you are a coward and you are afraid of doing it.
So it is reasonable enough for them to do dangerous
sports to show their braveness.
However, I do not like dangerous activities and I believe
the phenomenon that people are attracted to dangerous
activities is just a whim. After realizing countless disadvantages
of them, people will reconsider about them.
Some safer activities to help people to get relieved will be
developed afterwards.
Topic 44 Travel with a companion vs. travel alone
Traveling is a very pleasant thing. Some people like to
travel with several friends. Other people, however, would
prefer to travel alone. As far as I am concerned, traveling
with my friends is better.
Why do some people like to travel alone? For one thing,
they can experience more freedom. They do not need to
discuss the itinerary of travel with others. He/she can just
go whenever he/she wants. For another, they do not need
to keep an eye on how to get along with friends.
Although there may be one or more advantages to traveling
alone, I insist that traveling with friends is better. In
the first place, the trip will become easy. Traveling is not a
very easy activity. For example, you need to find transportation,
hotels and restaurants in new places. Several
friends can share these tasks so that everyone has a
chance to enjoy the journey.
In the second place, you can get help when you need.
There will be many unexpected things that could happen
during the journey. Such as, someone gets lost, gets sick,
or cannot wake up early for the morning flight. It is very
tough for people to handle these situations by themselves
especially when they travel to a new place. Friends can
give you a hand to overcome all these difficulties. Every
one needs the help from others.
In addition, you can have more fun by traveling with
friends. Enjoying the scenic spots is wonderful, while
traveling on the road is boring. How to spend this boring
time? Talking with friends, playing cards will help.
In conclusion, I prefer to travel with friends rather than
travel alone not only because the trip will be easier with
friends, but also because I can have more fun by with
friends' company.
Topic 45 Get up early vs. stay up late
Some people prefer to get up early in the morning to
start the day's work; while other people like to get up
later in the day to work until late at night. Which option
do you prefer? I would choose to get up early in the
morning. This view is based on the following reasons.
By getting up early in the morning you can enjoy a lot of
good things that the nature offers. You can breath fresh
air, smell aroma of flowers, listen the birds singing in the
morning. What a beautiful world! In the meantime, these
can refresh our brains and quickly get ready for the day's
work. We can immediately concentrate on the work, and
solve the problems with great efficiency. For example,
when I was in senior middle school, I got up early in the
morning everyday to go over my lessons and prepare for
the courses that I would have that day. I found it was so
efficient and I memorized my study material so deeply.
On the contrary, people who get up late and go to bed
late tend to leave all the day's work to the night, and tend
to go to bed until the finish the day's work. This is not a
good living habit and also not an efficiently way of working.

Another reason why I would like to get up early to start a
day's work is because I believe that it is good for our
health. The body's cycle follows the nature: when the sun
rises, it is time to get up; when the moon rises, it is time
to go to bed. Besides, by getting up early we can have
time to do some exercises such as jogging, hiking and
swimming, which will benefit our health. Many statistics
show that most people who live a long life get up early
and go to bed early. While getting up late and go to bed
late violates human biology and therefore will do harm to
the health. And people who get up late never got a
chance to do morning exercises.
In a word, getting up early is a smart choice for people; it
can benefit both people's work and health.
Topic 45 Get up early vs. stay up late
Some people prefer to get up early in the morning and
start the day's work. Others, however, prefer to get up
later in the day and work until late at night. As far as I am
concerned, getting up early is a good habit because it is
good for health, and it is easy for people to take care of
everyday work.
In the first place, everyone knows that getting up early is
a very good habit for our health. You can enjoy the fresh
air in the early morning, and also you can get a good
night's sleep during the quiet midnight. Moreover, if you
get up early, before go to work, you still have enough
time to do some exercises, such as walking, running and
riding the bike. Without doubt, all of the exercises can
help your to stay healthy.
In the second place, it is easy to take care of everyday
work if people get up early. For example, if everyone in
the family gets up early, the wife will have enough time to
prepare the breakfast for the whole family, the children
will have enough time to catch the school bus, the husband
will never forget to change his dirty shirt. Everything
is in order.
Admittedly, some people who work until midnight and
get up later in the day claim that working in the midnight
is more efficient for them and they can concentrate on
their work without distraction. However, the advantages
of getting up early carry more weight than those of getting
up late.
To sum up, from what I have discussed above, we can
safely draw the conclusion that getting up early can benefit
us not only because it is good for our health but also it
is easy for us to take care of everyday work. Therefore, I
prefer to get up early in the morning and start the day's
work. 
ToeflEssays.com
31
Topic 46 Qualities of a good son or daughter
Both sons and daughter are a blessing for the parents. It
is a fact that the strongest and the most sincere love exists
in the relation of the parents and their children.
No child is born good or bad, it is the qualities he adopts
with the passage of time that make him stand good or
bad. A good son or a good daughter would be obedient
to his parents. It is a religious obligation, a social norm
and an indication of refined behaviors and a peaceful
family set up for the children to be obedient to their parents.

Such a son or daughter would be dutiful. He would know
his duties as regards his parents and would always try to
fulfill those in time. In the age when a son or daughter
can earn; they would earn and instead of taking money
from their parents they will try to give them money. This
will make them feel proud and think that they are getting
back for what they had spent on their children.
Not only this good son or a good daughter would be caring
towards his/her parents. It is a fact that as children
grow to their youth, parents start their journey of old age.
And in the old age they demand as much care and attention
as children need when they are very young. It is
obligatory for the children to remain caring, dutiful and
pleasant to their parents and make them feel as part of
family. It is often seen that children start feeling that their
parents in the old age are no more than a burden. This is
a very wrong attitude and in my religion this is strongly
condemned. Instead it is advised that when in the old age,
parents should be taken care of by the children as children
were taken care of in their early age.
A good son or daughter would look after all the needs of
his / her parents. And by no action of his/her will make
them feel as if he/she are fed up of them. Also they will be
respectful to their parents and would always give thought
to their suggestions and would always try to act upon
those. Since the advices given by the parents are the result
of their experiences which children in their arrogance
often ignore. They should think that there is no
alternate to the experience and parents would never give
a bad opinion to their children.
It is a pity that with the passage of time the children don't
give the parents their due rights nor do they look after
them in the right manner. This situation has resulted in
the formation of many old houses where old parents are
trying to pass the remaining days of their lives. they can
not enjoys the joys of their children because their children
don't want to keep them with because of their busy
schedules.
Islam lays a great importance on the respect of parents.
Islam says that Heaven lies under the feet of one's mother.
Like wise there is a great status of father in ISlam too and
one is asked to act upon the advices of their parents always
unless they order him to change his religion.
In our culture too, we see that with the passage of time
the children have developed the habits of not obeying
their parents. This has with the passage of time played a
vital role in weakening the family bonds.
The unit of any society is a home in the very basic perspective.
When the basics would not be strong how can
the building be strong which is developed on those basics.
This is the very same situation in modern societies,
the family bonds are not that strong as they used to be
resulting in the weakness in the society as a whole and a
frustrated youth which can not play its part productively
towards national growth.
Topic 46 Qualities of a good son or daughter
It is commonly known that parents expect to see their
children behaving decently and respectfully. It is extremely
important for parents to provide to their kids a
clear explanation of what is bad and what is good. Hence,
by having parents' support and advices, children could
achieve the important qualities that later their parents
could be proud of. In my opinion, the basic qualities of a
being a good son or daughter have been remaining the
same over years.
The most important quality, I think, is that we should
respect our parents. It was our parents who brought us
into the world and brought us up. They provided us food
and clothes, and send us to schools to be educated. They
tried their bests to make our life happy and comfortable.
Accordingly, it was our responsibility to respect our parents,
including their efforts and opinions. We should not
spend too much money on useless items because the
money comes from parents' hard work. At the same time,
we must listen to the right advices from parents and don't
act according to our own wishes and desires despite the
objection of our parents.
The second quality for a good son or daughter is that we
should take care for our parents when they become old.
Nowadays we have already attended the university, usually
far away from parents. So we should keep in touch
with them by telephone, letter and e-mail, not making
them feel lonely. We may talk about their life at home,
such as their work and their health. In fact every time
when I give a call to my parents, I may feel that the call
bring them happiness. The reason is that not only can
they know that I am doing well, but also they know that
their son cares about his parents.
A good son or daughter should have many merits. From
my point of view, respecting the parents and caring for
them are the most important for everyone. What's more,
these values cannot be changed with the development of
the society because they are the fundamental qualities of
a good son or daughter.
Topic 46 Qualities of a good son or daughter
In Chinese culture, a person who is filial and obedient to
his parents is regarded as a good son. Confucianism, an
ideology that had great effect on the Chinese society,
stresses the importance of harmonious interpersonal relations
between family members, particularly that between
parents and children. Judgment on a man is often
based on his attitude toward his parents.
Confucian classics contain many principles regarding the
"right" conducts people should have to handle the rela-
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
32
tion with their parents. For instance, people in the past
were required to pay respects to their parents everyday in
the morning. Children should follow whatever orders or
instructions their parents issued. A person who was most
respectful to his parents was highly praised and often set
up as a model in the society.
The ancient Chinese thought that there was a connection
between the relations within the family and political institutions
of the country. They extended the formula of administering
a family to social and political affairs. In other
words, the Chinese people ran the country on the principles
based on family life. The emperor was respected by
his subjects as a father was by his children. An official
faithful to his lord was often compared to a son filial to
his father.
However, China has undergone great changes over the
past century. Influenced by western thoughts, the Chinese
people have revised and transformed many traditional
ideologies and ways of thinking. Parents have no
longer had absolute authority over their children. Now
young people may stand on an equal relation with their
parents and they stress more personal freedom and independence.
But the traditional ideology remains to be very
influential, a good son who is respectful to and takes cares
of his parents is considered by others as one of high
moral character.
Topic 47 A large company vs. a small company
Some people show special interest in working for a big
company, while other are more willing to work for small
ones. Of course, every individual has his own opinion
about the strengths and weakness when it comes to serving
in a big firm or a small one; for me, my choice is definitely
to work for a big company.
Now let's use the analysis of "SWOT", which was always
employed in the field of economics to get the problem
solved. Here, S stands for "strengths", W for "weakness",
O for "opportunities" and T for "target".
Working for a big company will have many advantages for
your development in your career, because a big company
usually provides more competitions and it demands its
employees to be self-educated at the very beginning of
becoming one member of the group, or he or she will be
dismissed without hesitation. For as a big company, there
is always a pool of talents waiting for a position to be
filled.
Besides, in a big company, you will deal with different
kinds of people, who are from different provinces or even
different countries, having various education, thus you
will be inevitably influenced by "multi-culture", which is
of great importance to a person with the hope of tailoring
himself to be an international talent.
Finally, in a big company you will be given more opportunities
to be charged up either at home or abroad and
be endowed with more chances to contact with more
elites in the specific field.
When speaking of the weaknesses, every thing is a double-edged
sword. Working for a big company, there might
be little chances for many people to stick out due to the
bulk of talents, but compared with the strengths and the
opportunities mentioned above, it can be ignored.
When it comes to the target, you, as a member of a big
company, will be more likely to motorize your target because
of the plentiful resources including material resources,
as well as human resources.
All that I have said above boils down to the conclusion
that if you are a person who craves for competitions and
desires to be an international or inter-provincial talent,
you should choose the big firms for your future development.

Topic 47 A large company vs. a small company
Each year, millions of students graduate from schools and
join the army of people seeking for jobs. Many of them
aim at getting a position in a large and outstanding company
that often means higher income on average and
good fame. Walking in and out the high buildings in
downtown areas and wearing professional clothes and
attires, those lucky people working in big companies are
admired by others. They are often referred as "white collars"
or even "golden collars" that rank high in the society.
A large company offers many advantages that are helpful
to a person's career development. I am now working in a
company that is one of the largest ones in China and
ranks among Fortune top 500. Our office building is located
at the most prosperous downtown area in the city.
Staff members of our company have higher income than
those of many other companies. In recently years, our
company is aiming at proceeding into the world market
and has established business connections around the
world, which provides us with opportunities to work
abroad. In short, working in a large company may enable
us to gain valuable experience and have broader views in
a competitive environment.
But not everyone is suited to work in large companies.
For those who like to work independently and enjoy
more personal freedom, a small company may be a good
choice. People in a large company may feel stable and be
less likely to be dismissed, but they are also subjected to
many restrictions imposed by the regulations of the company.
A small company may require their employees to
do more comprehensive works and give them more free
choices.
In business, stagnation equals retrogression. Wherever
we work, large or small company, it is essential to work
hard to make progress. In a fast changing society, if we
always stay where we are, we will face the risk of being
surpassed by others.
Topic 48 Why do people work?
When talking about working, some people always complain
a lot about it. They regard working as affliction that
means hardship, vapidity and low earnings. They may
even dream that they can also live a happy life without
working. But as we all know, that won't come true. Everyone
needs to work for many different reasons. I believe
the three most common reasons are to acquire knowledge,
to seek fame and to enjoy life.
In the first place, we work to practice our skills and we 
ToeflEssays.com
33
have to learn many aspects of knowledge to solve the
problems and to overcome difficulties. So working makes
us skillful and effortless. The experiences we learn from
working are the most important wealth. They are the major
sources of wisdom. If we don't work, how can we improve
our intelligence and then how can we expect a
wonderful life?
In the second place, we work to realize our value by producing
large amount of goods and serving others. A
farmer is not a farmer until he plant corps, a teacher is
not a teacher until she teach classes. They all have their
responsibilities and they also win our respects because of
their contributions to the society. That's the meaning of
life, which gives us courage and confidence to exert our
powers to build a happy home.
In addition, we work to keep us healthy. We can communicate
with each other during work. Meanwhile, we are
helped and encouraged. We have to work to relieve our
pressure. When you do something you are very competent
to, you will view it as a kind of entertainment. You
even find joy from them. If we don't work, we will become
torpid and fat.
In conclusion, I believe that working is a tool by which
we can make a key to the gate of knowledge; it is a road
that leads to tomorrow, and it is a prescription that can
keep us fit. All in all, working provides us so much that I
love work.
Topic 48 Why do people work?
Though people work primarily to earn money, there are
some other reasons that they work: enjoyment, honor,
assistance to others, etc. For some people, to work is to
produce something to enjoy themselves and others. Musicians
compose songs and melodies that give pleasure to
listeners. Writers create novels and stories that arise deep
emotions in readers. Painters produce beautiful artistic
works that appeal very much to the people who see them.
But on the other hand, these people, musicians, writers,
and painters, are often beside themselves with joy in their
work. Some people work for honor. Military men devoted
to battles to safeguard the freedom and dignity of themselves
and their nations. In human history, many people
would rather sacrifice their lives than submit to foreign
rules. Sports people contest with each other for the
honor of championship. To get a gold medal in the
Olympic games is a dream cherished by many athletes
around world. There still some other people who work
to help others. It is the responsibilities and duties of doctors
and nurses to relieve the pains and strains of their
patients.
Wherever an accident occurred, we can see the relief
team rescue and give assistance to the people in need.
Teachers, who often referred as "the engineers of human
souls", work to help students not only in their study but
also in their moral progress. No wonder that teachers are
highly respected in a civilized society. Socrates, the ancient
Greek scholar, once said to his disciples, "I eat to
work while others work to eat." Most people work to get
money for a living, but money is not the sole reason for
many to work.
Topic 49 Face-to-face communication
With the rapid growth of high technology, computer, telephone
and other communication tools have become
more and more important in our daily life, so what people
have gradually ignored face-to-face communication.
If I were asked whether face-to-face communication is
better than other forms of communications, such as email,
phone calls or letters, I would choose email and phone
calls. Here I am going to enumerate some reasons to support
my choice.
The main reason is that communication by telephone or
by e-mail is more convenient. There is no need to make
appointment with friends before meetings; all you need
is just to remember their phone numbers or email addresses.
Wherever you are and whenever it will be, communication
is as easy as face-to-face talking. Moreover, it
is more efficient for people to communicate.
Another important reason is that the way people connect
by email can make more friends. I have many friends on
the Internet and we communicate with each other regularly,
so I have gained more information and knowledge
in many other fields.
Last but not least, indirect communication such as emails
and phone calls can avoid direct confrontation and embarrassment.
Sometimes we may not feel comfortable to
borrow something or ask for a favor from our friends,
because we are afraid of being rejected. At this time, an
email or a phone call can be more convenient and can
avoid embarrassment.
If all these factors are contemplated, the advantages of
communication through email or telephone carry more
weight than those of face-to-face communication.
Topic 50 Do same things vs. try new things
When asked about the approaches to life, many people
have the idea that change and new experiences bring us a
meaningful life. However, others take the view that staying
the same and not changing the usual habits is the
better way of the life. In fact both approaches have its
advantages and disadvantages, which are listed as follows.
Some people believe change and new experiences provide
us a meaningful life because when we adapt to the
change and new environments, we must face the difficulties
and try our bests to overcome them. This process not
only builds our personality, but also gives us an exciting
and meaningful life. What's more, the change around us
improves our spirit of adaptation and independence.
They benefit us in competing for survival in the society.
Let us suppose we always stay the same and do not
change the environment. Then if someday we have to
step into another environment, how can we adapt to it?
On the other hand, people who hold an opposite view
consider that sticking to the usual habits is the better way
to life. They point out that the longer you keep the same
habits, the more adaptive you are and you may live comfortably.
They point out that usual changes make you
acquaint with nothing, and then it is impossible for you 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
34
to have a happy life. In order to see this point clearly,
they give us a good example: If you change your environment
every month, you have to always change your
habits and customs. Then how can you live happily?
As far as I am concerned, the advantages of change carry
more weight than those of staying the same because I
need to improve my adaptation. Only in this way, can I
survive in the society.
Topic 50 Do same things vs. try new things
Without Christopher Columbus's global navigation five
hundred years ago, we can never know the existence of
the American continent. Without the first brave man who
tasted the poisonous "love apples" which are called tomatoes
today, we can never have the delicious tomato & pea
soup on our dinner table. And to a person, without jumping
into the water, he can never become an excellent
swimmer. So, when it comes to doing only what you already
do well or trying new things and taking risks, I appreciate
more the latter one.
While, the idea of doing what you have already been
good at is without advantages. Probably, the most reasonable
benefit of this behavior is that, one can make
sure to be successful and never lose face. Success is important.
For example, if you are an employee of a large
competitive company, are you reluctant to drop every
precious promotion opportunity to show your failure to
your department manager? Or will you be tolerant to losing
a job because of an unintentionally tiny error? The
answer is possibly not. And doing the things one has already
done well can also become a protection to a sensitive
self-esteem. This may account for why a considerable
number of people seldom speak a foreign language to the
native speakers.
Nonetheless, pound for pound, I reckon that trying new
things has more advantageous. First of all, there is no
doubt that this is a sufficient way to perfect one a lot. It is
just the failure that points out where he is inadequate
and not developing well. And it is also the experience of
failure that teaches him where to avoid making the same
mistake as before.
Second, a little forward step always leads to a meaningful
important discovery. In science, physicists insist on researching
to explore the unknown mysterious substance
cosmos and chemists seek out new useful materials
through the results of millions of thousands of chemistry
experiments. To some extent, we can say that stop exploring
stop progressing.
Although there may be tremendous risks and masses of
difficulties waiting us on the exploring way, we can really
not stop our forward step. Given the factors I have outlined,
I believe that a person who is full filled with the
courage to try something he doesn't do well is more
likely to overdo himself and enjoy a more and more colorful
world.
Topic 51 Taking risks vs. planning
Once upon time, a man pleaded a piece of land from a
tribe chief. The chief gave the man a pole and told him
that if he could insert the pole in a place from which he
could come back before the sunset, the land between
tribe station and the pole would belong to him. The man
was so greedy that he exhausted to death on the way
back. From this story we can see that although the man
had his goal and action, he had no plan. A good plan is
essential for success. It can quantify the task and make it
possible for a man to arrange his time effectively.
First, by means of planning a man quantifies his task. He
divides his final target into several periodic ones. Thus,
he could average the pressure and see his progress during
each period. A good plan encourages a man to fulfill
his destination positively rather than passively. Actually,
all successful people have their careful plans. For example,
an excellent student must have a study schedule that
include how to learn new knowledge and how to review
old contents; an outstanding businessman needs a rational
marketing plan that defines the best avenues to
reach his target customers and then assigns a reasonable
budget to his efforts. If one could execute his periodic
target successfully every time, he could easily achieve his
ultimate target. More significantly, during this process a
man will acquire a lot of qualities that are essential to
success.
Secondly, the advantage of good planning is that one can
dispose his time and energy more effectively. It occurs
very often in life that one should do a lot of things simultaneously.
To take care of his children, to work, to spend
enough time with his family and friends, only by a careful
planning can a man accomplish his several targets in a
short time.
Let us come back to the former story. If the man were a
coward he would always fear that he could not come
back before the sunset. The answer must be that he got
much less than what he could have. Therefore success, to
some extent, needs risk. But I think a careful plan is more
important because it changes success into a routine and it
helps a man use his time more effectively.
Topic 51 Taking risks vs. planning
According to the words of Salustius “One is a creator of
his own fate." Some people believe that success in life
always comes unexpectedly and that's why it is only due
to taking risks or chances. On the other hand, others are
more inclined to planning their own lives. In my opinion,
planning is the better approach for one who strives for
success in life because it gives him an assurance in his
future success and makes it possible for one to use his
time more efficiently and to be more cautious regarding
the difficulties that may appear on the way to success.
Success in life comes from careful planning and hardworking.
To plan means to pursue some aim and to be
confident that it will come some time inevitably. In this
way, one acquires a bigger faith in his own abilities and
become more urgent in pursuing that aim.
Another important priority of planning is that one can
predict some of the difficulties that may arise during his
work and in this way he can be better prepared for them.
For instance if one desires to gain a better assignment
within his office he must clarify his aim and plan everything
in advance before taking great pains in pursuing it. 
ToeflEssays.com
35
Other advantage of planning is that one can dispose of
his time in the most appropriate way in order to fulfill
everything that is related to his views of success. It occurs
very often in life that one should do a lot of things concomitantly
- to look after his children, to work, to spend
enough time with his dears and relatives, to find time for
rest, etc. Thus only careful planning can make it possible
for one to complete many tasks in a short time.
Of course, both careful planning and mere taking risks
have their strong and weak points but the former is more
likely since it gives one more confidence in future success
in his work, it helps one to overcome every impediment
more easily and use his time in full value.
Topic 51 Careful planning
Gorge Barton, the famous American general in the Second
World War, was well-known for his bold plan and his
ability to grasp chances to strike the enemy in an unexpected
way. However, few people know that Barton was
also very careful with the battle plans, taking into consideration
all the details and making preparation for any sort
of accidents. I think in a modern society success often
comes from taking risks or chances, but careful planning
is vital for us to attain our goals.
No matter what good ideas or big ambition we have, we
need to make careful plans in which every step is to be
considered. Otherwise, these ideas or ambition will remain
"something in the air" which may never be realized.
In China, a person who likes to take risks and is hasty in
making his decisions is often criticized by others as one
who is bold and immature. From early childhood, we are
encouraged to take careful considerations before doing
any thing important.
Confucius, the ancient Chinese scholar, told his disciples
that he would think it over for many times before making
any decision. However, on the other hand, in today's fast
changing world, we should try to find new ways and
come up with new ideas in our work. If we are contented
with what we have and always follow the same routine
everyday, we may face the risk of being surpassed by others.

As an old Chinese saying goes, "a wise man should have a
careful mind as well as a bold spirit." In order to achieve
success, we should not be afraid of taking risks and try to
grasp chances, but at the same time our efforts must be
based on careful planning.
Topic 52 Change to your hometown
Teenagers nowadays live in an environment that is exposed
to high technology. This includes the prevalent
access to the Internet, the use of special gadgets such as
the cellular phone, palm top computers, electrical organizers,
and the like, all of which makes communicating
with each other so much easier. Aside from this, youngsters
like to hang out in clubs where they can dance the
night away and listen to the their favorite music being
played by a live band. This is the missing link in my
hometown province, Balayan, Batangas.
Though Batangas is just a four-hour drive away from the
capital city of the Philippines, which is Manila, it is still
considered a far province. With that, the technology and
the places where young people like could hang out are
very scant. Being a province where the culture is very
much tight and conservative, the old natives of the land
do not like their children being influenced by what they
connote as "urban living." They would still like to have
the peacefulness and the early ways of girls being timid,
shy and quiet type and boys being courteous and gentlemen
in nature. Therefore, any deviation from these
norms would appear to them as major acts of disrespect,
whereby it would reach a point that elder people disgrace
and disown any of their younger relatives who try to lead
a life likened to that of city people. I think openmindedness
should solve this problem. It is just a matter
of acceptance that it is not really too bad and that it does
have some benefits as well.
Take for instance, going to clubs and parties develops
camaraderie and meeting people increases ones circle of
friends. No man is an island. One will never know that
the person he may meet today would help him out in the
future. With this, I think a nice club with a live band, nice
food and drinks would be a place to be for teenagers to
hang out every night. As a compromise, it should not
open until the wee hours of the morning, so the elders
would not see it as so much as detriment to their children.
Putting up Internet cafes would also be good. Having
Internet connections helps province-based people to
keep abreast with current events in the city or even international
news. In this manner, they would not get bored.
They would have a lot of topics to surf about in the
Internet. Mobile telecommunication companies could
also extend their services into to far-off provinces in order
for every cellular phone to have a signal wherever a
user may be. Loss of signal in certain places hinders teens
from going to the provinces since they know they will
have a hard time with communication.
Overall, it all boils down to two things-fun and entertainment.
A certain place, which is not only limited to my
hometown, should develop itself into becoming more
appealing to the youth of today by bringing in things that
could keep up with their level of thinking, with the way
they do things and counteract their very short attention
span.
Topic 52 Change to your hometown
Everything in the universe is in constant change. And everything
needs continual improvement if the ever changing
and increasing demands of humankind are to be met.
If I were ever given the chance to change one important
thing about my hometown, it would be the Internet service.
Needless to say that nothing generally revolutionized
the way we live as the Internet in the past decade.
Thus, an improvement in this vital service would mean an
even more, unheard betterment to the people in my
hometown.
It is said that information is power. True saying indeed! I
can envision how everything in my hometown could improve
dramatically if the Internet service in it were made
free, fast and staying out there like electricity, telephone 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
36
or water all the time. One thing, a fast free and reliable
Internet service could improve the way people work in
my hometown. With this service people in my hometown
do not need to commute to a far place to do their job.
This in turn would mean less traffic jams, spacious work
place, more time for family and recreation and so on.
The way people learn would be another important thing
that a fast, free and reliable Internet service could be useful
for my hometown. People will have the chance to go
through tremendous amount of information resources in
a very small amount of time. This assures a more fulfilled
life for my hometown people.
Since its advent, Internet touched every part of our life. It
in a dazzling way improved the way we do business, learn
and communicate. A change in Internet service implies
good way of living for every one in my hometown.
Topic 53 Is money the most important aspect of a job?
These days, someone may hold the opinion that the most
important aspect of a job is the money a person earns. It
sounds like true, because with a lot of money, one can
live a better life materially. Admittedly, no one can deny
the important role money plays in his daily life. But,
when you take other aspects of a job into consideration,
such as the precious skills and experiences one gains
from that job, the prospect of the job and the social
status, you may doubt: Is money the most important?
Isn't this attitude too narrow? As far as I am concerned, I
don't agree with the statement, I doubt whether it can
bear much analysis.
We live in a big society that is composed of people from
all walks of life. Different jobs have different functions in
this society. For example, the function of cleaners is to
keep the city clean and tidy; the function of soldiers is to
maintain the safety and peace of the society. Maybe they
earn less money than those businessmen, but they still
work heart and soul on their duties. I believe it is the
contributions they make to society that makes them work
that hard!
Now, let's take a close look at the scientists. Some of
them spend their whole lives inventing new things, exploring
the mysterious things and innovating new technology.
The scientists, such as Edison, Einstein and
Madam Curie, will be shining like the stars in everyone's
heart! We can say, it is the spirits they have, contributions
they have made to all human beings, great findings and
inventions they have left to us that makes them giants!
Thanks to them, the society is developing faster and faster.
Can we say what they do is for the sake of money?
Furthermore, if everyone in this society worked only for
money, what can it turn out to be? Severe competitions
may make people become cold-blooded, force them to
use illegal means in order to make profit, or even commit
some crimes. For their own benefits, no one would like
to help others in the same industry. And the relationships
among people might become estranged. To conclude, I
think money cannot be the most important aspect of a
job. Money is not everything! As a saying goes: Money can
buy a house but cannot buy a family, money can buy
blood but cannot buy one's life, money can buy a wife
but cannot buy true love." So, don't stress too much on
the money one earns. In fact there are other highlights of
a job waiting for you to feel, to find.
Topic 54 External appearance
What do you feel when a handsome gentleman or a beautiful
lady passes by? Then how about a fat short person
wearing a dirty shirt? You feel differently? Yes, most people
do. It's very common for people to judge a person by
external appearance, because it's easy and direct, and it's
instinctive. Appearance is a very important aspect of a
person and reflects one's personalities. Sometimes you
can tell the person's characteristics from his appearance.
However, in most cases, you cannot tell exactly what the
person is like just from the external appearance, and ethically,
we should not judge a person just by one glance at
his external appearance.
"Beauty and beast" and "Snow white and seven dwarves"
are two stories that are almost known by everyone. Although
there are fables, there are deep meanings inside
them. What you can learn from them is that people that
are not so good-looking can be very good people internally.
And actually there are tons of examples in reality.
Napoleon is a very short guy, but he was one of the most
famous people in the history. Theodore Roosevelt, former
US president during World War II, is handicapped;
but he is one of the most successful presidents in American
history. So how can you tell about the people from
their external appearance?
Moreover, there are other undeniable facts that show that
a beautiful person may be rotten inside. There are many
prostitutes on the busy streets. It's obviously that they are
very beautiful, but are they really righteous people? A
beautiful appearance is a good thing, but a righteous
heart is more valuable. Finally, as we can see, it's out of
question that we should not judge people just from their
external appearance. The most important standard is
their internal personality.
Topic 54 External appearance
Lincoln, one of the greatest American presidents, was
said to be very bad looking. Once when his rival accused
him to be a "two sided" person, Lincoln replied by saying
to the audience, "If I had another face, would I wear this
one?" Now what we remember about Lincoln is his character,
his deeds, his contribution to the country, no one
would care about what he looked like.
I agree with the title statement because a person's inner
quality is much more important than his external appearances.
Whether a person looks good or bad cannot be
decided by himself. A man's external appearances are
born and generally cannot be changed. But everyone can
improve his inner quality by his own efforts. By reading
books, learning from others and working hard, we can
make progress and achieve success. It was said that Napoleon
was very short, but he was respected and admired
by people as an outstanding military and political leader.
It is the dream of every man to have a pretty wife, yet it is
also widely acknowledged that a beautiful woman does
not necessarily equal a good wife. 
ToeflEssays.com
37
Many men would rather choose a woman with a common
face than a good-looking one. Because they know that the
virtue of a woman is more important than her outer appearance.
A great deal of couples who go hand in hand
for their life attribute their happy marriage to loving the
other's inner quality instead of loving a pretty face. In
business, a boss would never judge his employees by
their external appearances; instead what he concerns
would be their capability, their assiduity, and their performance.
A person with bad appearances but good performance
will more likely be promoted than another one
with good appearances but bad performance.
Above all, if a person has good appearances, he should
not rely on them because he will unlikely achieve success
if he does not work hard. However, on the other hand, if
he looks bad, he should not feel depressed because he
can make others respect him through his own efforts.
Topic 55 Make decision alone
Decision-making is a common phenomenon each one of
us undergoes in our daily life. Its magnitude varies from
trivial issues like choice of a daily wardrobe to making a
crucial corporate decision involving millions of dollars. A
decision may have its implications ranging from a single
person to the entire universe. Hence it is very important
to making a correct decision. But I have a mixed feeling
when it comes to the choice of making a decision collectively
or as a single person. I feel that the decision making
process cannot have its hard and fast rules but has to be
tailor made to suit a situation. Hence a decision may have
to be personally made or in consultation with others as
demanded by the situation.
I would like to analyze the decision-making methodology
in its two ramifications, one involving personal interests
and the other for common issues involving business, political
or environmental significance.
Every person is different and has the rights to make his
own destiny. It is this quality of uniqueness which makes
the mankind so special. We are the best judges when it
comes to making personal decisions, for no one can understand
a person better than himself. There are many
things in life such as selection of a life partner, or choosing
a career that are specific to the taste and likings of an
individual. It is always useful to hear the opinion of our
well-wishers regarding the deciding issue. However the
individual should take final decision after carefully weighing
all options. It not only gives us the self-confidence,
but also institutes the responsibility in us to live by our
decision.
Things are quite different when it comes to decision making
involving business, political or environmental issues.
The decision made in these cases has serious consequences
than that of the personal issues. It puts at stake
the wealth, safety and future of many others directly or
indirectly involved in these issues. It is here the concept
of teamwork, Special knowledge etc come into picture.
When taking decision on a business activity, it is always
better to have a brainstorming session of all the involved
persons to discuss about the issue. It gives the best possible
decision after carefully analyzing all the possibilities,
with the concurrence of the team. Also all the members
involved in the decision-making are clear about their individual
roles in contributing to the success of the decision.

There are some cases, where expert knowledge and experiences
required in taking the decisions. In such cases
one can resort to the help of the experts or the consulting
agencies for the correct solutions. The decision suggested
by the consultants can be expected to be more
suitable, since most decisions suggested by the experts/consultants
are either by scientific methods or
based on a reliable statistical data of the past. Consultants
are available in almost all fields such as engineering, finance,
law, insurance etc to name a few.
Also when it comes to taking decisions that are of international
importance, the governing bodies such as the
United Nations Organization insist on a Veto for decisionmaking.
This method of decision-making ensures that the
decisions are in the interests of the member countries.
Hence going by the above decisions, one can take the
liberty to chose by self when it comes to personal issues.
However when it involves decisions beyond the individual,
one should always be a part of the decision making
team constructively facilitating the decision, which lies in
the best interests of everyone involved.
Topic 56 Arts or environment?
Frankly speaking, both arts and environment are important
to human being. However, if I were the CEO of a
company, I would rather give the money to protect the
environment than to support the arts. Because environment
protection is quite urgent and matters the future of
our globe, while arts is a continuous process to improve
the quality of life.
First of all, environment protection is very urgent. Global
warming is becoming more and more serious. Many
spices are dying, the ice in South Pole is melting, and
many rivers are being contaminated. Now it is time for us
to do something to save our earth and our own future.
Secondly, environment protection is very important for
all, including human being, plants, animals and the Earth.
When I was a little boy, I often played in the river that is
located beside my village. The water was so clean that we
could just drink it directly. There were also many kinds of
fishes in the river. It was such a beautiful place that I often
played for a whole day. Now things are totally different,
the water became brown in color due to pollution
from factories, very few fishes can live there. Those small
children can never enjoy the fun that I once did.
Thirdly, the art is a continuous process to improve the
quality of life, which is not as urgent as environment protection.
In addition, there are many ways by which funds
can be raised for arts, such as exhibitions and auctions of
artistic works. Environment protection needs money
more urgently than arts do.
Although both arts and the environment are important, I
prefer to give the money to support environment protection,
due to the three reasons mentioned above. 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
38
Topic 56 Arts or environment?
Guan zhong, the ancient Chinese politician, once said
that people would know rites and courtesy only after
their granaries were full. By this he meant that people
would first try to improve their living conditions before
they could engage in any artistic activities or improve
their behaviours. The environment is closely related to
people's living conditions. If a company is going to do
something for the people, I would recommend it to give
the money to protect the environment.
With the rapid economic development in recent years,
China is now facing very serious environmental problems.
According some news reports, Yellow River, the "Mother
River" of the Chinese nation that nurtured generations of
Chinese people over the past thousands of years, has
been polluted by industrial wastes and has much less
stream of water at present than in previous times, which
has imposed great problems on the life and work of the
people living along the banks. What these people urgently
need is not artistic works hanging on the walls for
enjoyment but rather clean water for their daily use.
In some areas in China, though people are much wealthier
than before, they live in a much worse environment
due to their negligence of environmental protection in
the process of developing the economy. Several years ago,
I went to a small town in Wenzhou, Zhejiang Province, to
visit some of the chemical plants there that have business
connections with our company. The town was surrounded
by green mountains and there was a river running
across it. What surprised me was that the chemical
plants there had adopted no measures to protect the environment.
Due to the chemical wastes discharged without
any treatment, the river turned into a blue colour and
the mountains looked like men's faces with scars on them.
I wondered that even though the local people had earned
enough money, would their life be happy in such a polluted
environment?
China is still a developing country now. A large proportion
of the population is still leading a poor life. Even in
those areas where the economy has developed to a high
level, the people have to face the environmental problems
that sometimes are detrimental to their health. I
think we can benefit more from investing money into
environmental protection than imputing it in artistic activities.

Topic 57 Serious movies vs. entertaining movies
It makes me sensitively to think of Hollywood place
where movies were first made before World War I. In
those days, Hollywood movie was like a magnet, drawing
ambitious young men and women form all over the
world.
Up till now, there is nothing that can substitute the position
of movies that is the most efficient way to relax us. I
prefer movies designed to make the audience think. As
far as I know, most movies are supposed to be made from
the source material that mirrors a part of the social events.
That means there is another methods to force us to think
about what we have done for our country, what is our
responsibility in the society and so on. In fact what kind
of information we need can be gain from different medias
including television, the Internet, radio, newspapers, especially
from some movies.
Tracing back to my childhood, I like watching the first
work directed by Alfred Hitchcock, Rebecca. So young
though I was, it did make me sunk into contemplation.
Not only did the plot make me a little confused, but also
it really told me the truth that whoever is right or wrong,
no one can live in the shadowy place and everyone must
live his or her own live, enjoy the sunshine belonging to
their own.
A movie worthy thinking about should conquer everything,
including one's heart, which never fade with time
going by, even be possible to change our lives.
Here I can not help siding with the other view, however it
does not mean that we should totally ignore it, this is not
a matter of making an "either-or" judgment. What we
want to clarify here is what is primary and what is secondary.

If permits, a movie primarily designed to make audience
think add some amusement and entertainment, just like
tasting a cup of cappuccino.
Topic 57 Serious movies vs. entertaining movies
This is a very flexible topic to argue upon. Both sides
have their own pros and cons. But I would like to argue
on the fact that the movies are to amuse and entertain the
audience rather than fomenting their emotions and causing
them to think. In the following paragraph, I have supported
my argument with some examples.
Think of a person who has been working the entire day.
When he returns home, he will be completely exhausted
and will start feeling that he leads a very hectic life. At
that situation, if he watches a movie that is full of lively
pranks and jokes, he will be revitalized like a battery that
is being recharged. This is what everyone wants, especially
when they are dejected and doomed.
On the other hand, when a person watches a movie that
is very serious and emotional, it will only increase his
tiredness. He will be having a lot of thoughts in his mind,
like, what to do next? What is my first job when I go to
work tomorrow? What are my assignments tomorrow?
What is my account balance? Among all these numerous
things, when he watches a movie that contains serious
dialects, he will start thinking about those things. This is
not the thing that should have come to his mind.
Moreover, a movie can be made to convey a subject in an
entertaining way rather than in serious ways. This will do
more good for children too. We would have seen many
kids who will be imitating their favorable characters. For
example, the American kids are greatly moved by the cartoon
character called the `Barney`, after seeing which
they try to talk in the same accent and style. So a child
can be molded through their favorite character. The movies
can be made to convey a good moral through their
famous stars, which will inculcate a deep emotion in
them in the right way. On the contrary, when a serious
movie is played to the children, they are left confused
and soporific, and they will neglect it even when there is
a good moral in it. 
ToeflEssays.com
39
Hence, I conclude that, the movies that are filled with
amusement and entertainment will be appreciated by
most of the people of all categories. After all, movies are a
virtual world were impractical things can be put into
practicality and ideology.
Topic 58 Can business do anything to make a profit?
Nowadays, merchants tend to strive for remaining in existence
by all means due to the extensive competition and
burdensome pressures. However, I am always amazed
when I hear that it is necessary for businessman to do
anything possible to make a profit. It may be as highly
laudable and exemplary a thing as it is held to be by
those who are addicted to money.
Apparently, I strongly object to it due to various factors
that weigh heavily against the notion. The foremost reason
is that merchants would be rewarded by nothing but
distrust and even hatred from the customers if they
hardly care about anything but money. It is widely known
that nothing can be compared with the good reputation
of a company, which attracts more upright and loyal customers.
Suppose we are facing the dilemma of which
brand of shampoo to purchase. It is of no surprise if you
decide to take the one produced by P&G or other reputable
large companies. As a result, what assures the buyers
most is the credit of the service suppliers?
Another subtle explanation for my point of view rests on
the fact that various appalling results would in some
cases, be caused by the immoral and even illegal businesses.
It is decent to make profits and receive the repayment
of diligent work and continuous efforts. Nevertheless,
producing unqualified or even deleterious commodities,
which possibly lead to detriments of people's
health or security, is never the sensible method to operate
a company. What impressed me most is the tragedy
happened several months ago in some part of China.
Hundreds of infants died because of the nonnutritive
milk powders produced by some merchantmen without
ethics. Therefore, it is never too rigid to denounce the
immoral and irresponsible behavior. The third point I
would like to mention is that the merchants themselves
would not be reassured to enjoy the property acquired in
improper ways.
In most cases, it is the essential satisfaction of benefiting
the public, rather than the material items, which inspires
people profoundly. What a pleasant thing it would be to
receive repayment of your diligent work and continuous
efforts! On the contrary, few people would go into rapture
even if they possess a mass of wealth earned through
indecent ways. Thus, only by obeying commercial disciplines
could a businessman obtain supreme success and
maximum pleasure.
Taking into all the reasons above into account, it is barely
too arbitrary to conclude that only by descent and good
Intentioned business activities could a company achieve
respectable and decent success.
Topic 59 Get things done
People are different in many aspects. Some people are
always in a hurry to go places and get things done as fast
as they can, while others prefer to take their time and live
a life at a slower pace. Either way is good, but I choose
the first style due to two reasons: extra time and more
chances to do other things.
In the first place, my personality makes me do things fast
and go to places in a hurry. I always keep one thing in
mind: if I save some time, I could do more things. From
my experiences, I used to finish all my homework after
classes in order to have more of my own time at home. I
will read novels or I will do extra exercise for Math or
English. I find it is better to my study, and my life will be
more interesting. This is the major reason that I prefer to
get things done fast.
In the second place, I have many experiences that let me
understand that the faster pace, the better effects. For a
long time, I feel secure at a faster pace, since it will leave
me a chance to go over my work and correct my mistakes.
I think it is useful in many cases especially when writing a
test. And even when I am going to see a movie, I prefer to
get there earlier for a better seat. There are many examples
in daily life that show the advantages of getting
things done fast.
Of course, for those who prefer to take their time, they
will have some good reasons too. But I like to live life at a
faster pace. It is not only because of my personality, but it
also because of my experiences.
Topic 60 Are games important to adults?
Playing games has always been thought to be important
to the development of well-balanced and creative children;
however, what part, if any, it should play in the
lives of adults has never been researched that deeply. I
believe that playing games is every bit as important for
adults as for children. Not only is taking time out to play
games with our children and other adults valuable to
building interpersonal relationships but is also a wonderful
way to release built up tension.
There's nothing my husband enjoys more after a hard day
of work than to come home and play a game of Chess
with someone. This enables him to unwind from the
day's activities and to discuss the highs and lows of the
day in a non-threatening, kick back environment. A close
friend received one of my most memorable wedding gifts,
a Backgammon set. I asked him why in the world he had
given us such a gift. He replied that he felt that an important
aspect of marriage was for a couple to never quit
playing games together. Over the years, as I have come to
purchase and play, with other couples & coworkers,
many games like: Monopoly, Chutes & Ladders, Mastermind,
Dweebs, Geeks, & Weirdos, etc. I can reflect on the
integral part they have played in our weekends and our
"shut-off the T. V. and do something more stimulating"
weeks. They have enriched my life and made it more interesting.
Sadly, many adults forget that games even exist
and have put them away in the cupboards, forgotten until
the grandchildren come over.
All too often, adults get so caught up in working to pay
the bills and keeping up with the "Joneses'" that they neglect
to harness the fun in life; the fun that can be the 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
40
reward of enjoying a relaxing game with another person.
It has been said that "man is that he might have joy" but
all too often we skate through life without much of it.
Playing games allows us to: relax, learn something new
and stimulating, interact with people on a different more
comfortable level, and to enjoy non-threatening competition.
For these reasons, adults should place a higher priority
on playing games in their lives.
Topic 61 Should parents decide for teenagers?
The issue of whether parents or other adult relatives
should make important decisions for their teenage children
arouses much controversy among people with different
perspectives and backgrounds. Some people believe
the statement is legitimate, because children are not
mature and have not enough experiences to determine
the optimal choice. On the other hand, people claim that
no body can control other's life even their parents. People
should be responsible for their own behaviors and
determine their lives. As far as I am concerned, I would
like to refute the former and support the latter. In the
following discussing, I would like to address some evidence
to substantiate my point of view.
In the first place, the most important reason for me to
choose this position is that old teenagers have their own
thoughts and ideas. The fact that the thoughts of children
are not perfect and logical dose not mean their parents
have right to eliminate their decision without considering
the children's intentions. In the era of rapid social and
technological changes leading to increasing life complexity
and psychological displacement, the good decision in
parents' time would be out of data.
In the second place, the job of parents is not to make
decision for their children, but to help them to choose.
In this period of 15 to 18 year-old children, they are always
radical. If their parents make decisions instead of
themselves, they will not obey these decisions. Parents
had better told their kids about their opinions, worries
and experiences as friends. Give much more room for
their kids to think and decide. Respect and believe their
kids will choose the better one and will face the result
directly.
In sum, considering the aforementioned reasons I support
the statement that older teenagers had better make
decisions by themselves. Admittedly, our parents are our
best and most early teacher. They would give us more
important advices to help us choose the best decision.
Topic 62 What do you want most in a friend?
A lot of characteristics make a good friend. However, in
my opinion, having a friend who is intelligent can do you
good in many ways.
An intelligent friend can share your problems and help
you solve them properly. You are overwhelmed with stuff?
He can show you the order to finish them on schedule.
You are having problems with someone? Tell him and he
will find out the appropriate way to satisfy you and the
other friend of yours. Let's imagine you were stuck in an
elevator for instance. You could be very upset and unable
to get out of it. The situation could change dramatically if
you had an intelligent friend beside. He could calm you
down and quickly find the way to rescue you.
An intelligent friend is also a good example for you to
learn from. In fact, you can get a lot of interesting and
invaluable things from this knowledgeable friend. You
can better yourself by learning his unique way of thinking
and handling things. My friend is very intelligent, not
only in his study, but also in his everyday life. He can
solve problems in the way that I can never think of. Having
him my close friend for ages, I have learnt a lot of
things from him that may help me much in my life. He
taught me the way of finding and solving problems, and
even changing unchangeable situations in some intelligent
ways.
Indeed, having an intelligent friend can give you the motivation
to keep on trying to be equal to him. This makes
you become competitive, or emulative in some positive
ways. You may have a thought: "Why could he do that but
couldn't I ?" And you will try your best in order not to be
inferior to your friend. You then will change your old and
conservative way of thinking and doing things, becoming
open-minded to grasp new things and develop your true
potentials.
All of these fabulous things an intelligent friend brings to
you can be a stable basis for a long-lasting friendship.
However, friendship requires a thorough and mutual understanding.
So, you, yourself, also play an important
part to make it last forever, with whoever friends you
have.
Topic 62 What do you want most in a friend?
What is the most important quality in a friend? Is it intelligent,
humorous, or reliable? As far as I am concerned, I
think it is reliable. Among countless factors that influence
the choice, these are three conspicuous aspects as follows.
To me, reliability is the most important quality of a friend.
A friend is person whom we know, like, and trust. We
may know and like a person who is intelligent, or who
has a sense of humor, but we cannot call him a friend
unless he is also faithful and trustworthy. Perhaps we all
know the famous novel by Victor Hugo, Notre-Dame de
Paris, and wish that we had a friend like Quasimodo. Although
he is ugly, the man has a kind heart and a very
loyal nature. He seems dedicated to anyone who will
show him true kindness. Even if someone we know who
does not have a sense of humor, or does not intelligent
enough, he can still be our friend because he is the one
who we can trust.
Another reason is that a friend must be a person whom
we can depend on. He is willing to listen to us, give us
supports, and lend a helping hand to us when we are in
need. "A friend in need is a friend indeed. " A friend is a
person whom we can trust our feelings and inner
thoughts with, and do not fear that he will betray us. It is
hard to imagine that anyone will share his thoughts with
a person who afterwards will spread the content of their
conversation to everyone else in the world.
Of course, intelligent and humorous are also important
qualities of a friend. A friend who is mentally acute can
give us sound judgment and rationality when we face 
ToeflEssays.com
41
problems; a friend who is funny can give us an enjoyable
time, and add spice to our life. But for me, I still think
that the most important quality of a friend is being reliable.

Topic 62 Friends
Friends are as precious as priceless treasures sent by angels.
Every individual are longing for sincere and congenial
friends. Among various virtues that contribute to an
ideal friend, I believe that it is honesty that I value most.
The foremost reason for an honest friend is that I can
always count on him whenever I am involved in some
trouble. As the saying goes? A friend in need is a friend
indeed? Come what may, the loyal friend always gives me
a feeling of security and warmth. What is more, it is my
sincere friend that inspires me and shows me the courage
to carry on. Some so-called friend may draw back in the
case of a serious adversity while the honest friend would
reach out his hands to me, unconditionally and sincerely.
Another subtle explanation is that an honest friend always
laudable and exemplary. It is a great honor and fortune
to own such a convincingly honorable friend and,
definitely, following his step as an honest person is never
too excessive a thing to do. Honesty is, most of us believe,
the indispensable part of a person's valuable
traits/peculiarity. Never can a person achieve many accomplishments
nor have a high prestige without the conspicuous
sparkling quality: honesty. There are numerous
instances closely fit the notion, just like the American
president George Washington. His bravery to be honest
was acknowledged by the story readers and it was of no
accident that he later became one of the greatest American
presidents.
In addition, the third reason I would like to mention is
that a truthful companion points out my shortcomings
and it is definitely a tremendous help for me. Unaware of
the innate defects, I am apt to make the same mistake
again and again unconsciously. Friends, some of who are
more or less sophisticated and artful, are reluctant to rectify
my mistakes in fear of irritating or offending me.
Things would be completely different if I am fortunate
enough to have a truthful friend. By his hearty advice, I
am persuaded to go the right way; by his pertinent blame,
I am able to be free form making repeated mistakes; by
his good intentional warning, I am alert to the conceivable
danger.
All in all, it would not be too hasty to determine that honesty
is the enormously significant virtue of friends. A
genuine friend is, without doubt, always a great helper, a
responsible teacher and furthermore, an instructive advisor.

Topic 63 Are difficult experiences valuable lessons?
Some people argue that most experiences in our lives
that seemed difficult at the time, can later become valuable
experiences. I cannot agree with them more. There
are numerous reasons why I hold confidence on this
opinion, and I would explore only a few primary ones
here.
Difficulties are beneficial to our personal growth. In the
course of our life, we will face numerous difficulties, and
each difficulty will help us grow up, and become a valuable
lesson for the future. A toddler fells off the ground
for many times before he knows how to walk, and a child
learns how to swim after he drinks water in the swimming
pool. In addition, only after we experienced failures,
we know the value of success. We will never appreciate
anything that comes so easy. Difficulties can make us feel
stronger and be more confident for the future obstacles.
Furthermore, difficulties in our work can help us gain
more experience and knowledge. Most of the times we
can gain knowledge and experiences faster through experiencing
difficulties in our life and trying to find a solutions
to the perplexities that we face. There is a famous
saying, "no pain, no gain." For example, when we take on
a new job that we do not have much experience in, the
first few weeks can be extremely painful and we may feel
enormous pressure and difficulties. And we will try our
best to adjust, to learn and to think, how to do this job
better. The more difficulties we feel, the harder we try to
acquire the skills and knowledge to overcome it. Learning
and this stage is extremely efficient and our problemsolving
skills well increase. After we overcome more and
more problems, we can become an experienced worker
in this field and will be able to take on more challenges.
We will never fear that we will face the same kind of problem
again. This means that we have accumulated valuable
experiences for the future.
In a word, a difficult experience is a gift that life gives us.
We should appreciate it and take it as a precious opportunity
to gain knowledge and experience about our study,
work and life.
Topic 63 Are difficult experiences valuable lessons?
No one in the world can escape some kind of difficulties
for perhaps they are given by fate and they will accompany
us for a whole life. Success is one of the most important
life goals for everyone, but every mature human
being has to admit that success will be a blank dream
without difficulties.
From childhood, my parents and teachers told me that
there is no flat and paved road for me and I have to explore
the road by myself. I do not know what are waiting
for me in the unknown future, but what I know is that if I
withdraw without courage to face difficulties, I will never
reach my success. Every time when I met difficulties, I
always felt upset and sometimes I felt so hopeless that I
think the world is closing the door on me; but looking
back afterwards, my life experience always tells me that
what I felt at that time was wrong. Life consists of all
kinds of difficulties and these difficulties are the most
useful lessons given by life.
We bring about most of the difficulties by ourselves. It's a
rule that making mistakes will result in difficulties, and by
dealing with difficulties we will reduce mistakes. I think
that is a process of making progress. At the same time,
difficulties can teach us how to face life and help us to
gain courage. Once you have courage and deal with all
difficulties with a healthy mood, you will really know 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
42
what life is like and to some extend, you have achieve a
kind of success. All in all, difficult is the best teacher for
us.
Topic 64 Self-employed vs. employed
There are many advantages for people to work for themselves
and have their own business. For example, you do
not need to worry about getting up too late for work; you
do not need to worry about the relationship between you
and your boss; you may go to work at any time you want,
because you are the boss of your own business. You may
lead a more spontaneous and free life. In spite of this,
personally, I would like to work for someone else.
No matter what kind of business you own, a domestic or
international company, or a small one like a snack shop,
you have to take care of many things such as a license,
rent, your employees, your competitors, product marketing,
even the weather if you own an umbrella shop.
That is what I do not like. I do not like a complicated life.
I am just a normal female who hasn't much ambition either
in my life or in my career. I am used to having a simple
life, a regular life with discipline, without much risk.
What is most important for me, besides work, is that I can
still have free time for things I enjoy doing, and do not
need to think about business all the time. For me, being a
business owner might have too much risk and stress.
Of course, being an employee, you are subject to discipline,
and pay attention to your boss, but that's a part of
life, just like for others, paying attention to their own
business, earning a lot of money, and having risk are
parts of their lives.
In a phrase, I would rather work for someone else. I just
want to have my own simple and regular life!
Topic 64 Self-employed vs. employed
My friends and I always talk about our jobs. Whether to
work for ourselves, own a business or work for an employer
is one of the hot topics we discuss. Some prefer to
work for themselves or own a business. While others prefer
to work for an employer. As far as I am concerned, I
would like to work for myself. My arguments for this
point are listed as follows.
First of all, perhaps one disadvantage to work for others
is that we could not plan our time freely. We have to
work from 8 to 5 according to the employer's schedule.
No matter what the weather is like and no matter
whether it is necessary, we have to go to our office on
time. We have no choice but to obey the rules set by the
employer. Suppose we work for ourselves, we could decide
our own timetable. We could find the best time for
us to work and improve the work efficiency.
Another reason for my inclination for working for ourselves
is that we earn what we deserve. Our wages would
be very clear to us. We know what we should earn. That's
fair and we would work harder to get better result. However,
when we work for others, the boss decides what we
earn. It often occurs that we get less than we could earn.
In addition, working for ourselves, we try our best in our
work to reach our goal, thus we would be faster to succeed
in life. If we work for others, the enthusiasm to
work may not be so high. I heard many enterprisers who
work for themselves succeed earlier than people of the
same age.
In a word, in spite of the fact that there may be a couple
of disadvantages to work for ourselves, I feel that the advantages
are more obvious, that is we could plan our
time for work more freely, earn the amount of money
that we deserve and get early success in life. Taking into
account of all these factors, I would choose to work for
myself.
management skills accumulated for years. I would also
benefit greatly from its various valuable training programs.
With the help like that I can avoid many unnecessary trials
and failures that may be involved in my own business
path.
Another positive aspect of working for someone else lies
in the development of my broader social contact network.
As I just step into adult society, I am still timid and lack of
communication skills. Working for others will offer me
opportunities to get access to all kinds of clients, customers,
and employers. Undoubtedly, adequate exposure to
them will teach me how to communicate with one another,
how to deal with socializing problems, and how to
establish my own personal social network.
Moreover, working for an employer, to some extent, can
build up nice personalities that are essential for my future
career. As we all understand, management knowledge
itself does not lead to success without a combination of
broad social network and nice personality. Working with
colleague helps me to cultivate nice dispositionscooperative,
responsible, caring for others, outgoing, etc.
All in all, working for an employer suits my situation perfectly.
Therefore, from what has been discussed above, I
would rather choose to be an employee and prepare myself
in all fields, if possible, for my future self-employed.
Topic 65 Should a city preserve its historic buildings?
The issue here is whether old, historic buildings in a city
should be preserved or replaced by modern buildings. In
my opinion, buildings of historical value should definitely
be protected rather than destroyed. I base my point of
view on following reasons.
Firstly, each historical building is precious property of
human being. Like an antic, the value of an old building
cannot be measured by money. We will lose those valuable
historical buildings permanently if we don't preserve
them. Once a historical building is destroyed, we can
never restore it; even if it is restored to its original look,
the new building is only a fake replica; the historical
value will never come back to us.
Secondly, a historic building always represents history
and has educational functions. Each one of them can tell
us a story. For example, some buildings are evidences of
foreign invasion, others are signs of various religions existed
in past decades. People nowadays can always obtain
historic or cultural information through visiting these old
buildings and sites. Although we can learn the past from
books, pictures and by visiting museums, nothing can
compare with the actual historical buildings themselves, 
ToeflEssays.com
43
which can bring vivid educational material to us.
Thirdly, historical buildings are a symbol of a city and a
valuable tourist resource; therefore a city cannot go
without historical buildings. Beijing is represented by the
Forbidden City, the Summer Palace, which are all historical
relics. It is hard to imagine that someday the City of
Beijing decides that all these buildings should be destroyed
and modern buildings be built on their sites. Because
those historical relics and buildings are too important
to the city and can generate profound tourist income.
A city will benefit more by protecting its historic buildings
than by replacing them with modern buildings.
For all reasons given above, I will strongly suggest a city
municipal should preserve the old, historic buildings.
Topic 65 Should a city preserve its historic buildings?
Every culture has its special features. Buildings, as symbol
of architectural heritage, are an important part of the history
of any country or city. Moreover, they could help us
find the answers of many questions about the historical
development of our society. Therefore, I truly believe
that every city-administration should try to preserve the
old, historic buildings.
All over the world many buildings are preserved in their
authentic appearances. Furthermore, many of them have
unique constructions and are really beautiful and impressive.
In my opinion, the destruction of such remarkable
pieces of architecture and their replacement with modern
buildings can be called ‘barbarity’. Therefore, a lot of old
buildings belonging to the historical heritage of the world
are protected by UNESCO.
It is a fact that cities, which have their old, historic buildings,
are favorite places for holiday and tourism. The reason
is that these cities keep their special atmosphere and
could offer us a magnificent journey through their cultural
and architectural history.
The only reasonable argument to destroy some historic
buildings and replace them with modern ones, is when
there is a risk of self-destruction, which could endanger
human lives. But again the safety standard can be
achieved by renovation or restoration of old buildings.
In conclusion I would say that preserving old, historic
buildings could be considered as a sign of our respect
and regard to the previous generations. I am aware that it
is an expensive initiative. But who can evaluate the worth
the historic buildings have, for those who will come after
us. And I would dare to ask – who gives us the right to
destroy what the centuries have kept for us? And I would
answer `Nobody`!
Topic 66 Are classmates a more important influence?
I strongly agree that classmates are more influential to a
child's success at school than parents. This I support with
the following reasons.
A child spends so much time with his classmates at school.
They study together, play together, and write exams together.
Psychologists agree that during their first years at
school, children are more influenced by their classmates
on their emotional and mental growth.
In addition, a child has nothing to hide with his classmates
in terms of academic performance. For instance, a
child who does a bad job in a math exam will be revealed
on his grades; a child who wins the first prize in oral debate
contest will be rewarded before the whole group of
students. So his classmates know both his good and bad
sides. However, It is easier for a child to conceal something
to his parents while describing his conduct at
school--often limit to those good points.
Finally, classmates are of similar age with a child. They
share so many interests in common. So a child is more
attracted by his classmates' activities. If he is in a group of
children who are interested in creative activities, he will
more likely to think of inventing something. So classmates
are very helpful in a child's success at school.
From the above discussed, I agree that classmates will
influence a child more in his success because they spend
more time together, they understand him better than his
parents, and they have so much common interests together.

Topic 66 Are classmates a more important influence?
Children's success at school depends on a lot of factors,
excellent classmates, qualified teachers, good parenting
and so on. Among all the factors, classmates play an important
role in determining children's success.
First, classmates are a great help in the academic studies
of our children. Children spend most of their time at
school with their classmates, sharing learning experiences
among each other. No only are they competitors, but also
they are learning pals as well. When someone face difficulties
in the learning process, he can seek immediate
help from his classmates especially when teachers are not
available at that moment. In some cases when courses
relating to language teaching demand that students practice
speaking in groups, cooperative classmates will be a
great assistance to achieving the goal of effective learning.
Second, children acquire communication skills during
their encounter with their classmates. Children who are
able to establish good relationships with their classmates
are more likely to achieve in their future career. Since a
classroom consists of a group of people including teachers
and students, they are just like a small society. If children
can deal with everything appropriately with their
schoolmates at school, they are more likely to keep good
terms with their colleagues in the future workplace. A
Good relation with others is part of their success.
Finally, children have also obtained a great deal of life
experience from their classmates. Being of the same age,
children are easier to communicate with their generation
than with their parents. As a result, they learn more from
their counterparts than from their parents.
From those reasons, we can safely conclude that classmates
are too important a factor to ignore and they are a
more important influence than parents on children' success
at school. 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
44
Topic 67 Inexperienced or experienced workers?
When it comes to whether an employer should hire workers
with less experiences and lower pay, or to hire experienced
workers with a higher salary, since there are
always advantages and disadvantages of the two, and
there are always different situations, my personal option
is that different strategy should be applied for different
situations.
For situations where basic and simple jobs which requires
less training, and cutting down cost is vital for the survival
of the business, I would prefer to hire someone who
has less experience and willing to work under a lower
pay. For example, a factory should hire more inexperienced
laborers to work on the part of the plant where
less skill but more physical strength is needed; and a restaurant
owner should hire a cheaper kitchen hand rather
than more chefs to cut down the cost of operation.
On the other hand, for situations when more knowledge
and skills is crucial for a job, I would tend to hire someone
who is more experienced and would rather pay more
salary. Training an inexperienced person for an advanced
position can cost a great deal of money, and a mistake an
inexperienced makes sometimes can bring disaster to a
company. Therefore an experienced personnel is a valuable
asset for a business. Sometimes the value cannot be
measured by money. A company may lost millions of dollars
of revenue when some important positions are vacant
and it has to look for someone who is qualified or
take a lot of time to train a new person.
In conclusion, when we decide whether to hire a inexperienced,
cheaper worker or an experienced, but more
expensive worker, it is always depend on the nature of
the business and the position, the amount of training
required, and of course, the employers' personal preferences.

Topic 67 Inexperienced or experienced workers?
To hire an inexperienced worker at a lower salary or an
experienced worker at a higher salary, this is an interesting
question for an employer. As far as I am concerned, a
good employer will choose the latter without hesitation,
because he knows an experienced worker deserves what
he is paid.
Qualified workers play the most important role in any
business. The directors controls the business, the managers
operate the business, whereas, it is nobody else but
the workers who are expected and responsible to produce
qualified products. Without those products the
business will be a castle in the air. Thus qualified workers
are indispensable for an employer.
What makes a qualified worker? Undoubtedly, experience
is one of the most valued merits. Experience means quality
and efficiency; both of which guarantee a well-run
business. It is true that the employer has to pay more for
an experienced worker, but what such a worker brings to
the employer is much more than he is paid.
Admittedly, no one is born to be an experienced worker.
A rookie is inevitably a rookie at his debut, and he needs
opportunity to obtain the required experiences. Hence
there must be some employers who are willing to provider
them with such opportunities.
In a word, for an employer, it is profitable to hire an experienced
worker at a higher salary than to an inexperienced
one at a lower salary. However, some wise employer
may want to hire inexperienced workers with potential.

Topic 68 Is daily homework necessary?
There is much controversy about the necessity of daily
homework for students. Some say homework is necessary
since practice makes perfect, while others disagree because
they believe a student should have the freedom to
study whatever in whatever forms just as he/she likes to.
In my opinion, daily homework is necessary for students.
First, a teacher could assign homework as a measure for
the students to study. A student needs guidance from a
teacher because he/she does not have an overall understanding
of the knowledge he is going to study from the
teacher. This means, at the beginning, a student could
not well plan his/her study, just as a kid who is for the
first time in a swimming pool could do nothing but to
play with water. A teacher could make a good study plan
for him/her, so that he/she could learn efficiently.
Secondly, even when a student has already understand
what he/she should do in order to master some skill or
knowledge, he/she is still unwilling to do this for the lack
of motivation. Hey, do not tell me that you have never
been lazy at all when you were young. Some homework
could function as a task for the student to perform which
is helpful to motivate him/her.
Thirdly, homework is an important form of feedback for a
teacher to understand the effectively of his/her teacher. As
I have mentioned before, a teacher makes a study plan
for the students; but does it really work? Or does it work
for all the students? It's not difficult to know this only if
the teacher pays some attention to the homework of the
students. Then he/she may be able to find if there's some
problems in his/her teaching, and make corresponding
adjustment of his/her teaching, either for all the students
or for a single one. Without some feedback, it is impossible
for the teacher to do this. A test is also a good form of
feedback, but obviously one or two tests are not enough,
and sometimes this kind of feedback just comes to late.
However, This conclusion might be misleading that one
may believe all forms of homework are necessary. Actually,
only proper amount of homework in proper forms is
acceptable; some homework may not only fail to help the
students, but on contrary bore them, so much so that
they may lose their innate interest to study. "Proper"
homework, in my opinion, should vary in its forms; it
might be some extensive reading, a paper, or even just a
game, as well as other ordinary exercises. And it should
leave enough freedom to the students so that they could
do things they really like to do with self-motivation,
rather than unwillingness. We should always remember
that homework is something for us to guide the students,
rather than drive them. Only if a teacher keeps this in
his/her mind, the homework could be of most help to the
students. 
ToeflEssays.com
45
Topic 68 Is daily homework necessary?
Most students in this world struggle daily with their
homework. Many teachers believe that daily homework is
the key to education and school success. I agree with this
opinion. Here are my reasons.
First, daily homework can reinforce the knowledge students
learned at school. A student cannot concentrate
every minute, and remember everything that a teacher
taught in class. Daily homework is the best way for students
to review what he learned during the day, study on
the problems that he does not understand, and prepare
for the next day's work.
Second, daily homework is the bases of success in exams.
This is especially true for those students who are not so
bright, and the only way to succeed at school is doing
homework each day. Whenever the homework flags, the
class behavior dips, the learning is muddled, and the
grades take a nosedive. No matter what the ability of a
student is, daily homework is the key to students' school
success.
Third, daily homework can help students develop good
learning habits. Learning is not always an enjoyable experience
and students always need to spend hard time on
it. Daily homework can form a kind of habit of learning
for students. Once a habit is formed, learning is not such
a painful thing and a student can find it more and more
interesting. Obviously this will greatly benefit to a student.
In conclusion, daily homework is crucial to students' success.
Life requires us to keep learning in order to catch
on with this fast pacing society. A good learning habit and
method that we developed when we are students can
benefit us for the rest of our life.
Topic 69 What subject will you study?
If I could study a subject that I have never had opportunity
to study, I would choose to study how to use the
Internet. There are a lot of advantages that the Internet
can bring to us. For example, it can get us informed
timely, expose us to a lot of chances of knowing other
peoples and their cultures, and help us obtain the materials
for our studies conveniently. If I know how to use it,
I can take the advantages of it.
The Internet can get me informed timely. There is always
a lot of news on the Internet that is broadcasting 24
hours everyday and updating timely. I can read the headlines,
the financial news, the sports news, and the
weather reports every time when I connect my phone
modem with my computer. From reading the news on the
Internet, I can know everything happening around me. It
is very important for me to deal with my daily life with
this information. It gives me a lot of chance to know different
people. I can know what they are thinking about
and how they are living their lives. The World Wide Web
includes every country's information. I can travel internationally
on the net without going out of my house. That is
helpful since people in the world should understand
each other to make sure that we could live together
peacefully.
The Internet gives me the convenience of getting almost
any useful materials for my study. I can just type a few
letters and click the search engine to get them. I can do
them in the early morning in my pajama while having my
breakfast at the same time. Nothing could be more convenient
than the Internet in doing research work like this.
In short, if I could choose one subject to study, I would
definitely choose to study the Internet for its timely updating
news and its convenience. I would also like to
travel to new worlds and meet other different peoples.
That will be really helpful for me to live a life successfully.
Topic 69 What subject will you study?
There are so many subjects that I wanted to take while I
have a student but I never had the opportunity to. The
most, I wish I would have taken a course in cultural management.
Most likely, one day I will follow my desire and
enroll probably in a MA program in cultural management.
Why pursue a cultural management program? Firstly, a
program as such is relevant for my future career as an art
historian. It would be essential for my intellectual development
to learn how to organize effectively an exhibition,
a cultural study trip, or any other type of cultural activity.
Moreover, a MA in cultural management would provide
me with the theoretical and practical skill I will need in
order to contribute substantially to the Romanian cultural
development. My country needs cultural managers, but
they hardly exist. There are no schools to teach cultural
management, and one can hardly find a person to have a
proper training in this particular type of management.
On the personal level, I strongly believe that such a
course would be of great benefit to me. Like any other
management class it will help me organize myself better,
and thus gain much time and much confidence in myself.
Overall, a cultural management program would be quite
beneficial form my personal and academic development.
I know that by studying this field not only I would improve
my life, but also I will be able to contribute to the
revival of my country's culture development. This is why I
would choose to study cultural management.
Topic 70 Have automobiles improved modern life?
Since the first automobile was introduced to our life,
there are a lot of changes happened around us. As a
modern transportation, it not only brings convenience to
our daily life, but also enhances the efficiency.
One of advantages of using automobiles is that it can give
the users much more convenience compared with other
transportations, such as bikes or buss. For me, I like to go
to the supermarket once per week and normally buy
many foods at one time. Can you imagine that I need to
carry a lot of foodstuff and maybe take a crowded bus to
reach home? How inconvenient it is! Suppose that I have
a car, and then I will feel very easy because what I need to
do is to put all my stuff at the back of the car. I can go
back with nice music and happy mood for the shopping.
On the other hand, automobiles can save our time and
energy. Driving the automobile, we can go wherever we
want to go. We can decide the destination and reach 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
46
there faster than other transportation means. Assuming
that a train takes about two hours to reach Suzhou from
Shanghai, but a car only needs about one hour. We can
use the saved one hour to enjoy the views or do anything
that we want. After all, time means a lot to modern people.
It can mean money to businessmen, knowledge to
school students and profit to companies. By means of
cutting time with the help of automobiles, we can increase
the efficiency of our society.
Of course, I must admit that automobiles bring a lot of
problems such as traffic jam and air pollution. But these
outcomes cannot be avoided during the development of
a society. I believe we will have a better solution to solve
all these problems.
Generally speaking, I would like to say automobiles have
improved modern life through providing more convenience
to people and increasing efficiency. We should encourage
the society to support the automobile industry
and develop different kinds of automobiles to meet various
needs.
Topic 70 Have automobiles improved modern life?
When Henry Ford manufactured the first automobile, he
didn't realize how he would affect our life. Now expanding
road systems and thousands of automobiles are playing
an important role in our society. But every thing has
two aspects. Some people think that the automobile has
improved modern life. Others think that the automobile
has caused serious problems.
The automobile has a very close relation with industrialization.
It is a part of industry itself. Industrialization is a
symbol of a modern society. Automobiles carry all kinds
of goods and people from one place to another. They
function as human's blood. Without automobiles our
country would return to a completely agricultural society.
No one likes to live without modern conveniences such
as electricity, cars and so on. It is sure that the automobile
brings convenience.
But automobiles also bring some troubles. Each year
many people are injured in traffic accidents. Another serious
problem is pollution. Thousands running automobiles
emit poisonous smokes. Their motors and sirens
give out deafening sound. All these are harmful to our
environment.
How can we deal with it? Stop using automobiles? It is
not realistic. We should design better automobiles. It
gives off less gas and runs more quietly. We should build
wider roads and obey traffic rules. All problems are cause
by human beings. We certainly can resolve them by ourselves.

Topic 70 Have automobiles improved modern life?
It is a well-established fact that automobiles have contributed
to the modern life in a favorable way. Automobiles
improved different aspects of the human life, but, on the
other face of the coin, cars have their crucial impacts
upon our life. It is our turn to minimize these defects and
galvanize other favorable sides. Hereinafter, I will present
and analyze this issue and provide a personal perspective.
The automobile is considered amongst the most beneficial
inventions that ever existed. These means of transportation
provide unprecedented mobility, flexibility, and
privacy. Cars have abridged the travel time among distant
locations and provided a self-scheduled means of transportation.
A car user is not obliged to obey any predetermined
departure and arrival schedules, barring engine
check and fuel filling.
Moreover, the car represents an elastic means of freight
transportation. Automobiles allowed more goods and
products to reach remote areas or locations that lie far
from public transient system. Also, this rendered products
less prices based on less transportation cost as well
as more pervasiveness.
Admittedly, services like mail and tourism benefited intimately
from the automobiles. Taxi added to the diversity
of flexible and on-order mean of transportation. Also,
special services like home delivery could have been too
slow or even not existing without cars. Adds to the favor
that many are interested in racing or rallies that represent
car-based sports.
On the other side of the fence, automobiles contributed
to the aggravating environmental conflicts. Car exhausts
that contain compounds like carbon monoxide dioxide,
nitrous and sulphoric ions threaten the public health as
well as the environment. Phenomena like acidic rains and
green house effect more or less are correlated to automobiles
exhausts. Moreover, automobiles are considered
expensive mean of transportation, especially with their
close relation to roads and asphalt industry.
Another disadvantage is the intruding of some new habits
like car captivity. It was found that some persons are biased
to car usage even if it is more expensive, slower, or
liable for traffic problems. Car captivity is considered intimately
related to obesity and heart diseases. Moreover,
increasing car ownership introduced traffic conflicts like
congestions and delays. Imprudent driving habits leads
the way for fatal car accidents, and it is extremely impressive
to know that accidents victims exceeds the number
of second war casualties.
Ultimately, automobile, is a double-bladed weapon. Alleviating
automobiles disadvantages like producing cleaner
fuel, unleaded petroleum, natural gas, or even electrically
driven engines as well as improving the public transportation
system should absorb these impairments. We must
also anneal the merits by introducing articulate traffic
control systems, improving the quality of pavements and
other favorable aspects.
Topic 71 A high-paying job vs. quality spare time
Some people may prefer to have a lower-paying job as
long as the job asks for shorter working hours so they can
have more free time spending with their friends and family.
However, I would rather be given a higher-paying job
with longer hours, even if I would have little time with
my friends and family. I do not much care about the free
time nowadays; I really care about money. Besides, all my
friends and my family members are usually busy working.
Furthermore, if I do not earn a lot of money, I cannot
spend my free time with my friends and family happily.
I really care about money because my budget is too tight 
ToeflEssays.com
47
nowadays. I am so poor a student. The tuition is high,
but I have to pay for it. I also have to pay my rentals of
room and pay the board. I have to pay the transportation
fares, the books, the clothes and a lot of daily supplies.
All these seem to be a heavy financial burden to me. So, I
have to look for a job that could offer me a higher salary.
My friends and my family members are all very busy all
day long. Some of them are busy working; others are
busy studying. They are usually having little free time to
spend with friends and family, including me. If I were
given a shorter hours job and more free time, I could not
meet them anyway.
Besides, even if my friends and I have managed to find
out some leisure time to spend together, if I have not
enough money, where the fun will be? Any meeting or
party costs a fortune, even the simplest picnic. If we have
no money to spend for our gathering, we have to just sit
over there and chat. We will feel boring soon. Knowing
this, I am eager for a higher-paying job so that I can get
the money ready for the meetings in the future.
For all these reasons, I would like to have a higher-paying
job to support myself and earn enough money to meet
my busy friends and family sometime later. Although this
job cannot offer me more time to spend with my friends
and family now, I believe that I will compensate it after I
have become some kind of millionaire in the future.
Topic 72 Does grades encourage students to learn?
A lot of people claim that marks in tests encourage students
to learn. I agree with this statement, because examinations
are a good way for a student to review what
he/she has learned; test scores are a standard measurement
for students' learning ability and knowledge level;
and the test system can benefit students' future.
First of all, tests are important for students' learning. Attending
classes is not enough for students to learn the
subjects no matter how carefully they listen to what the
teachers say. They need examinations to review the lessons.
In most cases, grades or marks are the only means
by which teachers measure students' learning ability and
learning progress. Grades encourage students to study
for examinations, and it is a good system for students to
learn.
Secondly, test scores are a standard measurement for
students' learning ability and knowledge level. Most people
would agree with this, therefore universities all over
the world take test results as a standard measurement to
give admission to new students, to offer fellowships, and
to decide whether to grant a student graduation. High
school teachers use test results as a means to evaluate the
effects of teaching, and students' learning progress. By
test scores, teachers also know each individual student's
ability to learn.
Thirdly, test results can stimulate a student to work hard
on his courses. The testing mechanism encourages students
to work hard in order to achieve a better result;
they will devote more time on study, and develop a
"never give up" spirit. This will not only benefit their
study, but also teach them a truth, that everyone needs
constant learning and hard working in order to be useful
to this society. Students who have developed such learning
habit and never give up nature will not only have
good performance at schools, but can also superior to
others in other aspects; for example, such natures are
important factors even after finishing schools. I believe
most students understand the importance of these qualities
and impacts on their life; therefore they know how
important it is to work hard and try to achieve a better
score.
In conclusion, marks can stimulate student to learn, and
good marks can give them advantages in going to a good
university and finding a good job. Therefore I strongly
support the statement that marks can encourage students
to learn.
Topic 72 Does grades encourage students to learn?
Almost in every modern society, grades play an import
role in assessing students' academic ability. There are all
kinds of tests to winnow out weak students. Knowledge
itself is so complicate and vast, each one of the test usually
cannot cover every aspect of it. So I wonder whether
grades can really encourage students to learn.
The basic reason why I disapprove of the title statement
lies in the belief that grades usually do not have positive
impact on student who is strong or weak alike. Take the
example of a student who has high grades: if Tom gets
good grades in the class, normally he will feel conceited.
This situation certainly will not lead him into finding
some blind spots or weak points in his study. And he will
not realize that may be just his photographic memory
helps him a lot or this kind of test suits him well. Let us
look at another example: suppose Johnny is so not good
at memorization, but he works very hard. Unfortunately,
he got poor grades in tests that facilitate memorization.
One can foresee what harm will bring to him due to the
poor grades. In these cases, grades play a negative role in
encouraging students to learn.
Most important of all, the grades are usually a convenient
way of assessing a student's academic ability. But it is by
no means a scientific one. Teachers cannot determine
from the grades whether the student is hardworking (diligent)
or out of cram. Given tests to all students regardless
of their individual characters and traits, is just like
forcing everyone to wear shoes of the same size. The Famous
educationist Confucius said two thousands years
ago: "teaching students in accordance with their aptitude."
Our world is a colorful world, so should our educational
system be.
Grades, especially poor grades will frustrate potentially
successful students to learn. It will give them a false impression
that their intelligence may be inferior to other
students. The worst thing about poor grades is that it may
have repercussions in an underachiever's heart when all
his fellow students and teacher have long forgotten. In
fact, the potential talent of a student will be strangled by
those poor grades - a real pity to the student and the society.

Last but not the least, there is some advantages in taking 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
48
grades as a tool to evaluate students' academic performance.
As in my humble opinion, they should be combining
with other scientific methods to encourage students
to gain knowledge but not solely focus their energy on
how to achieve high scores. After all, it is the knowledge
that it is power, not the grades.
Topic 73 Has computer made life easier?
Computers are involved in our world form sorted trash to
satellite control, making our life easy, convenient and
efficient. Obviously, it's a great revolution of human being.
It's odd that some consider that computers make life
more complex and stressful. I suppose computers will
become a necessity, like food and water to the mankind.
Computers have changed people's life style, in a way that
we can concentrate on scientific research rather than
wasting time on data analyzing and calculating, for computers
are much more efficient in dealing with these
strenuous jobs. Many activities could not be run in their
present form without computers. Examples are the banking
systems, and the weather forecasting systems. How is
it possible to deal with data-switching between banks and
clients simultaneously and accurately without computers?
As we known, weather forecasting requires multiprocessing
data from the meteorological satellites and simulating
the weather change, which are easy jobs for computers.

Although the knowledge of computer is not easy to acquired,
especially at early stage, the IT industry has been
making the computer operation system more friendly and
at the same time more powerful. Therefore, using computers
to handle problems is not the specialties of computer
majors only. Even children can use computers to
do their homework. We can now benefit a lot from computers
in our day-to-day life.
One of the concerns is that computers may cause some
troubles when we rely too much on them, such as various
computer viruses and the Y2K problem. Nevertheless,
computer experts will surely solve these problems and
improve the computer technology. In this sense, the computer
technology has much potential to develop.
After all, the computer is one of the most important inventions
in the twentieth century. It has formed a new
era in our life, and it affects culture, industry, science,
education and other areas. Computerization is a trend
nowadays, and computers are being used in many areas.
Computers like any other technology hold the key to increased
productivity, which will benefit all of us.
Topic 74 Is it better to travel with a tour guide?
Traveling is one of the most widely enjoyed recreations.
The tourist business is becoming increasingly important
for many countries' economies and provides a great variety
of products and services. People are different and so
are their preferences when it comes to spending a vacation
traveling to interesting and exotic places. One of the
first choices one should make when planning a trip is
whether it would be individual or with a group let by a
tour guide. If it were up to me, I would go to an excursion
as a part of a tourist group.
First of all, a common problem of people traveling
abroad is the unfamiliar language of the country they are
visiting. This is a major inconvenience as it could hamper
their communication and prevent them from learning
valuable things about the place. That's why I think that a
tour guide, who in most cases knows at least two languages,
would be needed. This is a professional whose
job includes guidance and help. Also tour guides tell
tourists about the history of the place they are visiting,
information which otherwise could hardly be obtained.
Second, group journeys are supposed to be previously
organized. The travel agency makes the full program of
the trip: hotel reservations, transportation, food, and
sightseeing. Furthermore, many services and museum
taxes are cheaper for a whole group. In this way, tourists
are much more comfortable, as they safe time and money,
and are able to enjoy their vacation without worrying
about anything.
Third, traveling in a group can provide people the opportunity
to get to know with many other tourists who are
from different backgrounds but are brought together by
their common interest of the place they are visiting. Such
group trips are a great chance for making new friendships
and eventually learning a lot about different people.
For all these reasons, I prefer to travel in a group with a
tour guide, as it would guarantee a more convenient and
enjoyable journey.
Topic 74 Is it better to travel with a tour guide?
When people are asked to list their hobbies, travel is
among the most frequent words quoted. Some would
choose to travel by themselves alone, some others prefer
to traveling with a few close friends or family members;
while still others, including myself, agree that the best
way to travel is to join in a group led by a tour guide.
A good tour guide, who has professional knowledge and
rich experiences about certain places, would make our
journey more efficient and enjoyable. Traveling to new
places is an important way to know our world in the perspectives
of cultural diversity and geographic peculiarities.
However, we often find ourselves confounded and do not
know what to do next when we are in a new place. A tour
guide may help us to arrange the optimum itineraries and
schedules. He leads the group around to show us unique
tourist spots that we should not miss. His explanation on
certain scenic spots is also useful for us to understand
further about the new place.
Besides, a tour guide would ensure the maximal security
of the group member. Tourists are always warned against
the potential risks ant pitfall, since strangers are easily
attacked. An experienced tour guide teaches his tourists
some tips and skills to guarantee the security. The tour
guide is particularly indispensable in any emergencies, as
he can make a timely response and right decisions.
A tour guide also has a good sense of humor. Far away
from our friends and families, we often feel lonely during
the journey, especially when on the way to a new destination.
A good tour guide are skillful enough to relieve the
loneliness by telling jokes and interesting stories, playing
magic tricks, which make the journey joyful and pleasant. 
ToeflEssays.com
49
Topic 74 Is it better to travel with a tour guide?
Nowadays traveling is becoming more and more popular,
as we have more leisure time and more money to spend
during our vacations. When it comes to ways of traveling,
many people prefer to join groups arranged by travel services
and escorted by tour guides, while others may argue
independent backpack travel should be better. My viewpoint
is both have advantages and disadvantages.
The advantages of traveling with a tour group are obvious.
People do not need to worry about accommodation,
transportation, sightseeing schedule and restaurants and
so on, all of which has been arranged in advance and
taken care of by the travel service during the trip. Besides,
the tour guides will tell stories behind the places of interest,
and help us with unexpected emergencies, such loss
of suitcases and health problems. Being relax and educational
is group-travel's best feature.
However, it is not flexible for some people. Suppose
when you enjoy a place well and wish to stay there a little
longer, but you are told you have to come back to the bus
in half an hour, just because you have to rush to the next
place, which turns out to be not so nice. The arranged
meals are expensive and not as tasty as it should be; the
booked hotel is too far from the shopping area; you share
a room with some strangers who might snore loudly all
night. In short, such nuisances of group travel turn down
many people who pursue more flexible travel alternatives.
So what about individual travel? The pleasure of freedom
and flexibility is well guarded, and there is more chances
to explore the place and encounter its people. However,
there are a lot of troubles for tourists to arrange tours by
themselves, and security is an issue. Moreover, during
sightseeing, they might miss a great deal of valuable sites
and historical relics.
In conclusion, every coin has its two sides. Only when
you are clearly aware of the "two sides" can you come up
with best option for your next tour. I personally choose
to travel with a group in that it can save me a lot of energy
and with the comfort of leading by a tour guide, I
can enjoy a place fully.
Topic 74 Travel alone
Some people think is better to travel in a group that is
lead by a guide. For my experience so far, I am inclined to
believe that such a way of traveling has more disadvantages
than advantages.
Although is better not to travel alone and a guidance is
always welcome, traveling alone is sometimes more desirable.
The group structure is, in my opinion, quite relevant
for a pleasant vacation. It is important for me to
travel with people that have the same interests as I do.
Otherwise we might not agree on the spots we want to
visit or the restaurants we want to eat at. Usually the most
successful trips are together with my friends and not with
a heterogeneous group of unknown people. I would
rather travel alone, or with just one friend, than with a
group whose company I would not enjoy.
On one hand, if for instance, I plan to visit a foreign
country, a place that I have never been before, a place
where people most likely do not speak my language, I
feel it is better to have someone to guide me and to help
me with any situations I may encounter. It is safer not to
travel alone. It is also pleasant to have a guide that provides
background information and interesting facts about
the places that I visit.
On another hand, especially if I am to visit a museum, an
art gallery, or a historical city I prefer to buy a map and
walk by myself rather than with a guide that would impose
on me his/her impressions and knowledge. I do prefer
to discover on my own, and to choose what I want to
see and to decide how much time to spent in one place
or another. I think that the success of traveling in a group
depends mostly on factors as the organization of the
group, the abilities of the guide, and the place of destination.

I enjoy traveling in groups, but only in small ones, and
with people that I know. Otherwise I think is better to
travel on my own, to see what I like, where I like, and
whenever I like.
Topic 75 Multiple subjects vs. one subject
The whole point of my answer is that it is better for universities
to require students to specialize in one subject.
It is just what the majors are called for, even though there
are a couple of the advantages for students to take classes
in many subjects.
It is a more sensible decision that universities require
students to specialize in one subject. They must have
known that the depth of a certain subject is infinite, and
both the students' energy and time are limited. Only
when a student specializes in one subject, can he focus
on it. Thus it ensures the students to become proficient
in a subject when they are conferred the degrees. That is
just the purpose of education.
It does not mean that students do not have many classes
to attend even if they just specialize one subject. There
are a lot of sub-subjects or divisions of a main subject.
The science of journalism, for example, can include the
theories of journalism, the histories of journalism (both
domestic and international), the news writing skills, the
interview courses and the editorials writing and so on.
The students have to study all of these above course in
journalism major. It means a lot of work to do even if
students just specialize in one subject.
I do not deny that there are a couple of advantages for
universities to offer students the option to take many subjects.
One thing, the work places require multidisciplined
personnel today. Students who take many
subjects may meet that request. Another advantage is that
other subjects that students take can help their main subject.
Whatever the benefit it will be, however, the other
subjects that students take should not interfere with their
main targets.
In the whole, if students' time and energy allowed, universities
could allow students to take as many subjects as
possible. However, I think that possibility is small. So I
have to say that it is better for universities to urge stu-
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
50
dents to specialize in one subject. After all, the main subject
already needs a lot of work to cope with, considering
the depth and width of one subject.
Topic 76 Should children learn a foreign language?
Nowadays, some may hold the opinion that children
should begin learning a foreign language as soon as they
start school, but others have a negative attitude that
learning a foreign language early will pose too much
pressure on kids and will affect their mother-tongue
learning. As far as I am concerned, I agree that bilingual
education should start as early as possible. My arguments
for this point are listed as follows.
I agree with the statement without reservation since children
learn second languages quickly than adults. As we
have observed, children can learn languages faster than
adults; immigrant children translate for their parents.
Child learners speak without a foreign accent, whereas
this is impossible for adult learners. Therefore the earlier
kids learn a second language, the less difficulties they
would meet when they grow up and have to face a foreign
language-speaking environment.
Another reason why I agree with the above statement is
that I believe that bilingual education can be fun and
stimulate children's learning interest. Many parents and
teachers know how to teach kids a second language in an
interesting way. One of my students told me that, when
he was in kindergarten, every day his mum taught him a
few native language characters as well as their meaning in
English. As time passed, the kid became keen to learn
English. Sometimes he gave his mum and dad a quiz by
speaking some English words and asking them what the
meanings are.
Bilingual education will not affect the mother-tongue
study of children. As we are living in an environment of
pure native language conversations and traditional culture,
it is impossible for us to give up our culture and
language. Teachers also are trying to arrange the curriculum
in a appropriate way. For instance, they create an
English-speaking environment for children in the morning,
and a native language-speaking environment in the
afternoon.
Bilingual education has become a trend. No matter we
like it or not, future educational undertakings will become
more international, and exchanges between
schools throughout the world will increase. Given this,
speaking a common language is important and, to this
purpose, bilingual teaching is an inevitable way.
Topic 77 Should boys and girls go to separate schools?
Should boys and girls attend separate schools? This question
is very arguable. Before rendering my opinion, let's
consider the advantages for boys and girls to attend separate
schools. Since boys and girls are different in many
ways, they have different hobbies and the ways to learn
new things. If they attend separate schools, the education
can be more efficient because the school can teach them
differently according to their personalities. But the disadvantages
are greater. While boys and girls attend separate
schools, there're few chances for them to communicate
with opposite sexes, which will become a handicap for
them to communicate with each other in their future.
As far as I concerned, boys and girls should not attend
separate schools. The first and foremost reason is that
people should have experience with the opposite sex
when they are at school, because the society consists of
both male and female members, and people have to learn
how to communicate with the opposite sex.
Moreover, people have to learn from the opposite sex.
For example, while females should learn braveness from
males, males should learn carefulness from females. In
addition, in a family, to learn from the opposite sex becomes
more important to keep the family harmonious. In
addition, the knowledge of the opposite sex is also important.
Without such knowledge, dealing with the opposite
sex in a relationship becomes extremely difficult.
Finally, as we can see, it's definitely important for boys
and girls to attend schools together, so that they can learn
from each other, communicate with each other and they
can understand each other well, which is very valuable
for their future.
Topic 78 Teamwork vs. working independently
Some people like to work independently, while others
would prefer to work in a team. Is it more important to
be able to work with a group of people in a team or to
work independently? Depending on different personal
traits and working environments, people will have different
answer to this question. I think being able to work in
a team is more important for me.
First, the modern society and industry is a complicated
system that requires teamwork, communication and cooperation
among companies and individuals. Take a computer
system for example, it comprises of hardware, operating
system and software, which are manufactured
separately by different companies. Not one single company
can accomplish a computer system without using
products and technologies from other companies. Similarly,
in a company, communication and teamwork is
more and more important among workers because a
worker cannot do his/her work properly without interacting
with his supervisor and colleagues.
Second, there are many advantages of working in a group
than working alone. Teamwork provides a worker with a
cooperative, friendly and enjoyable work environment.
The team can also be helpful in responding to a worker's
questions and problems, therefore increase the work efficiency.
Teamwork can also challenge a worker's abilities
and he/she can acquire valuable experiences from it.
Third, the ability of working independently does not contradict
with the ability to work in a team. For example, in
a team environment, I enjoyed being a major contributor
to my team. The fact that others depended on my work
made me feel like I was doing worthwhile things. For
example, I was in charge of the front end for the GUI.
This was very valuable experience, because I know how
important it is to work in a team.
Inclusion, I think the most important quality in a work
environment is the ability to work with others in a team. 
ToeflEssays.com
51
Topic 79 Who would you choose to build a statue for?
If the City Government of my town - Moscow asked me to
choose a person whose statue will be built, I would
choose no one. And here I can explain my point of view.
In my opinion there are already statues of many famous
people who merit a statue. Right in the center of Moscow
there is a great statue of Jury Dolgirukiy. He founded the
Moscow City in 1447. He is also famous as a great defender
of his people. If you look at this statue, you will
see a very strong man riding a horse with a spear in his
arms and the injured dragon lying on the ground. In my
view it symbolizes the meaning of his deeds and people's
remembrance and respect to him.
Another statue in Moscow is that of Alexander Pushkin.
He was one of the most famous Russian poets. He has
made an important contribution to the worlds literature.
His poems are realistic. They answered to questions
asked so many years ago, and they can still answer today's
questions. His statue looks so natural as if he is alive. His
statue is standing in the middle of the Pushkin Square.
With a book in his arms, he looks very calm and contemplative.

Another monument that I consider impressive is the
monument for people who died during the Second World
War. I cannot describe it because there are no proper
words to express the emotions I feel when looking at this
statue. I just feel painful and sad for their death and as
people cannot bring them back to life, they can only try
to prevent future wars.
In conclusion since there are already enough statues for
famous historic figures in Moscow, I would like to say
that I prefer to see modern art sculptures in the streets of
this historic city. I would allow young modern sculptors
to exhibit their works in the streets.
Topic 80 Describe a custom from your country
Who took care of you before you are eligible to go to the
daycare? That grandparents taking care of their baby
grandchildren is a tradition in my country. I would like
people from other countries to adopt this tradition.
At first thought, this tradition seems to be unimaginable
to people who are accustomed to the "parents-children
breeding" model. However, did you notice that swarm of
young mothers are roaming in the department stores
with their babies during working hours? Young ladies quit
their jobs and sacrifice their careers to look after their
offspring. How many women can really keep up with
their professional work after several years' absence from
their positions in such a fast pace society? A babysitter
may help you, but do they really care your baby as his
grandma does? The answer is No. Grandparents ensure
the love, care, health and education of your kids.
On the other hand, senior citizens gain more happiness
through this day to day caring of their young grandchildren.
Old people are sad about the aging and loss of
work. When they spend their time with young kids, when
the fun and loveliness filled in their soul, all unhappiness
disappears. The moments they spent together with the
babies are so sweet they can improve seniors' mental and
physical health.
It is undeniable that the relationships of different generations
will be tightened. Needless to say, kids will be tied
with their grandparents in this process. I was brought up
by my grandparents who are in their nineties now. I still
call them quite often and buy gifts for them. I feel the
strong connection among us.
From above analysis, I highly recommend our custom of
grandparents give their hand to cultivate future generation.

Topic 81 Has technolog y made the world better?
With the development of technology, there have been a
lot of changes to our life. Admittedly, some of these
changes are bad, causing many environmental and social
problems. However, most of these changes contribute to
making our life more convenient, more comfortable and
more wonderful.
First of all, due to the improvement of technology, people
can enjoy more conveniences than ever. For example,
it only takes travelers or businessmen several hours to go
to another countries by jet planes, which makes the
world seem to be much smaller. With the help of the
Internet, people at different corners of the world can
communicate with each other at a significantly high
speed and low cost. It is technology that has cleared away
the barriers that once prevented people from leading a
convenient life.
Secondly, technology has made our life as comfortable as
we can imagine. Sitting in air-conditioned rooms, people
do not have to suffer the extremely cold or hot weather
any more. Whatever vegetable or fruit we want to eat, we
can always find it in a supermarket regardless of the season.
We can also go to work in a place far away from our
homes by using automobiles or public transportation
tools.
In addition, technology provides us many choices to
spend our spare time. Listening to music by using an MD,
MP3 or Walkman, surfing the Internet or watching digital
movies, all of these entertainments make our life wonderful.

In conclusion, although technology has brought about
some problems, such as air pollution caused by increasing
number of automobiles, and ethnic problems caused
by cloning human beings, the benefits of technology far
outweigh its bad influences. So it is safe to say that technology
has made the world a better place to live.
Topic 81 Has technolog y made the world better?
A great many achievements have been accomplished in
recent decades in almost every area of technology, such
as in computer science, manufacture, and medicine. But
there have always existed two opposite attitudes towards
technological development. Some people agree that
these new technologies have made the world a better
place to live, while others hold the opinion that technology
has caused many problems to the world. As far as I
am concerned, I agree with the first opinion that our 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
52
world is becoming better for living with technology progress.
Several persuasive reasons go as follow.
Firstly, technology developments have greatly improved
people's living conditions, making our life more convenient
and efficient. We have elevators taking us to the top
of a skyscraper in just a few seconds; we have air conditioners
to keep the indoor temperature comfortable; and
we even have household robots now to help to take care
of the trivial housework.
Secondly, technology developments have also made communications
much easier, and thus helped to enhance
relationships among people. The wide use of pagers,
mobile phones, and wireless Internet has greatly facilitated
the way of daily communication. They can bring
people so close even though they may actually be thousands
of miles apart.
Thirdly, developments in technology can provide better
medical access to make people live a healthier and happier
life. By taking advantages of the most recent developments
in biotechnology, such as genetic engineering, I
am convinced that people will have a promising prospect
in treating all kinds of human diseases, including AIDS
and SARS.
It is true that technological developments have also
brought some serious problems. One of them is that
some technological developments have done harm to the
environment. For example, too much emission of waste
gases, mainly carbon dioxide, has increased the global
temperature significantly. However, people can reduce
and finally eliminate these harmful effects by improving
the technology itself or finding a more advanced and reliable
technology.
I believe that with the new technologies appropriately
adopted for good purposes, our world would be made an
even better place to live.
Topic 81 Has technolog y made the world better?
Since the end of the last century, when technology
started to make a full impact, debates have sprung up
among people worldwide as to whether this technology
has made the world a better place to live or not. In my
perspective, the new developments have indeed improved
our lives.
One striking example of how Man's new inventions have
helped us to lead a better life is the whole set of timesaving
electrical appliances and tools, ranging from washing
machines to microwave ovens. No longer do we need
to go down to the river to wash our clothes on rocks or
to heat our food with wood and charcoal for neverending
hours. Nowadays, our daily chores are merely
simple tasks, needing only very little efforts on our part.
It is the machines that do all the boring and tiring work.
Consequently, we are left with much more leisure time to
spend at our free will. Technology has exerted a great
influence on the ways people relax themselves today. It
has transformed our previously boring leisure time into
long hours of excitement, enjoyment and fun. For instance,
nobody can deny that video, computer and PlayStation
games have added spice to our lives, especially
those of children. The home cinema, recently available
on the market, has made many happy families around the
world.
Technology has not done good deeds only in those areas.
It has gone even further by improving considerably communication
among countries. Owing to new technology
such as the Internet, fax and mobile phones, barriers
among nations have started to disappearing, thus turning
the world into a 'global village'. In our modern era, it is
even possible to be living in a poor country while studying
with the top professors in England via the Web by
enrolling in an online degree.
We have therefore seen how technology has made the
world a better place to live in some ways. However, just
as the English proverb goes, "Every coin has two sides",
technology has also had a few negative effects on our society.
Thus, the same timesaving devices that save us so
much trouble have quickened so much the pace of life.
Nowadays everyone is stressed and is always preoccupied.
Moreover, overexposure to video games and the television
has been proved to be harmful to people's health,
creating eye and back problems. In addition, new technology
like the Internet has allowed the brewing of new
types of crime and criminals such as hackers and viruses.
In today's world, technology is having a deep influence
on the way people do things. But the issue of whether
this technology has made the world a better place to live
in will continue to be a controversial topic.
Topic 81 Has technolog y made the world better?
Being modern human beings, people nowadays have enjoyed
so much from the highly developed technology.
The improvements of technology have changed people's
life styles significantly. Admittedly, sometimes, technology
worsens the condition. However, compared to its
advantages, the bad impacts are so tiny.
In the modern world, we lead a much better life than our
ancestors. We no longer need to be on guard all day to
prevent us from being attacked by wild animals; we no
longer live in rock caves which are dangerous and not
comfortable; we can no longer put all of our hope to the
God to pray a mild weather which will bring us a harvest.
We can utilize technology to increase the quality and
quantity of plants. Moreover, modern technology of
medical treatment helps us cure the number of terrible
diseases that will deprive the life of human.
Besides, technology provides us many unimaginable tools
that benefit our life. We can travel from one place to another
by plane only in few hours, while it would take our
ancestors several months or even years in the ancient
time. We use computer and robot to help us with hard
and routine works. Computers also improve the efficiency
of our work.
However, technology not only brings us gold but also
rubbish. Pollution is one of the most terrible problems.
The excess use of technology brings disasters to people
and the world. The rivers and oceans are not as clear as
before; the wild animals are disappearing. In order to
save the world and also ourselves, people should limit
their demand from nature and use technology in a sus-
ToeflEssays.com
53
tainable way.
All in all, technology itself is neutral thing. Whether it will
benefit people or do harm to people depends on the
people who use it. Fortunately, most of the time we have
utilized technology in the right way, therefore, the technology
benefit our life much more than its harm.
Topic 82 Can ads tell about a country?
Nowadays some may hold the opinion that advertising
can tell you a lot about a country. As far as I am concerned,
I agree with this statement. My arguments for this
point are listed as follows.
One of the primary causes is that advertising is always a
reflection of a country's culture and customs. Advertising
varies from country to country, depending on the country's
particular conventions. For example, a Japanese advertisement
may feature a Japanese lady with a traditional
kimono, while an American advertisement may feature a
western cowboy with a hat and riding a horse. Through
advertisements, we can have a general understanding of
what people from other countries look like, what they
wear during their daily life, what they eat, what kind of
transportation they use, and what they do during their
spare time. We can always learn different cultures of different
countries through these culture specific advertisements.

A further more subtle point we must consider is that we
can understand a country by its products. When we see a
Toyota or a SONY advertisement on TV, we realize that
Japanese people see quality as a vital aspect of their products,
and we know that how these people are always trying
their best in high technology development, and ensure
the best quality in their products. When we have
gained a deeper understanding of a product, we can also
gain a deeper understanding of that country and people.
What is more, when we become curious about the culture
and customs of a country through advertisement, we
are willing to spend more time on reading about the
country, explore more deeply about it, and even someday
travel to a country we like to visit. All these might have
started with a small advertisement on TV! Is that amazing?
In short, advertising can really tell you a lot about a country's
culture and customs.
Topic 83 A single world culture
I strongly agree with the statement that modern technology
is creating a single world culture. Modern technology
like computers and the Internet is bringing people together,
and making the world smaller.
First of all, with the development of modern technologies
such as computers, English is becoming the most important
language in the world, and the importance of other
languages is getting weaker and weaker. Admit or not, the
most common language used today on the Internet is
English, and this makes English becomes the one and
only most important language in the world. On the other
hand, computers can cross the barriers of human language.
No matter where people are, and no matter which
language people speak, they always use computers the
same way, and basically they are using the same kind of
software packages, like the Windows Operating Systems
and word processing software packages. The computer
language is also a universal language. Programmers from
different part of the world can work in the Silicon Valley
together. Although they might have difficulties in communicating
in English, they have no problem at all writing
programs with Java, or C++.
Besides, the development of the Internet is unifying people's
life style. Internet is being used in almost every corner
of the world. People are doing almost everything with
the Internet, like getting all sorts of information, shopping
online, paying for their bills and checking their balances
in the online bank. Over 90 per cent of people in
the world use the same kind of Internet browser - the
Internet Explorer, and the interfaces of almost every
Internet page looks like the same, although they use different
language and design. People from all over the
world are doing the same thing each day on the Internet,
and their living habit is becoming closer and closer with
each passing day.
In addition, modern technology has facilitated the communications
among people from all over the world, and
therefore has resulted a single world culture. For instance,
people can chat with a friend or a stranger who lives
abroad over the phone, or the Internet, and they can also
see and listen to him/her through a camera and a microphone
attached to the computer. The ease of communication
helps one culture learns from other culture, and
brings the world together. Before people can see each
other through TV, they used to wear their local costumes;
nowadays T-shirt and blue jeans have become a universal
custom for people. This is a concrete example that modern
development is creating a single world culture.
Based on the points discussed above, we can see why I
agree with that modern technology is creating a single
world culture.
Topic 84 The Internet
The Internet...is it a boon or a curse? This is a very debatable
topic. We would need to look at the pros and cons of
it and then draw conclusions. Even then it would not be
possible to totally answer yes or no to the question. It
would depend upon individual personalities as well as
the situation that we are in. In my opinion, the Internet is
definitely a valuable source of information, but as with all
forms of technology one must know how to make the
best use of it.
Let's step back a few years from now. We were totally dependent
on books, the experience of other people or
data stored in other forms for getting information of any
sort. The problems with those kind of information
sources is that it is time consuming, inconvenient and
often times even misleading. The concept of weeding out
data from old reports and books was a time consuming
and painful process and would itself deter people from
trying to get new information.
But today with a touch of a button we can get any information
available, sitting in the comfort of our homes. We 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
54
are more knowledgeable and aware of things happening
around us. Technology has given us the greatest power at
our fingertips...the power of knowledge!
Lets take an example. Suppose someone wants to start off
a business venture. He can get all information regarding
other companies in the same line of business, he can do a
cost benefit analysis, gather corroborating data, make
new contacts, and so on, thanks to the internet. He is
now well informed. If he has to discuss this with other
potential partners he is armed with a wealth of information.

On the other hand the Internet does supply an overload
of information. Hence if you give a topic in a search engine
such as Google, you will get a number of sites that
would cater to the information required. Now if one were
unable to decide what information to cull out and what
to leave, it would be a painful experience rather than an
enjoyment.
So in conclusion, it really depends on how you use a particular
technology - used in moderation and in an intelligent
manner it could be the greatest tool. Otherwise an
enemy that steals time and waylays and deters a person
from achieving his ultimate goal.
Topic 85 One-day-visit to your country
If you attend a conference in China, and would like to
take a one-day-visit on site seeing and shopping, there are
three factors you might consider: this place must have
special tourist features which can represent China, and
this place must be close to the place where the meeting is
held, therefore you do not have to spend too much time
on traveling.
If you are in northern part of China, the best place that
you should visit is the city of Beijing, although spending
one day in Beijing is too short of a period to fully explore
the splendors of the city. Nevertheless, for those of you
without the luxury of time, make sure you don't miss a
few key points of interest--the Summer Palace, the Forbidden
Palace, the Forbidden City, and the Great Wall of
China.
The Summer Palace is a royal retreat located on the bank
of a large lake. Visitors can walk along a waterfront
promenade that leads to a concrete ship docked at the far
end of the walk. At the concrete ship, you can take a ferry
back to the entrance of the palace. Something you may
want to do while at the Summer Palace is going into the
gift shop, get dressed in traditional Chinese clothing, and
pose for a souvenir photograph.
The Forbidden Palace is absolutely breathtaking. There
are a series of gates that lead to the main palace grounds.
Pay particular attention to the stairwells in the palace
courtyards. There are slabs carved with intricate dragon
designs, which the emperor was suspended over in a
caravan whenever he left the palace grounds. It would be
a good idea to get a local guide to lead you around the
palace and explain the significance of various buildings.
Finally, don't miss the Great Wall. It's located outside of
the city and it takes up most of the day, but it's well
worth it. When you ascend the Great Wall, there are two
paths--one veering to the left and the one veering to the
right. The path on the right is less steep and an easier
climb. However, if you take the path to the left, you can
see the remains of the original wall, and there is a cable
car you can take down to the parking area.
Shopping in Beijing is becoming more convenient by the
day. The Silk Market at Xiushui Street is favorites among
tourists, experts and locals alike. There you can bargain
with the shop owners and buy good quality clothes with a
very low price, you can even see plenty of pirated software-
ironically, within sight of the US Embassy.
So, there you have it. I encourage anyone to spend at
least a few days in Beijing, because there is so much to
see.
Topic 86 A time and a place in the past
The topic makes me recollect my childhood, the happiest
time that I had in my hometown. It is a remote village on
the Qinghai-Tibet Plateau full of imagination and intrigue.
My childhood there was cheerful and unforgettable.
It used to be a very small village, surrounded with high
mountains; the melted snow water from the top of the
mountains formed many clear brooks and went through
the village. The crystal water moistened the grass and
crops in the village and also provided the village people
with all sorts of fish and shrimps. The appearance of the
mountainsides varied as the seasons change - yellow in
spring, green in summer, red in autumn and white in
winter. The top of the mountains was always covered
with snow, shining under the sun. When you were in the
village, you would feel you were touching the sky and
you will feel a sense of holiness around your body.
My childhood friends and I enjoyed our life in the village
so much. We liked to swim in the water freely and catch
the fish on fine days. We grazed the animals in the grassland
after school. The sheeps on the grassland are like
stars on a vast velvet green carpet. We played games in
the pasture, we sang folk songs on the hill, and we
climbed trees in the forests. We were always so happy
that we often forgot to go home or go to school. I boast it
was the most beautiful place in the world, although full
of impoverishment. The villagers were so poor and they
barely have enough food at that time, but they were so
optimistic. They kept working hard with little return
without any hesitation or complain. It was since childhood
that I learned how to face hardships and failures in
my life.
My childhood days were innocent and worry free. I left
my hometown for a better educational opportunity when
I grew up, but I always miss that wonderful homeland. I
take every opportunity to visit it. The pictures of the
place and the life there will always live in my mind.
Topic 86 A time and a place in the past
If I were afforded the opportunity to go back to a specific
time and place in the past, I would venture back to ancient
Greece. During the 5th century B. C., the Greeks
were in the process of developing and reforming a wide
range of cultural, social, and scientific pursuits that still
have a significant impact on the world today. 
ToeflEssays.com
55
In the arts, Greece excelled in many fields, particularly
dramatic literature. The works of Sophocles, Euripides
and Aristophanes have had a tremendous influence not
only on western literature, but also western thought in
general. The works of these playwrights are still performed
on stages around the world today, and many of
them have been adapted to movies. Still, it would be a
rare and exciting opportunity to see these plays performed
for the first time.
The ancient Greeks also excelled in the social sciences.
Perhaps their greatest contribution in this area came in
the form of democracy. The Greek words "Demo" and
"Crazy" mean "People" and "Rule" respectively. Today,
many of the world's great nations have adopted, and to a
certain extent, modified the ancient Greek system. Yet, it
originated from ancient Greece.
Academic subjects such as Philosophy, Astronomy, Physics
and Biology also received a great deal of attention in
the ancient Greek world. The philosophical writings of
Herbalists, Plato, and Aristotle have had a profound influence
on western scholarship for well over two thousand
years. The Mathematical theories of Pythagoras and
Euclid, combined with theories from other great ancient
civilizations, provided a foundation upon which later
mathematicians such as Newton and Einstein based their
work.
The world of the Ancient Greeks would most certainly be
an exciting and stimulating place to go back to. Politics,
Drama, Physics, and a number of other subjects were still
in their infancy, and all were being fiercely debated and
examined. It would undoubtedly be an enriching experience
to observe and take part in such a fascinating civilization.

Topic 86 A time and a place in the past
If I could go back to some time and place in the past, I
would choose my childhood and my hometown. There it
was full of my child's happy days. Especially nowadays, I
live in a metro city full of chaos, traffic and pollution.
I would never forget the clear stream in my hometown.
My friends and I used to swim and fish in the water, and
play on the grass nearby. Currently I am still looking for
such a nice place for my child, but I cannot find it anymore.

I have lost contact with my close friends in my childhood
for nearly twenty years. Their appearances are still kept in
my memory. Their honesty, naive and helpful characters
taught me what is real friendship. Perhaps they were all
married and even have children, perhaps they have
achieved their childhood dreams one way or the other,
and perhaps they are struggling for living just like me. I
wish we could get together sometime like our childhood
years, free from worries about the future.
I still remember my hometown in New Year times. Every
child was dressed well, and got more freedom from their
parents than other days in the year. Everyone in my
hometown was happily talking about their harvests and
their plans in the next year. Needless to say, us children
can enjoy lots of delicious foods in such days.
During my childhood days, I lived happily and healthily
in a beautiful environment, and I had very close friends. I
wish I could go back to enjoy my cherished memories
again.
Topic 86 Visit modern times
As a student in art history, my interest had always been
on modern art. If I could travel back in time and space, I
would pick Paris at the verge of twentieth century, the
place and time of modern art development, without hesitation.

I believe that living during the period of the avant-garde
art in Paris would be something quite exciting. I could go
to experience the Eiffel Tower's opening, or visit the first
Cubist exhibition. I would also be enthusiastic to attend
Bergson or Poincare's lectures at College de France, or
read articles in the newspapers of the time. I have always
curious how people felt when they saw for the first time
an automobile or an airplane.
Moreover, I think it would be exciting to see how long
distance communication became a reality, and how people
perceived the introduction of the Greenwich Universal
Time. This was an age in which incredible changes
took place in the way people saw the world, in the way
they perceived and understood time and space. It was the
time when Einstein published his first studies about relativity.
It was, as far as I am concerned, a time that it is
worth taking a look at. I believe that Paris at the end of
the 19th century and the beginning of the 20th would be
something fascinating.
If I were to return from the past back to our own times, I
would be much more confident in my researches about
that time, and my contribution to the study of art history
would be a quite substantial one. Till now I can only read
books and articles about it, and just imagine the wonderful
time Paris had been just before the war!
Topic 87 An important discovery in the last 100 years
I think the most important discovery that has been the
most beneficial for people in my country is the invention
of the Internet. So far as I can tell, the Internet has been
beneficial to people around the globe. My view is a commonsense
one, based on the fact that the Web is a vast
storehouse of information and opinions, which can be of
science, literature, politics, sports or even, sex. Anyone
with access to a computer and a dialup connection can
unlock the door and trawl through its offerings.
The Internet can be used as a broad base of knowledge
that contributes to the educational system. Students and
teachers benefit from the use of the Internet, as well as
administrators and others outside of formal education.
Students benefit because the Internet provides a resource
to supplemental information for any subject. Educators
benefit because the Internet provides a vast knowledge
base to prepare for teaching topics. People are not only
learning from the Internet, they are contributing and
sharing knowledge through networked communities. The
Internet is the advancement of education for all its users.
The Internet is changing the way we do business. The 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
56
Internet can deliver better customer services to people.
Using Internet broadcasting, we are able to target the
right audience, prepare and present a technical presentation
on a popular topic, interact with new customers, and
collect hundreds of highly qualified leads. As Internet
companies continue to find innovative ways to leverage
the capabilities of the Internet for businesses, the more
we will learn how to provide optimal solutions for customers.
Which in turn, will greatly benefit people.
The Internet today is a way to transfer and share information.
On the whole, it is a benefit to individuals of all
kinds. We do have problems surrounding the Internet
that need to be solved, but as with all new technologies
there are debates and opinions. Since the Internet technology
is spreading, it will soon become as popular as all
other forms of communication. If you have not tried it,
do so.
Topic 88 Telephone communication
Since the beginning of humankind people need to communicate
with each other. After the development of languages
and thanks to the incredible ability of mankind to
advance, nowadays we enjoy the use of many different
types of communication. Letters, the Internet, or telephone
allows us to communicate freely with the rest of
the world.
In spite of above mentioned, I agree with the statement
that new types of communications have made contacts
between people less personal.
Unfortunately, the technology age we live in forces us to
adopt the contemporary way of communication, which is
almost impersonal. While hurrying to work more and
more, chasing our aims, or focusing only on money making,
practically we have forgotten that one of our primary
social needs is to communicate face-to-face. To save time
we often prefer to send an email or to make a phone call
than to have a simple face-to-face talk with our friends or
parents, for example.
Furthermore, those types of impersonal communications
will sooner or later place us into isolation. Nowadays, we
are often afraid to make new acquaintances; we have
troubles to express ourselves when we communicate
face-to-face; or we experience difficulties to hold an informal
conversation. What is more, we find much easier
to communicate with other people by email and phone.
Not only do we forget about our simple role as social
members but we also do not enjoy it as we did before.
Modern technology has made connections between people
so impersonal that we are at the threshold of a new
single world culture. This fact gives the answer to the
question why so many people of our generation are victims
of the illness called loneliness.
Although telephones and the Internet have made contacts
between people much more easier, our virtual
friends will remain virtual and a simple call will not substitute
the hours we can spend with our families. Therefore,
I truly believe that nothing can replace personal,
face-to-face communication between people.
Topic 89 What person would you like to meet?
There are many famous people in the history of human
beings. And I want to meet almost all of them if possible.
But if only one choice is available for me, I will choose
the great thinker Confucius without hesitation. The reason
for my decision goes as follow.
In the first place, from my point of view, Confucius had a
great influence on the culture and history from ancient
time to present society in China and almost no one could
be comparable with him in this respect. At the earliest of
human society, Confucius firstly advocated education and
civilization and taught Chinese people how to build a
civilianized relationship among people. There is no
doubt that this idea benefited the development of the
Chinese society. It is the result of education that makes
Chinese people create abundant culture from one generation
to the next. Therefore, Confucius had a significant
influence on Chinese history.
In the second place, Confucius encouraged people to
respect their parents, treat their friends honestly and
have a loyal heart to their emperors. At that time, only
when people accepted these ideas could they really understand
their own responsibilities for family and the
society. Without these Confucius thinking, people may
not know what is supposed to be the correct behaviors
when they live with family or survive in the society. It is
Confucius's idea that gave them a clear guidance. Until
now, these ideas still have great effects to the behavior of
present people.
Last but not least, Confucius has broad knowledge in
many areas, such as literature, astronomy and geography
etc. It is this knowledge that helped him complete many
famous works. Experts from all over the world have paid
great attention on the research of these famous books
because many useful ideas in the books are still beneficial
to our society. For example, Confucius advocated that
humans should live in harmony with nature. In the present
society, people destroy forests in some areas, so living
environment of human being has been damaged seriously.
If we had observed Confucius ideas, this would not
have happened.
In conclusion, Confucius is a great and famous thinker in
the history of China. He provided us with the basic idea
of education and civilization in human society, created
the guidance of behavior for families and the society, and
left us with abundant spiritual works. Therefore, he is the
one who I want to meet most. I really hope that someday
time could go back, so that I would meet him in the actual
world.
Topic 89 What person would you like to meet?
If I could travel back in time to meet a famous person
from history, I would like to meet Christopher Columbus.
Without a doubt he was one of the greatest people who
have ever lived. I choose him not only because he found
America in 1492, but also because he had all the qualities
that can define a successful person to me: brave, adventure
spirit, attic faith, determination and perseverance.
First of all, I am strongly impressed with his daring and 
ToeflEssays.com
57
adventurous spirit. What he wanted to do, in the eyes of
the public at that time, was a risk. Risking his life, in addition
to a number of ships and other people's lives. But he
had great courage and had success.
Secondly, his attic faith in the scientific theory that the
earth was round had also led him to success. Despite the
fact that most people still adhered to the belief that the
earth was flat and that ships would fall off the edge, if
they sailed too far in any direction. Columbus trusted the
scientific theory, which was accepted only by few intellectual
elites. It was his voyage that proved it.
Another great attribute from Columbus is his strong will
and perseverance. If I could meet him, I would ask him
how, after having his idea---voyage to India by a daring
new route, namely, westward---rejected by the English,
French and Portuguese courts, he still found the courage
to ask yet another monarch to support him. I would like
to hear what Columbus said to the King and Queen of
Spain to convince them that this plan would be profitable
for them, when they knew that he had been turned down
by three other monarchs and any amount of money, supplies,
or men with which they provided him could potentially
be a total loss. Columbus was so determined that he
finally convinced them.
If I had a chance, meeting Columbus would be my first
choice. I see Columbus as a man "...more stupendous
than those which Heaven has permitted..." no matter
what anyone says.
Topic 90 What famous athlete would you like to meet?
If I have the opportunity to meet a famous entertainer or
athlete, I would like to meet Michael Jordan.
Jordan was neither tall nor strong in his childhood, but
he never gave up playing basketball. He has huge success
today as a legendary guy in the basketball history, and is a
god for all the basketball fans all around the world. I
think the reason of his success is because his diligence,
courage and his strong inner desire to win. All these are
what I admire most of him.
Jordan won six championships of NBA. That was the heydays
of Jordan. Six rings! That is every NBA player's
dream. Someone spent many years in order to get a ring
but failed, like Carl Malone, and King Baylor. Jordan got
six! His last ring was won by his exciting shoot, which
was once considered the last and perfect moment in his
life and a best end for his history of playing basketball.
Jordan's name was linked with "perfect" when people
mentioned Jordan. A great deal of courage is needed for
one to break off the word "perfect" which he used years
to establish, but Jordan did it. He came back again, not as
a god, but as a common basketball player. He was no
longer young and could not act has what he did when his
young. There are even some fans that opposed him to
come back; they did not want to see their god beaten by
the youth. In the opposite, Jordan did quite well, though
not as good as before, but better than what we all imagined.
He, a nearly forty-year-old man with two injured
knees, led Wizards get much better marks than it did last
year. He could still sometimes score more than forty
points. What support him is the steadfast belief he had
and the strong love of basketball. This gave him the unbelievable
strength.
If I saw him, I wanted to ask him how he managed to gain
the desire and where does this love come from, maybe
Jordan would just give me a smile and say, "I love this
game!"
Topic 91 What question will you ask a famous person?
If I had the opportunity to sit down and meet one of my
idols or heroes, I could come up with hundreds of questions
to find out what they did to get where they are, but
in particular I like to have asked Helen Keller, what
would she have made of the technology available today to
blind and deaf blind individuals?
When Helen Keller was nineteen months old, a serious
illness almost took her life. She survived the disease had
left her both blind and deaf. Her education contributed
to her first teacher, Anne Sullivan. Anne taught Helen to
finger spell, and manage to let her understand the meaning
of words. Imagine how hard it is for a person both
blind and deaf to relate words with real world objects,
although she never had a chance to see those objects!
Another teacher Mary Swift Lamson who over the coming
year was to try and teach Helen to speak. This was something
that Helen desperately wanted and although she
learned to understand what somebody else was saying by
touching their lips and throat, her efforts to speak herself
proved to be unsuccessful. However, Helen moved on to
the Cambridge School for Young Ladies and later entered
Radcliff College, becoming the first deaf blind person to
have ever enrolled at an institution of higher learning.
After World War Two, Helen spent years traveling the
world fundraising for the American Foundation for the
Overseas Blind. They visited Japan, Australia, South America,
Europe and Africa. Her hard work and achievements
was widely recognized throughout the world, and she
was acknowledged as "the Miracle Worker."
If Helen Keller were born today her life would undoubtedly
have been completely different. Her life long dream
was to be able to talk, something that she was never
really able to master. Today the teaching methods exist
that would have helped Helen to realize this dream. What
would Helen have made of the technology available today
to blind and deaf blind individuals? Technology of today
has enabled blind and deaf blind people, like Helen, to
communicate directly, and independently, with anybody
in the world.
Topic 92 Dynamic weather
The weather is an essential factor for ones comfort. I
strongly believe it is important to live in a place where
the climate is just for you. As far as I am concerned, I
have lived all my life in a four-season climate and I cannot
imagine myself stay, at least not for a long period of time,
in a place where the weather is the same all year long.
There are several reasons for which I prefer the weather
to be diverse. Firstly, if not only the climate but also the
geography is also divers life can be much more exciting 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
58
than in place where the climate and de relief are all the
same. On of the advantages that I encountered is the fact
that I do not have to travel to distant locations to enjoy
either winter, or summer. I just have to be patient for
several months and I can go skiing in the mountains, or
on the contrary, swimming by the sea. Also I had the
chance to spend one Christmas in Florida, and I felt so
strange. Christmas seemed so unnatural and sad without
the joy that snow brings. Without snow Christmas, looks
fake, or at that is how it looked to me.
Also spring are autumn are so beautiful that I can hardly
imagine how a year will be without them. My good mood
depends on the changing of the seasons. Once the spring
is all over the country, I just can wait for the summer.
Diverse climate makes my life, in a way, much more dynamic.
I love to observe how nature changes the trees.
They have flowers in spring; they are green in summer,
colorful in autumn, and white in winter. Isn’t that wonderful?

The alternation of seasons is quite important for me. My
life as a whole is guided by the shifts in the yearlong climate.
I think life in a changing weather is much more
dynamic and exciting. I would not choose, for nothing in
the world, to live in the same climate all year long. My life
can be full of joy only if the nature around me is permanently
changing.
Topic 92 One-season or four-season climate
There is no denying the fact that whether to choose a
place that have the same weather all year long, or a place
where the weather changes several times a year is a popular
topic which is much talked about. Although it seems
that normally we cannot tell which one outweigh the
other between these two kinds of places, they deserve
some close examination.
If three criteria were taken into account, I would prefer
living in areas where the weather changes several times a
year. There are three advantages:
First, varied weather or climate broadens the range of our
pastimes. For example, we can go swimming in summer
and go skiing in winter. If the place we live in has only
hot weather all year long, like Singapore, most of us can
never have a chance to go skiing.
Secondly, the change of climate gives us opportunities to
wear many kinds of clothes. Some say it is a waste of
money to buy clothes depending on seasons. However,
wearing various clothes, looking at others' fashion, and
feeling the change of seasons is very interesting for me.
Thirdly, changing of seasons is good for our health. When
winter comes our body's metabolism slows down, and
when summer comes it speeds up, so that our body can
maintain a good rhythm. Also snows in the winter can kill
a lot of bacteria and bad insects, so that in spring our
chance of being infected with a disease such as flu is decreased
and we can enjoy nice atmosphere and sceneries.
For these reasons, I prefer to live in areas that have several
changes of weather. Only these three reasons can
make a person draw the conclusion that living in areas
that have season changes is better.
Topic 93 Important qualities of a good roommate
At first glance it seems very difficult for us to define what
are the important qualities of a good roommate. However,
after serious considerations we can see that under most
circumstances, a good roommate should at least have the
following three qualities.
First of all, a good roommate should be open and willing
to communicate. There are always issues regarding rent,
bills, food and household duties, guests, privacy, noises,
sharing and borrowing, to name a few, and interests and
hobbies of roommates are not always the identical. There
will always be conflicts among roommates. When problems
or conflicts arise, roommates must openly discuss
the issue and reach a solution to the problem. In addition,
a successful roommate relationship requires good communication.
Take time to talk frequently to each other;
chatting with each other helps keep up the basic relationship
that can provide the underpinning for a harmonious
relationship. Therefore open and willing to communicate
is the first important quality of a good roommate.
Secondly, an important quality of a good roommate is
considerate and understanding. A good roommate understands
what you need; He is a good friend and a good
listener, and offer you help when you need it. Of course,
you should not depend on your roommate to satisfy all
your social needs. Make other friends and get involved in
activities is also important, and could leave more private
time for your roommate.
The third important quality of a good roommate is that
he should be a hard worker, and have the desire to do
better. As we know, roommates will always influence each
other in some ways. As an old Chinese proverb, one who
mixes with vermilion will turn red; one who touches
pitch shall be defiled therewith. So like choosing a friend,
it is very important to choose a roommate who has good
qualities.
Of course, some roommates eat and socialize separately
and barely get to know each other. They never become
friends. Still, if your roommate possesses the abovementioned
qualities, your residential life will be peaceful
and enjoyable.
Topic 94 Function of dancing
There are various elements in a country's culture, such as
music, drama and dancing. These activities fulfill people's
daily life and make the culture to become unique and
colorful. Among these activities, dancing plays a very important
role in a culture. I assert the statement due to
three reasons as follows.
Firstly, dancing is one of the ways for people to communicate.
Before human being can use language to communicate
with each other, body language such as gesture is a
good way to express what they want to say. Gradually,
dancing has become a very important way for people to
show their feelings. For example, dancing in celebrations
can express feelings such as happiness, love or grief.
Secondly, dancing also reflects the diversity of a nation.
There are different kinds of dances in different cultures.
For instance, Flamenco is a famous dance in Span, and it 
ToeflEssays.com
59
reflects the culture of Span and the characteristics of the
Spanish people. In many cultures, dancing has even become
an integral part of their culture. Understanding the
dancing of a country helps people to understand the culture
of that country.
Thirdly, dancing can help create a lot of wonderful music.
Dancing and music cannot be separated. When people
dance, they usually need appropriate music to company.
Tchaikovsky is one of the greatest composers in the world,
and his famous work "Swan Lake" is created for the ballet.
We almost can say that the ballet dancing gave
Tchaikovsky inspirations to write the music.
Of course, other activities are all important for a culture.
However, I especially mention dancing because the valid
reasons I have present above.
Topic 94 Function of dancing
Dancing is an important art form, and also plays an important
role in a culture. Some dance spontaneously
happens at celebrations as an expression of emotion or
some happen in a more structured manner at ceremonies.
Dancing plays an important role in ceremonial events in
many cultures. For example, during the Pukumani ceremony
the dances performed reflect the relationship to
the deceased. In Lebanon, the classical belly dancing still
plays an important part at weddings, representing the
transition from virgin bride to sensual woman, and is also
popular in nightclubs. On the other hand, residents of
the Greenland believe that the dancing and drum can be
used as a tool to dissolve conflicts between people.
As we may see from the above examples, dancing is an
integral part of many cultures. Of course, dancing does
not have the same functions in our modern life, but many
people in our society still find dancing an enjoyable form
of entertainment and art. Young people go to disco with
their friends to release their energies, and they find dancing
a good way to relax and make friends. Older people
dance together as a social event and a good means of
exercise.
In addition, many people go to theatres to enjoy performances
of ballet and modern dances. Enjoying those
beautiful dancing, music and costumes in a dance performance,
can give us a wonderful experience, and help
us develop appreciation of art, and enrich our after work
life.
In conclusion, no one can deny that dancing plays an
important role in a culture.
Topic 95 Explore the outer space
The word "Space adventure" has captured a large number
of people's heart. Many men have been attracted by the
unknown world and have desired to live in space at some
future time. The universe is the last and infinite unexplored
region for human beings. However, space researches
do not accomplish only by yearning. These researches
cost hugely. Another way to express this is that
spending money always has its opportunity cost. In other
words, money spent on some venture could have been
used for financing some other alternative venture. Some
people believe that money spent on space research benefits
all of humanity. Other people believe that there are
better opportunities for spending this fund.
This first group of people claims that space researches
have helped all of humanity's lives extremely. They point
out that researches on space have informed us about
much environmental damage which we have caused to
our planet. Similarly, they declare that the present satellite
system is due to the researches done in the past in
space. There are also numerous new materials and inventions
that can be traced directly to space researches.
These people hope to spend more money on researches,
visit all the planets, and build space colonies.
On the other hand, there are people who assert that
money spent on space is a complete waste because it
does not have sufficiently direct benefit to all the humanity.
For instance, there is a sizable portion of the humanity
does not have any access to food, education, sanitation,
health care and especially peace.
Personally, I find that I cannot align myself completely
with either group. I have some reservations about both
positions. No one can deny that weather satellites and
communication satellites are useful investments. But unrealistic
researches like exploring Mars or Venus does not
have any good bearing on most peoples' development at
the present. Some scientists may be interested in the
composition of those planets, but the opportunity cost is
extraordinary. In my opinion, it may cause lack of social
infrastructures, if states inject immense funds into space
researches in the limited budget.
Topic 96 Reduce stress
They say that "Life is a big headache on a long noisy
road." This statement truly explains life nowadays. Life in
the twenty first century is full of stress. From dawn to
dusk, everyone has to go through a rigorous schedule.
Even children are not exempt from this rush. Everyday
there are deadlines to meet, reports to write, bills to pay,
meetings to attend, papers to submit, etc.,. Life is a neverending
race to most people. The everyday grind builds
up stress and fatigue. Stress Reduction has become a priority
with individuals as well as organizations. People
have different ways of escaping the stress and difficulties
of modern life. In my opinion the best ways of reducing
stress are meditation, exercise and reading books.
Meditation is an effective way to overcome stress. Meditation
not only soothes the mind from tension but also
regulates heartbeat and blood pressures. It helps an individual
in attaining inner peace and equilibrium. Meditation
helps in tapping a person's inner potential and
opens his mind to the universal spirit.
Exercise is another way to reduce stress. Exercising not
only promotes health but also improves thinking. When a
person exercises the muscles in the body get a workout
that in turn burn fat. The burning of fat releases stored
energy and the person has an exhilarating feeling. This
feeling helps the person to overcome stress. Thus Exercise
is very useful tool in stress reduction.
Reading also has a beneficial effect on individuals in 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
60
stress. Reading a great book is very therapeutic to a person
with stress. Reading helps the mind to look at other
things and reduces the focus on the person's difficulties.
Elegant poetry and beautiful prose can soothe a person's
mind and help him reduce stress in his life.
In conclusion, Meditation, Exercise and reading are the
best ways to reduce stress.
Topic 97 Teachers' pay
Education is one of the holiest occupations in my view. I
disagree with that teachers should be paid according to
how much their students learn. Although teachers are
important for students, the most important part for learning
knowledge is students themselves.
Different teachers has different style, so it is hard to
evaluate how well each teacher teaches according to how
much students learn. As nobody would have the same
character, teachers also have their own teaching styles
such as humorous, gentle, strict, to name a few. Maybe
some students like humorous teachers, while others prefer
a gentle one. But probably the students of a strict
teacher could give good results in their study, even
though these teachers teach the same thing. We could not
say that the strict teacher should be paid higher than the
gentle teacher, since we know that the students have
learned more because they were afraid.
On the other hand, how much or how well students learn
depends on students themselves. In a school, it is easy to
see that some students are with high marks, while some
others have lower marks. A teacher is a person who direct
students how to learn. Students should do much more
works. The more attention students pay, the more knowledge
they learn. The hard-workers probably get higher
scores. Students' learning results depend on individual
students' intellectual abilities and the time and energy
that they put into learning. Sometimes it has nothing to
do what how well the teachers taught. In addition,
knowledge that students learn not only comes from the
teachers, but also from many sources. Family influence,
extracurricular reading and out-class teaching are some of
the sources that can provide students with knowledge.
In sum, although teachers are important in students' education
and learning, there are many other factors that
decide how well students' learn. So it is unfair that teachers
are paid according to how much their students learn.
Topic 98 What to represent your country?
If I can send one thing to represent my own country -
China to an international exhibition, I would choose a
book that has graphical illustrations besides each context.
The main reason is that paper was invented by one of our
ancestors and it is essential to our everyday life. Were it
not for the paper, many documents would not have been
passed down for centuries. In addition, with the written
language being used, many famous people and great
things about my country can be recorded in this book.
For example, it can explain the educative theories of Confucius,
one of the greatest educators in our country.
On the other hand, with the universal language of graph,
people around the world can understand more easily
with the help of the vivid presentation. In this way, even a
young child who does not read will learn what I want to
tell them.
In a word, people attending the exhibition will know that
Chinese people discovered paper, and Confucius was one
of the greatest educators in China. Besides, this book also
reminds us how clever our ancestors are and what we
need to do to keep up. With these wisdoms, we can invent
more convenient equipments or make important
discoveries to better our lives for the future.
In conclusion, if I have the opportunity to introduce one
thing to people in the world, I would bring a book that
documents all the traditional inventions and people of
my own country. In that way, the world will understand
more about my country.
Topic 99 Would you choose your own roommate?
Some students do not prefer to have the university
choose their roommate. However, as far as I am concerned,
this is part of the university experience. Therefore,
I would rather have the university assign a roommate
to share a room with me. I base my views on the
following reasons.
First of all, even though the university will assign, it is
actually not totally a matter of chance. For instance, we
all filled out information sheets. The school knows what
we are majoring in, what our interests are, and our study
habits and our goals. I think they are probably very good
at matching roommates using this information. Besides, if
a mistake is made, I can change my room assignment
next semester.
Secondly, it is a lot of work to choose your own roommate.
For example, if I did want to choose my own
roommate, I would first pick some candidates from the
list supplied by the university. Then I would write to
them and they would write back. Through our letters, we
would find out if we shared common interests, such as
sports or movies. Because of my investigation, I would
probably get someone compatible with me. However, it
takes time and labor to go through, though. Besides, the
process of finding similar interests is not all that different
from what the university does.
Finally, trying to predict whom I am going to get along
with is not a science. I might choose someone who
sounds just like me and still find that the two of us just
do not get along as roommates.
Besides, I think it would be boring to room with somebody
who is just the same as me. I would rather be with
someone who has different interests and likes to do different
things. Maybe I would even get a roommate from
another culture.
In conclusion, having the university choose a student to
share a room is a far better choice for me. Assigning
roommate in body may suit some students. However, I
think it is always important to meet new people when we
enter a university. Besides, another reason I am going to
the university is to be exposed to a lot of new experiences.
These new things would allow me mature in character.

ToeflEssays.com
61
Topic 100 Computer technolog y or basic needs?
Some people think that governments should spend as
much money as possible on developing computer technology
or buying computers, while others think that governments
should spend money on the basic needs of
their people. As far as I am concerned, this money should
be spent on some more basic needs, such as protecting
the environment and improving public services.
In the first place, pollution of the environment has become
the biggest problem in today's society. People will
not find clean water to drink if they do not do some work
to keep the water clean. There would be no fresh air if
every one in the city drives a car to work. More and more
wild animals are facing the danger of extinction because
of the shortage of habitats. There would be no more wild
animals if people continue to destroy forests. Therefore,
there are more basic things that governments should do
such as keeping the water clean, keeping the air fresh,
and keeping the forests intact.
In the second place, there are many problems with the
public transportation system in big cities. The buses during
the rush hour are overcrowded; some people cannot
get to work on time because they spent too much time
on the buses or trains. Consequently, government should
spend more money to improve public transportation systems,
which will benefit the people and the business in
their cities.
From what I have discussed above, everyone can see that
there are more things a government should do than buying
computers, such as protecting the environment and
improving public services. Therefore, I think governments
should spend more money on the basic needs of
the people instead of spending a lot of money developing
computer technology or buying computers.
Topic 101 Work by hand vs. by machine
In general, there are two ways of making products, one is
by hand and the other is by machine. It is undeniable that
products can be manufactured easily and efficiently by
machine. But for me, I prefer hand-made items for their
features of individualism and flexibility.
First of all, hand-made products are more unique and
personal. Take birthday cards as an example, instead of
same pictures on the printed cards available in the market,
well-chosen images such as our own photos printed
on a self-made card can surely distinguish the card from
others. Owing to its uniqueness, the self-designed card
will be of greater value for the person who receives it.
What's more, garments made by hand are fitter than machine
made ones. Although men's suits and lady's dresses
can easily be found in shops that sell machine-made
clothes, many people go for tailor-made clothing simply
because tailors can make those clothes precisely according
to individual customer's measurement and styles. Obviously,
the fitness of clothing is what those people care
about most.
Finally, producing items by hand is more flexible. It releases
people from being confined by modes that are
necessary for machine-made manufacturing. For example,
in hand-made pottery making, people can create new
designs at any time. While in machine manufacturing,
however, modes have to be made in advance, and afterward
all finished products are based on the same modes
and have completely the same looks. If a different look is
needed, people must re-produce the modes first. Moreover,
there are still some items that cannot be produced
by machine because there are no matched modes.
In conclusion, it is easy to get the conclusion that doing
work by hand is more flexible than by machine in most
cases, so I prefer products that are made by hand.
Topic 102 Should students evaluate their teachers?
I am always amazed when I hear people saying that students
have no rights to evaluate their teachers, and that if
they do so, they should be regarded as dishonest. Even
one did not know from concrete examples that schools
should ask students to voice what they think of their
teachers, one can deduce it from general principals.
It is true that a young man, one of the students, may be
conceited, ill-mannered, presumptuous or fatuous, but
no one will have the ability to make sure that all teachers
are not behaving like this. When a student has some fault,
it is the teacher's duty to tell him what he should do; on
the other hand, when a teacher does wrong, others, including
his students, are bound to let him know.
It is as if, sometimes, that what many teachers have done
are devoid of any mistake, however, the way they taught
still deserve improvements. In schools, students try to
develop abilities and skills, and prepare for their careers
in the future. It is true that what they get from schools
may be perfectly adapted to the society during a certain
period of time, but the world is not still; it is changing all
the time. What is learned today may become outdated
tomorrow. As a result, teachers, who are bound to make
improvements of what they teach according to the reflections
of the society, should be evaluated by their students.
Furthermore, giving students the right to evaluate their
teachers help create the air of freedom in schools. This is
especially important to inspire students' thought, and to
encourage them to think. If students are not allowed to
voice what they think of their teacher, they will have to
do what the teachers tell them exactly, only to become
robots that can to do nothing other than following instructions.

Taking into account of all these factors, we may reach the
conclusion that it is significantly necessary to ask students
to express what they think of their teachers, and this does
good to the students, to the teachers, and to the society
as a whole.
Topic 103 Characteristic of successful people
Many people believe that one can be successful if one is
committed, honest, faithful or intelligence. But, the foundation
of each of these qualities lies in believing the
power the person has, and working accordingly to
achieve the goal. There are many people, who are honest,
beautiful, good and soft spoken, intelligent and even 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
62
faithful, but only some are successful in achieving their
goals. While all of these characteristics are equally important
and act as the medium for success, the most important
is the power to cope with circumstances and keep
our spirit goes on in the most difficult situations.
It is well said that we cannot direct the wind but we can
adjust the sail. Similarly, on the way to our destination,
we will come across a lot of obstacles, but we need to
find the way to come across that situation. This is where
success lies. No matter how low we fall, what matters is
how high we bounce back.
Success can be measured by what we have and how much
power we are using to achieve our goals. For example,
while in playing games, it is sure that one team will win
and another will lose, but the spirit is not just in winning
but also in learning new techniques and improving team
sprit and cooperation skills. A winner team cannot always
be successful, but the successful team is the one that has
improved a lot with respect to its earlier performances.
Though the person is honest, intelligent, faithful and
committed, it is not sure that he will be successful. The
most important character rather than these is efficiency, ,
which is to understand the environment and the need,
and to implement best of the best ideas and actions. No
matter how smaller step it can be, but it can bring great
changes. As Shiva Khera once said, "Winners do not do
different things but they do things differently", which
better explains the meaning of being successful.
Success is not just winning, but also is how much we are
satisfied with whatever we are doing. So, all qualities like
honesty, intelligence, and faithfulness are directly proportional
to success.
The definition of success for each of us may vary. Some may think the reason for success is honesty while others
may think it is the commitment. But, in my opinion,
where there is will there is power, so each of us should
know our strength, and work accordingly to be successful.
And we should measure our success not with others but
with what we have and what we have achieved.
Topic 104 Contributions of artists vs. scientists
Social benefit, I think, can be defined as the profit that
people who live in the society can share and appreciate.
When we compare the contributions of artists and scientists,
it is quiet difficult to outweigh one of which. However,
it is because we tend to easily find the contributions
of scientists to our daily life that I am on the side of those
who contribute to the society in a tangible way. Now I
would like to illustrate some examples that support my
opinion.
First of all, all the appliances such as televisions, personal
computers and microwaves ovens that we use in our daily
life are contributed by the scientists' efforts and aspirations.
Nowadays, we can barely survive without those
products that always help with our daily tasks. Most of
those are the great invention that is developed in the past
50 years. Almost all people in the society can share those
contributions. Scientists' contributions are more than just
inventing those appliances. Thanks to their tremendous
perspiration, our mental and physical health is ensured
and protected in many ways. Newly developed technologies
help physicians to practice operations. A number of
medicines relieve and alleviate our illnesses. Those improvements
in the medical field can easily make people
to admire scientists' contributions.
On the other hand, artists' contributions are sometimes
difficult to appreciate. There are a variety of buildings
with artistic forms that are designed by artists. However
ordinary people cannot truly appreciate those great
works. In view of social benefits, those contributions are
less important to people in the society. Therefore, artists'
contributions to the society are unfortunately less attractive
for me.
With the illustrations above, I definitely believe that scientists
contribute more to our society. Although life
without artists' works is dull and meaningless, we cannot
survive with the contributions of scientists for sure.
Topic 105 University housing vs. apartment
In dorms, students can learn to improve their communication
skills and to live with others harmoniously. Roommates
must adjust their eating and sleeping habits regarding
to each other's needs. Each one must adjust his free
time in such way that he does not bother others while
they are studying. The environment of dorms is likely the
environment of formal offices where everyone must find
solution to various problems and cooperate with others.
Consequently, by adapting to conditions of living in
dorms, students can actually prepare themselves for their
future jobs. The environment of a dormitory is friendly
and understanding, because it consists of students who
have same goals and interests. For example, if one failed
to understand his lecture, he can ask others for help. Furthermore,
students can find that it is easier to find topics
to chat or conduct activities together because they have
so much in common.
Apartments have quietly different surroundings. Students
usually have fewer neighbors and roommates so that they
have less distraction. Thus, students can concentrate better
on their schoolwork. As a result, their grades could be
better. Moreover, living in apartments maintains students'
privacy. One has his secrets that he does not want anyone
to know and sometimes needs to spend his time alone to
think about his problem. Another advantage is that people
who live around apartments are diverse. Thus, students
learn to contact with ordinary peoples and are not
confined to the academic community. Therefore, students
are offered a wide variety of experiences that will
be useful in the future.
If I were in a situation to choose whether I would live in a
dorm or have a separate apartment, I would choose to
live in a separate apartment. It could be argued that living
in an apartment limit the contact of a student with his
fellow students. This argument goes on to assert that
such students are deprived from social environments and
therefore remain aloof and introvert. However, it is a fact
that students can make enough friends even if they live
outside of the university. Especially, in cases that they live
with their friends.
Furthermore, students can visit each other as often as 
ToeflEssays.com
63
they need to. They can maintain a good relationship with
their fellow students in a way that does not affect their
school performance. Alternatively, students who live in
academic dormitories are constantly surrounded with
familiar people so they cannot avoid excessive socializing
even if they don't want to. As a result, they do no have
enough time for studying and the get low grades.
Topic 105 University housing vs. apartment
I think it's better for college students to live on-campus
during their first two years in college, and then move into
an apartment off-campus during their last two years.
Freshmen and sophomores need the convenience of campus
life, while juniors and seniors need the independence
of off-campus life. Students' needs change during
four years, so should their housing too.
Living on-campus makes it easier to get oriented to the
way things going on campus. You get the whole university
experience. Plus, you interact more with other students.
This includes not only with your roommates, but also
everyone in your dormitory. The older students in the
dormitory can be of a big help to the new students. Keeping
up with studies during your first year is hard enough.
You shouldn't have to worry about finding your way
around and figuring out the university bureaucracy.
Living in the dormitory also makes a student feel more
like a member of the university community. There are
more opportunities of becoming involved in university
activities and networking with student leaders and university
administration.
Living off-campus, however, is a definite advantage for
senior students. Finding an apartment, dealing with
leases and the landlord's regulations, cooking meals, and
planning budgets are all good preparations for life after
graduation. This kind of independence helps senior students
grow into adulthood.
Off-campus housing also gives students a better perspective
on what's going on in the society. Students meet different
people in the society than on campus. Getting to
know their neighbors who are not students can enrich
students' understanding to the society and help them
adapt to life after graduation.
In conclusion, I think a combination of two years oncampus
and two years off-campus is a winning combination
for most students.
Topic 106 Means of transportation
Advances in science have thrown before us a number of
options for covering distances, either long or short.
The type of transport to be used for covering distances
depends upon a range of factors like distance between
the and starting point and the destination, time and
money constraint for traveling, availability of different
mode of transports, time taken for travel, safety considerations
and the number of persons traveling.
To cover a distance of 40 miles, for instance, the options I
can think of are on foot, by bicycle, by motorcycle, by car,
or by bus. The longest time taken for traveling this far
will be on foot while the shortest time will be by car or
motorcycle, but again since the number of persons traveling
is one which is me, a car will not be a feasible option
as it will be underutilized and will prove to be costly because
of high fuel consumption and initial cost.
A bicycle will be cheaper in terms of initial cost and there
is no fuel consumption. But it will take much longer time
to travel, and it may cause physical fatigue. Therefore,
this option is ruled out. A bus will prove to be a cheaper
mode but the flexibility is limited regarding timing of arrival
and departure. A motorcycle will be economical but
will not be safe to drive on highways.
Therefore considering all modes of transportation available
and taking into account various factors mentioned
above, I will prefer to take a bus as it will be safe and economical.

Topic 107 Should higher education be available to all?
Some people hold the opinion that university education
should be available to all students, while others believe
that higher education should be available only to good
students. I deem the first one as the premier choice.
The main reason is that providing all students with the
opportunity to obtain higher education is highly beneficial
to the development of modern society. More and
more people will be able to obtain knowledge and become
professionals if higher education is available to all
students. Since there are not only a lot of excellent professors
who have significant experiences of teaching and
research but also plenty of advanced facilities such as
laboratories and libraries at the universities, students
have much better opportunities to acquire knowledge
and skills. If everyone in a society is highly educated,
there will be no doubt that the society will be able to develop
at a great speed.
The second reason is that it is obviously not fair to a lot
of students if a university education is available only to
some students. I am convinced that everyone in the
world should have the same right to acquire knowledge
no matter what his intellectual ability or financial status is.
There is no reason for people to judge students merely
based on their academic performances and decide if they
should be granted with higher education. It is only fair
that everyone has the right to obtaat a university education.

Last but not least, people are able to obtain better jobs
since universities can better prepare students for their
future careers. At universities, there are a lot of opportunities
for students to participate in co-op programs. By
participating in co-op programs, students cannot only
learn how to write resumes but also practice their interviewing
skills. All these skills gained at universities will be
highly conducive for students to quickly obtain job offers
after graduating from universities.
To sum up, taking into account of all these factors, we
may safely reach the conclusion that higher education
should be available to every student. 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
64
Topic 108 The best way of learning
As life is rigorous and challenging for most of people (excluding
children who have a silver spoon in their mouths
right after they were born), everyone needs to take advices
from others or accumulate experiences to face the
life. However, people have different ways to learn about
life. Some tend to learn by listening to advices of family
and friends. Meanwhile, others prefer to learn through
personal experiences. In this essay, I will discuss the advantages
of these two different ways.
Some people like to understand life by listening to advices
of people around them. This offers a good chance
to gain knowledge and experiences from others who
have already experienced hardships and tasted the bitterness
of life. This method is much convenient and faster
than the other one because there are a lot of experiences
in life that have already been experienced by other people.
Other people's opinions and advices simply offer us a
shortcut to success.
On the other hand, young people, however, prefer to
learn about life through their personal experiences.
However, to acquire these experiences, one has to pay a
price. One must have to experience a lot of failures before
he/she can savior the sweetness of success. It may
also take a long time for someone to stand up from his
failures. In addition, it requires a lot of time for people to
accumulate these valuable experiences.
Comparing and contracting these two approaches, I personally
prefer the way that of listening to the advice of
family and friends. This is the best and easiest way for
young people like me to start a real life.
Topic 109 Follow the customs of the new country
Nowadays it is quite common for people to move to
other countries either for work or for study. When they
move, some of them decide to follow the customs of the
new country, while others prefer to keep their own customs.
If I were forced to choose one of the two positions,
my choice would be the former.
To illustrate my point, let us first take a look on why some
people dislike the idea of following the new customs.
First, people who have a strong religious background that
are different from that of the new country tend to stick to
their own religious beliefs. Second, older people are usually
accustomed to their own life styles, and it is very hard
for them to change their ways of life and accept new
ideas and cultures. Thirdly, some values and phenomena
in western countries contradict eastern values, such as
the use of drugs, alcohol and certain behaviors of young
people. So when people move from a traditional eastern
country to a western one, they find it very hard to accept
the new customs.
Although I must admit that it is not always necessary to
change our own customs, I believe that the advantages of
adapting to a new culture are apparent. In the first place,
by following the customs of the new country, we can
learn more about the country and understand its people
more quickly, and can become a real member of the
country. To share the same custom means that having
more things in common with local people, and it can pull
people together. Furthermore, we have to adapt to customs
of the new country, if they are written into the law.
Take the country of Singapore for example, for many
decades the law had banned the consumption of chewing
gums. A young man from the United States violated the
law and was served with their caning punishment.
In addition, people who stick to their way of life may
sometimes feel lonely and isolated. They tend to complain
about the life in the new country and most of them
eventually return to their home countries.
In conclusion, I believe that the advantages of following
the customs of the new country are obvious because you
can easily learn about the new country and quickly adjust
to the new life. What is more, you can live more comfortably
and avoid troubles and misunderstandings in a
foreign country if you think and behave the way other
people do.
Topic 110 Being alone vs. with friends
Some people like to spend most of their time with their
friends. Other people, however, just want to be alone in
their spare time. As far as I am concerned, I belong to the
latter kind of people.
In the first place, I feel comfortable if I am alone. This is
not because I do not like friends, but because of my personal
character, quiet and a bit shy. When I am with my
friends, I always feel embarrassed since I am always a listener.
Trying to find topics makes me very tired. On the
contrary, staying alone does not bother me. I do not
need to discuss with others about what I want to do. Go
shopping, go to a movie, go swimming, just do it. The
most important thing is, I do not feel lonely when I am
alone.
In the second place, I need to have more time to learn
new knowledge. I am working in the field of computer
programming. As we know, the development of the computer
technology is amazingly fast. If a person has not
been working in this field for more than five years, he
would find that he has to study from scratch when he
decides to pick up his old job. So it goes without saying
that I have to update my computer knowledge frequently
in order to keep up with my career. Based on this, I do
not have much spare time to fool around with friends.
In conclusion, I prefer to spend most of my time alone
not only because I am not good at getting along with
friends, but also because I have to spend most of time in
studying new technology.
Topic 110 Life without friends?
There are people in this world that prefer to live on their
own, to stay as far as possible for the company of other
people, to enjoy the silence and comfort of being alone,
without anyone to bother them. For my part, I cannot
imagine my life to be like that. I really think that friends
are very important in my life and I like to spend as much
time as possible with my friends. It is hard for me to enjoy
the splendors of life without having anyone to share
my feelings with. I have too often been away from home,
from my friends and family. 
ToeflEssays.com
65
I have seen wonderful places and things that could make
me incredibly happy. However, the true happiness came
only at the time when I could share my experiences with
my friends. Everywhere I go I need to find at least one
person that in the end I can call a friend. Going to a concert,
to a movie or enjoying a party, it is inconceivable
not to go with a friend. I do not recall ever going to a
concert on my own. And I missed several occasions to go
to events that I really wanted to attend just because my
friends were unable to make it, and I could not go without
them.
Moreover, friends can help each other. It is good to know
that somewhere there is at least one person whom you
can depend on when you are in need. I also enjoy helping
my friends. Doing something good for someone is a
really rewarding experience. While with my friends, we
can also have discussions and share opinions on our future
plans, our ideas, our thoughts, and our problems.
Although there are arguments on the part of leading a life
on your own, and not depending on other people, I
strongly believe that friends, family, people around you
are important part of our life. Life is so wonderful because
the people around you.
Topic 111 One or two friends, or many friends?
I cannot imagine a person who hasn’t enjoyed the company
of a friend. Friends are very precious and therefore,
we constantly love and cherish them. Spending time with
friends has always been regarded as a wonderful thing to
do with no doubt. However, one might choose to spend
time either with one or two close friends or a number of
friends.
Certainly, there is a difference between the enjoyment
gained by spending time with our few close friends and
the delight obtained by hanging out with many friends.
When we are spending time with our close friends, we
can feel a special closeness and bond with them. With the
company of intimate friends, we can be more open and
true to ourselves. Although with few people around the
scope of our activities is limited, it is compensated by the
satisfaction that we gained from the warm atmosphere.
If a person doesn’t like the joy attained from the company
of just few close friends and wants to extend his
activities with more friends, he can choose to spend time
with many friends. When a group of friends gather together
they can engage in many group activities such as
playing games and sports, and travel to new places. This
enjoyment doesn’t necessarily require close relations
among the group members. Being sociable and outgoing
is good enough to create a pleasant ambiance for everyone.

I’d rather choose to spend my time with one or two close
friends than being with a number of friends. With my
close friends around we don’t really have to do anything
in particular together. For us the significance lies in the
fact that we are together, sharing our time. As the saying
goes, “I can spend hours without uttering a single word
with my friend and I’d have the best conversation ever..”
Topic 112 How should children spend their time?
In our rapidly changing world people begin to understand
more and more that nothing is so valuable but
knowledge. Education has become an important part of
people's life. Due to this some people think that children
should begin their formal education at a very early age
and should spend most of their time on school studies.
But others believe that young children should spend
most of their time playing. To my mind these two views
should be balanced so as not to go to the extremes.
The first point of view that children should start early on
their studies make me assume that it can be harmful and
damaging for a child's physical development and personality.
As a teacher I have seen the result of beginning education
too early. Children are deprived of the enjoyment
of their childhood years and their intrinsic desire to play.
Some children cannot concentrate on their study and
keep playing at school. Besides, the children who are not
allowed to play and are forced to study can begin to detest
the education process and the teachers. So, to force
children to study at an early age can spoil the whole picture.

When facing the question of early education it is also important
to note that children who begin to study at an
early age are often overloaded by studying material and
homework, which they are not ready to cope with. Besides
some parents neglect their children and do not pay
enough attention to the children's problems at school
thinking that they are still young.
The second opinion that children should play instead of
study also has disadvantages. In this case children are not
well prepared for their school life at all. They have no
idea what he is going to do at school. In addition, research
shows that early education can benefit children's
brain development and prepare them better for the futures
school education. The most important time for
early education could be missed if parents do not send
their children to school at an appropriate age.
In conclusion I would like to point out that that early
education and play should be well balanced so that their
enjoyment of childhood that is once in a lifetime would
not be deprived. It is quite important for governments to
design and implement an appropriate primary education
system so that young children can have chances to both
learn and play at school.
Topic 113 A new university in the community
It is said that a new university will be established in our
community. Some people think it is better for the community
to have a university. But others do not think so.
As far I am concerned, I think both sides have their own
reasons. Let us get down to the arguments first before we
take a side.
People who hold the opinion of supporting the government's
plan may have their views as follows. For one
thing, a university around here may provide people with
more chances to pursue advanced education. People living
near here can go to the university library at their leisure
time. There they can use the various resources of 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
66
education, such as the book collection, and the computers.
In addition, they can take some part-time continuing
education course to improve their skills at work, or
pursue a higher degree. The other advantage of establishing
a university here is that it may bring the community
an academic atmosphere. With so many educated people
around town, the community makes you feel so peaceful
and in harmony.
People who take the opposite side may present some
disadvantages of building a university near the community.
Firstly, they feel that a university may occupy larger
amount of land and use a lot of money which can be
used for some other purposes: such as a shopping mall
which can make people's life more convenient, or a factory
which can employ a lot of people. The benefits that
can be brought by those facilities are more obvious and
tangible. Secondly, they think that the students at the
university are young people who may sometimes cause
troubles such as drinking, speeding or having wild parties,
which could probably destroy the quite atmosphere of
the community.
All above seems reasonable from their own respective.
Personally I support the idea to establish a university in
the community because it can really give us more chance
to improver ourselves.
For free essay discussion forums and more sample essays,
please visit http://www.toeflessays.com.
Topic 114 Who influence more, family or friends?
Young adults may be influenced by many aspects in forming
their characters and outlooks on the world. Some
people believe that family is the most important influence
on young adults. Others think that friends are the most
important influence on them. Both views base on respective
beliefs.
It is true that friends may exert great influence on young
adults. They may study together in the same school and
share similar experiences. They have much in common
and may share their innermost secrets that they never let
their parents know. Young people are easier to make
friends with each other and communicate without bothering
about the so-called generation gap, which is nevertheless
a common problem existing between young
adults and their families.
However, it's also generally accepted that parents are the
first teachers in the growing process of their children.
Parents teach their children how to utter the first word in
their life, help them to step out their first pace, witness
their first love and give important suggestions when children
need them. On the other hand, children follow their
parents’ examples and even adore them when they are
growing from little children to young adults. They are
usually ready to turn to their parents who have more life
experience than them for advice when they are faced with
important decisions. Therefore, parents who witness
most of the whole growing process of the young adults
till they are mature enough are more important influence
on them than their friends.
Although young adults may reap a lot from their communication
with their friends of similar ages, the most important
influence to their life is always their families.
Topic 115 Plan for free time
In my opinion it is always better to plan our free time
because although it is considered leisure time but some
people might need it to get certain things done that
could not have been finished if they were left to be done
another time.
Probably for most grown-ups free time is only during
their weekends which is usually for one or two days only.
It is actually a very short period of time if you have lots of
things to be done. For this reason planning for leisure
time is very important because there are lots of things
that needs to be done and not all of theses things are for
fun.
For adults, leisure time is not only about waking up late,
spending the whole day in bed or in front of the television
and reading some magazines. In fact if it is well
planned, free time can be used to meet our friends, go to
a restaurant, go to the cinema, go shopping or even read
a nice book. Others may use it to do more important
things such as taking up a new hobby or studying if they
are students. Consequently their time needs to be organized
very well in order to accomplish all the things they
need to do compared to the short time they have.
On the other hand, if we do not keep a list or a schedule
of the things that we should do, we may only finish a
thing or two but time will never be enough for us to accomplish
all the tasks we have. It seems to me that leisure
time should not be left without planning because it is
really important to many people.
Topic 115 Plan for free time
Some people prefer to plan activities for their free time
very carefully. Others choose not to make any plans at all
for their free time. In my opinion, I prefer to plan my free
time carefully, since I can do more things, and I can enjoy
myself more.
First I will go over the advantages of not to making any
plans for my free time. When I do not make plans, I do
not feel restricted by a preset routine, and my activities
can be more spontaneous. In addition, when I have no
plans of my own, it is easier to adapt to what my friends
and family members may be doing. For instance, if I find
out that a friend wishes to go to the beach, I can adjust
myself to his or her plans with perfect freedom.
However, there are more advantages to planning activities
for my leisure time very carefully. By making a careful
plan I can do more things, because I am more organized
and I do not waste time. Moreover, with a plan I can enjoy
myself more. If I have planned ahead I am fully prepared
for the activities I wish to engage in, and I have
nothing to worry about.
Personally, I feel that the advantages of planning activities
for my free time very carefully are greater than the advantages
of not making any plans at all. From these reasons
discussed above, I prefer to plan activities for my leisure
time very carefully. 
ToeflEssays.com
67
Topic 116 Methods of learning
People have different ways to learn knowledge. Some
people learn by doing things; other people learn by reading
books; others learn by listening to people talk about
things. As far as I am concerned, the first method - learning
by doing is suitable for me. The reasons are as follows.
In the first place, I normally have a better understanding
on the things that I learned by doing them. Ten years ago,
after graduated from a university, I began working for an
electronic company, which manufactures color televisions.
During the first several months, I just sat in my
office to read the mechanisms of color television from
books. Those theories seemed to be so abstract to me
that I can only understand 30% of them. So I decided to
go to the production floor to learn about them. After taking
part in the procedure of manufacture, I was surprised
that getting hold of those theories was no longer difficult
to me. I was able to assemble and repair televisions
shortly afterwards.
In the second place, I can remember well when I learn
things by doing them. People always have such an experience:
they can memorize something when picking up a
book and forget it when putting down the book. Knowledge
cannot become yours by reading until you practice
it. Knowledge learned from books is RAM, e.g. erasable
memory; while knowledge learned by doing things is
written in our ROM, e.g. inerasable memory.
In conclusion, I prefer learning by doing things not only
because this method can help me understand things easily,
but also because it can help me memorize things
longer.
Topic 117 Different friends or similar friends?
Some people like friends who are different from them,
while others like friends who are similar. If I have to
make a choice, I prefer similar friends.
Admittedly, the idea of having different friends is not
without advantages. On one hand, contacting with different
friends gives one a broader outlook to life. Different
friends can enrich our experiences by their conducts and
thoughts that are different from ours. In addition, they
can help a person enjoy a variety of interests.
Nonetheless, I believe that similar friends have more advantages.
We can feel confident and strong when we have
a group of friends who share the same opinions. A person
with a purpose in life - such as an artist or a politician
- may feel a special need to surround himself with people
who can assist and encourage him in his work.
In addition, similar friends mean the same way of thinking
and doing things; therefore they are generally more
compatible and easy to get along with. I can think of no
better illustration of the idea than the example of my
roommate and I who both like studying quietly and dislike
loud music, so we can enjoy a quiet environment
together and concentrate on our assignments. We both
go to bed early so none of us would be bothered while
sleeping. Furthermore, it is convenient for similar friends
to communicate and enjoy their leisure time together. My
roommate and I frequently have fun together because we
have the same hobby - playing chess.
For the reasons given above, I would have to declare myself
as one of those prefer similar friends to different
friends.
Topic 118 New experiences vs. usual habits
If one has never experienced the storm, how could one
enjoy the beauty of the rainbow? If one has never experienced
the unknown, how could one enjoy the joys that
life has to offer? Therefore I always welcome new experiences
in my life.
Some people like their lives to stay the same, and they do
not change their usual habits. So all their life, they do not
have many new experiences. They live only one lifestyle.
No matter what happens in the world, they just keep
their life the same way. They will not try a new job with a
higher salary. For years and years they just stay with their
old jobs, and live in the same town or even in the same
house forever. Although some of them may want to lead a
better life, they are not willing to change. They just fear
changes.
We all only have one life, in other words, life is limited for
every one of us, so why not take advantage of our life as
much as we could? The only way to experience more is to
change our usual habits and lifestyles and to try new
things. For example, I have always dreamed of traveling
to different parts of the world to experience different
cultures and customs, to meet different people, and to
enjoy different views and scenic spots. I would even live
in a foreign country for a few years. Then I would really
feel that I have lived a wonderful life.
Some people may say that you would have confronted
much more trouble and difficulties brought by the
changes in life. Yes, but life should consist of sweetness
and bitterness, tears and laughter, that's the way life
should be! If I haven't tasted the bitterness, then how can
I appreciate the sweetness? Different experiences may
help me develop a profound insight into life itself, and
then I could really get to understand the real happiness
of life, and really appreciate the life that I have!
In a word, I always look forward to new experiences in
life, so that I could enjoy my life fully.
Topic 119 Do clothes make a man?
I do strongly support the statement that people behave
differently when they wear different clothes. In other
words, different clothes influence the way people behave.
Some small examples may give some light to the point. I
usually find that those who wear suits and tie behave invariably
the same in general. They probably look selfconfident,
genteel and intelligent, although most of them
do not really have these characteristics. So, what I want to
emphasize here is that clothes work as a symbol today
and people wear them would act like what the clothes
impersonate without being aware of it. We all have the
experience that when we wear a T-shirt and jeans we feel
vigorous and act like a 16-yaer-old boy.
On the other hand, we tend to wear clothes that are ap-
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
68
propriate for the environment. When people go for a job
interview, men will usually wear nice suits and tie, while
women will usually wear fine lady's garments. Because
people understand that "clothes make a man", and nice
clothes can increase their chances of getting that job.
To take this idea further, with the help of different clothes,
we can behave a way that is different from what we usual
look like. For example, when a serious person who has a
frustrating job takes a picnic outdoors, he will dress casually
in order to remind himself that he needs to relax for
this occasion. Another interesting example is that we can
sometimes see from movies that a serious woman who
has a formal job in an office wearing a sexy underwear
and dance like a stripper at night in order to seduce her
husband.
So, as we can see, people really behave differently when
they wear different clothes. So why not slip into casual
clothes and give yourself a break right now?
Topic 120 Are quick decisions always wrong?
I agree with the statements that the decisions that people
make quickly are always wrong. Those quick decisions
that people make are like bids in a gambling. Even if they
have a chance to win, they are still losers theoretically.
People should never make quick decisions without fully
considering the factors that are influencing their decisions
and the consequences of different decisions.
When people make hasty decisions, they rarely care anything
about the situation. Situation is a very important
factor in making a right decision. Different decisions lead
to different results, so it is very important to make a decision
carefully. People who make quick decisions do not
have time to look around and carefully analyze the consequences
resulted by different decisions.
Secondly, there is a popular belief that people should
decide quickly in order to catch opportunities. Unfortunately,
that notion is completely wrong. If you made a
quick decision without thinking carefully, how could you
be able to catch the opportunities? "Chance favors the
prepared mind," as a famous saying goes. Only when you
have fully prepared, can you really grab a good opportunity
when time come. Otherwise the chance that you take
hastily may result in a failure.
Thirdly, even if you can quickly analyze the situation
based on the facts that are provided to you at the time
that you make a decision, since you do not have enough
time to verify the validity of those information, the information
could be wrong, which could leads to wrong decisions.
Even the president of the United States can make
this kind of mistake. Mr. Bush made a decision to start
the War on Iraq based on the false information that his
subordinates provided to him, which claims that Iraq has
dangerous biochemical weapons. Maybe someday history
will prove that the decision to start the War was wrong.
Life is not a lottery. Life is a stock market. Only when you
make careful decisions based on thorough analysis, can
you win. If you make quick decisions, chances are that
these decisions will happen to be wrong, and you may
lose everything down to your underwear.
Topic 121 Are first impressions trustworthy?
In our social life, we may meet different people in different
occasions. Some of them we may meet once; others
may be staying with us for a long time, such as our classmates,
or our colleagues. Some people trust their first
impressions because they believe these judgments are
generally correct. While other people do not judge a person
quickly because they think first impressions are often
wrong. Before I give my opinion, I want analyze the two
opinions first.
For those who trust first impressions, they may argue as
follows. For one thing, before two people first meet, they
have no ideas about what the other person is like, and
then they may have no inclination to cater to each other
by behaving differently. At those circumstances, it is a
little bit easy to get to know the person's real character
because they may behave naturally. In addition, some
mysterious factors such as instinct may involve in the first
impression which usually is proved to be the right one
with no reasonable account, as is especially occurred in
many married couple's first meeting.
The other group of people who do not believe in first
impression also have their reasons. First, people's characters
are different and complex. It is very hard to get to
know them at the first meeting. If you want to know a
person, you have to spend lot of time to talk to them, and
observe their behaviors at different occasions, and all
these cannot be accomplished just in a few hours. Second,
many people do not behave naturally when they meet
strangers, so the first meeting will not be a good chance
to know a person.
We can see that both the two sides have their reasons. But
I prefer not to judge people in our first meetings. Because
to me, I'm not very good at judging people and my
first impressions are usually unreliable.
Topic 122 Should people be satisfied
In contemporary society, there are new things coming up
almost every day. Some people have to face such a fact
that you can never buy a real new product, because the
new one always appears after you have bought one. As a
result, some of them are never satisfied with what have
and they want to get something newer or something different.
To some extent, it is a good way to keep up with
the ceaselessly changing world. However, in my opinion,
it is not always good not to satisfy what you already have.
For one thing, with the development of science and technology
as well as the globalization, more and more brand
new things are produced every day, along with a variety
of new findings, new lifestyles, and new types of services.
If we ignore all the new things and always stay what we
are, the only result may be that we will be obsolete in the
society. In some degree, if we all stick with old things,
there will be no new inventions and advancement of the
world. The continuous needs in people's spirits can really
push our society forward. Human beings live in a modern
society after all, and we should have the desire to be in
pursuit of a new life.
However, on the other hand, if we sought after material 
ToeflEssays.com
69
satisfactions without considering our financial reality, we
could find ourselves in trouble. As we know, new products
are manufactured and updated almost every day, so
there is little possibility that you can always obtain the
newest products. Moreover, every time a new comes into
markets, the price is always much higher than older
products. If you do not have a strong financial background
to support your desire, how could you be able to
afford them? For example, some people borrow money
from their credit card for new and fancy products without
considering their affordability. In the end they get into
financial crisis.
The purpose that we look for new and different things is
to live better and happier. If your desires only get you
into worries and troubles, it will be a better choice to
learn to give up and be satisfied. In a word, living in a
modern society, we must in pursuit of our life with a
flexible attitude.
Topic 122 Should people be satisfied
Many of the world's religions share a belief that when a
person is able to look at and confess his or her problems
that person can begin to travel the on road to emotional
recovery. A problem cannot be solved until it is clearly
recognized. I agree with the above statement because I
believe that dissatisfaction and suffering forces people to
change.
History presents many examples of dissatisfaction and
change. The history of China in this century might be
seen as one of dissatisfaction and progress. Sun Yet San
was discontented with the decaying imperial order, and
so he created the "Revolution." Mao was dissatisfied with
the course of events so he intensified the revolution; finally,
Deng pushed the Chinese economy towards a freemarket
economy. Hence, China progressed towards its
newfound "superpower" status.
In a not dissimilar way, during the eighteenth century
many Americans became annoyed with the British regime
and they start to fight for the freedom and independence.
Hence the most powerful country in the world - the
United States was created.
On a personal level, dissatisfaction can lead to changes
within friendship and marriage. Perhaps it might even be
said that true love cannot remain static. Matrimony and
friendship are explorations of the higher emotions: they
are pilgrimages towards the city of true values. If husband
and wife are prepared to confront and discuss their problems,
a blue period can give way to many years of happiness.
Sometimes, for instance, a spouse may not recognize
that the source of marital unhappiness is that the
other partner has developed a need to have children.
Whatever else may be said, most people would agree that
children change the lives of their parents.
The best method of utilizing dissatisfaction is to change
things before they get out of hand. An intelligent man will
constantly monitor his emotions; an intelligent politician
will understand the mood of his people. Some people
might suggest that the transition to independence for
Canada and Australia was much smoother than that of the
United States because Britain allowed those two dominions
to evolve with time. To take the idea further, a good
parent or an astute politician will even anticipate potential
dissatisfactions and therefore take precautions.
I agree with the above statement because, I believe that
we are can grow up through dissatisfaction. Without the
ability to recognize our discontent, we could collapse
into illness. Suffering sharpens our senses.
Topic 123 Non-fictions vs. fictions
How could anyone suggest that people should only read
about real events, real people, and established facts? For
one thing, that means people would not be reading half
of all the great books that have ever been written, not to
mention the plays, short stories and poetries. For another,
it would mean that people's imaginations would not develop
and would remain uninspired throughout their
lives.
Reading stories as a child helps develop our creativity
since fictions teach us a lot about how to convert words
into mental images. Fictions open our world up, exposing
us to other times and different ways of living. Reading
histories of those times would serve the same purpose,
but histories are probably not as sharply and vivid as fictions.
Reading an essay about poverty in Victorian England
is not the same thing as reading Charles Dickens'
Oliver Twist. The image of a small boy being suffered in
cold, poverty and hard labor are more horrifying than
simply reading the statement, "Children were sold into
labor". Reading fictions makes a more lasting impression
in our minds and emotions about the past.
Besides, storytelling is an emotional need for human beings.
From earliest times, humans have taught their children
about life, not by telling them facts and figures, but
by telling them stories. Some of these stories show what
people are like (human nature), and help us experience a
wide range of feelings. Some tell us how we should act.
Telling a child that it's wrong to lie will make little impression,
but telling him the story of a little boy whose
nose grows longer every time he tells a lie will make a
much stronger impression.
Fiction is too important to our culture, our minds, and
our emotions. How could we ever give it up!
Topic 124 Social science vs. natural science
The chances of receiving education are considered the
most fundamental right of human beings in the 21st century.
Naturally, the argument about what the students
should acquire at schools has attracted many attentions
from people of various walks of life. In considering the
obligatory courses required at schools, people have different
ideas. Some would hold the view that it is more
important for students to study science and mathematics
than it is for them to study history and literature.
I agree with this point of view completely. Although both
social and natural science courses play an important role
in the whole education system, natural science seems to
have a greater impact on human progress. Our society is
developing at a high speed quite unprecedented before. 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
70
One cannot deny the fact that all of these results came
directly from scientific discoveries. An example is that
during the period of industrial revolution, it is science
and mathematics that brought many inventions and discoveries
such as assembly lines, mending machines and
electric appliances which has freed the most of people
from manual labors once and for all.
The above reason I pointed out does not mean that literature
and history cannot improve people's lives but
they have few advantages to people's material life especially
to those poor people who are still struggling for the
essential needs of shelters and foods. Literature and history
cannot be put into practice to some extent. Research
and development of science and mathematics on the contrary
can be applied to our real life and improve our living
standard. Take medical science for example, the new
findings of treatments of certain diseases can save lives of
many people. There still exist some fatal diseases that
threaten people's lives. All this will depend on the development
of medical science.
In short, all courses involving literature and history, science
and mathematics are necessary and important to
students. However, according to the reasons I discussed
above, I want to make the judgment that science and
mathematics course are more useful.
Topic 125 Should art be compulsory subject?
I totally agree with the statement that all students should
be required to study art and music in secondary schools.
It comes as a direct interpretation of the apothegm 'All
work and no fun, makes Jack a dull boy'. The education
of art and music is necessary to provide for that spice in
life. The stress of life can be easily alleviated by the use of
art or music, something that interests and titillates the
individual. In secondary schools, students are like wet
mud; they can be molded with the shapes one likes. Art
and music are activities that bring out a softer, mature
and a complete person. Without them, life tends to become
dull and burdensome.
Students tend to get bored of pedantic learning, and
need a break from regular classroom education in the
forms of art and music. Providing good facilities to capable
students enhances their talents in art and music.
Moreover students can develop their inter-personal skills
when participating in extra co-curricular activities such as
instrument, vocal and painting groups. The sense of
honor will encourage them to improve their results on
science courses.
Art and music are an integral part of a complete human
being. They are one of the essential ingredients of life. So
in order to develop students with full personalities, secondary
schools should impart art and music knowledge
to its students. On the other hand students should not be
forced to take up some form of art or music. It should be
entirely optional for students to choose whatever forms
of art or music that interest them.
It is art and music that differentiate humans from animals.
The serenity and tranquility that music and arts provide
only human can enjoy.
Topic 125 Should art be compulsory subject?
Life cannot be full without understanding and appreciating
the greatest culture inheritances from our earlier
generations such as arts and music. Secondary school
prepares us to enter into college and adult life. Therefore
all students should be required to study art and music in
secondary schools.
Arts are a part of our life. From antique cave drawings to
African tribal crafts, from Indian totem poles to modern
buildings, arts are everywhere. Not to mention those art
exhibitions in art galleries and museums, which attract
hundreds of millions of people to visit them each year.
Even our home equipments are made with a touch of art.
Arts are ubiquitous.
Music is also an important cultural heritage of human
being and remains a part of our present. It is common
sense that music can relax our body and soul. For example,
by listening to classical music that are played by traditional
instruments, while gaining knowledge about the
history and stories behind these music, students can
really improve their knowledge, cultivate their spirits and
broaden their views.
Studying arts and music in high school also allow students
to take a break between those mentally demanding
courses such as math and physics. These arts and music
course can even help students improve their results in
math and physics, because a good relaxation can help
students concentrate more later on.
I am high school student myself and I believe that all students
should be required to take arts and music courses
during their secondary school years. It is not necessary
for students to learn arts in order to become artists; but it
is definitely necessary for students to learn to appreciate
arts.
For free essay discussion forums and more sample essays,
please visit http://www.toeflessays.com.
Topic 126 Can young people teach older people?
Who says only old people can teach young people? We
admit that older people have much more experiences
than our young people, and it is true that they can give us
much guidance when we encounter problems or unsolvable
difficulties. However, with the rapid development of
the modern society, young people can also teach the
older people a lot. They can update knowledge about
new technologies for the elders, share attitudes towards
life with them and bring freshness into their lives.
Since living in a very fast developing society, we need to
make contact with many new technologies everyday. In
other words, we need to learn everyday to keep up with
the latest development. For example, computers are now
very popular, but we seldom see the elders use computers.
If they can learn how to use them from young
people, they will definitely be beneficial from it because
computers have brought a lot of changes to our lives and
bring us new experiences. Young people are known for
their quick understanding and acceptance new things, so
that I think they can teach the older about new technologies
used in our daily life. 
ToeflEssays.com
71
The attitudes of young people are totally different from
old people. Mostly they are more positive and energetic
than old people. They have a different angle to judge
things. Sometimes the elders are passive towards life because
they went through a lot of frustrations. On the contrary,
young people are full of energy towards the life,
and they are always optimistic. They proudly say because
they are young, they can try millions of times. In some
degree, young people's attitudes may influence old people.

Young people also can share with old people what they
like, which may result a change of old people. As we
know, most young people like popular music. I have a
friend who likes Japanese music very well; everyday she
plays this music at home. Her grandmother often asks her
to stop the music and asks her why she likes it. My
friend tells her grandmother about the history of Japanese
music and shows her a lot of examples. Gradually
her grandmother likes Japanese music as well, which
made us so surprised. Now if we go to their house, we
can see my friend and her grandmother listening Japanese
music together and share the feelings as well. You
must be surprised like me when you know the story, but
it did happen.
So, no matter what age group you belong to, we must
believe that everyone has something to share with others
and to teach others. Old people can give the youngsters'
lessons and guidance, on the other hand, young people
also can teach the elders new things and different ways
towards life.
Topic 126 Can young people teach older people?
To my ear this statement sounds false and a little too farefetched.
It is truth universally acknowledged that the old
people have volumes of experience, while the young have
the energy and lots of creative power. Therefore I think
that it's not suitable to take sides in this situation. Because
in my view there is no way to determine who is
better - the old or the young.
Obviously, each of these groups has its own positives and
negatives. I suppose they should co-operate and be helpful
to one another rather than try to rival. The exchange
should be done for their own mutual benefits. Even
though the old people possess a great deal of experience,
it is sometimes not enough for surviving in the changing
modern world. That's why they often get stuck with their
dated information, without being able to break free from
their own prejudice.
In many cases the old people are used to their old ways
and, I imagine, it must be really hard for them to get adjusted
to the new environment. But one should always
remember that, like it or not, only the fittest survive.
Therefore, if the old people don't want to become extinct
as dinosaurs did, they should rather learn some ways
from the young. The thing is that the young people are
way more flexible to all of the little changes happening in
their everyday life. It is easier for them to get up-to-date
and to face the fact that some old ways are no longer
valid. For them it is not a difficult thing to come to terms
with. I guess that this is something that could be of some
use for the elder people as well. If they have lots of experience
to give, the young can teach them lots of flexibility
in return.
In fact, I personally think that there are many things that
the young can teach older people and flexibility is just
one of them. But the problem is sometimes that the old
are very unlikely to be willing to accept this kind of
searching with their arms wide open. Most of the times
they are conservative and prefer to stick to their old ways.
Topic 126 Can young people teach older people?
An English proverb goes, "You can't teach an old dog new
tricks." With all due respect to this folk wisdom, I have to
admit that it sounds somewhat dated to me. At the same
time I agree that almost every saying has a grain of truth
to it, and this one is no exception. Nor is another one?
There is no fool like an old fool. As it can easily be seen,
the two sayings contradict each other, which may seem
terribly confusing. Nevertheless I would like to pursue
the subject at some length and try to find out which one
is in the right.
It goes without saying that the old dog has quite a lot of
experience. During its lifetime it has learnt a lot of different
tricks that now make it feel happy and content with
itself. I believe it deserves all kind of respect and admiration,
since it has done a pretty good job. But one should
always remember that the kind of tricks it has been doing
up to now are old-fashioned and not up-to-date anymore.
There now exists a marvelous opportunity to do all of
them over again in a better, more sophisticated way. It is
not surprising that a young dog would be way more dexterous
in performing those tricks.
Moreover, it can create some innovative, brand-new ways
that an old dog has never even dreamed about. Therefore
I suppose that the old dog should appreciate this neverending
source of energy and ideas, and maybe even pick
up some of them. If the old dogs don't want to be considered
off-the-shelf, they should rather be flexible and
get with the times. "You are never too old to learn"
shrewdly reminds them another popular saying. But still
there is no way for the mature dogs to humbly imitate
their own puppies. It is advisable for them to share the
accumulated knowledge with the young, to be more
helpful and willing to co-operate.
At the same time, all of this will be accepted more easily if
the old dogs don't try to impose their experience on the
young. Then the latter would undoubtedly greet their
teachings with their arms wide open. Both the old and
the young should never forget that they are living in the
same world that belongs equally to the first group as to
the second. Even though the modern world is changing
all the time, there still are ways to get adjusted to it for
both.
All metaphors aside, I guess that the young and the old
must be very loyal to each other. They should exchange
their experience and whatever else they have to give to
each other. To get back to where I started? Nor the first
nor the second saying is totally correct. As usual, the
truth is somewhere in the middle. 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
72
Topic 127 Fiction vs. movies
Watching movies is a much better option compared to
reading fiction. So I disagree that reading fiction is more
enjoyable than watching movies. In fact movies provide a
first hand experience with real emotions. Also movies can
be watched with the company of others, thus making for
healthy relationships.
Movies are generally much better received compared to
novels or short stories. They tend to be much more exciting
and surely provide real-time first hand experience.
Reading fiction, more often than not, gives only vicarious
pleasure.
Also movies are a much better option for real emotions.
The scenes, physiognomy of characters and background
music all add up to a great experience. Howsoever good
a piece of fiction is, it leaves much to be desired. The way
movies exhibit a wide gamut of emotions and experiences
are difficult to find in fiction books.
Another major reason for movies being more enjoyable is
that one can watch movies in company of others. No such
sharing is possible in reading fiction. There is nothing
like enjoying a movie with the person you love, or your
family members, it provides the warmth to make for a
pleasurable experience.
In conclusion, I derive much greater fun, joy and excitement
from watching movies, than by reading fiction. According
to me, movies will always hold the upper hand.
Topic 128 Physical exercise vs. academic study
I am surely of the opinion that physical exercise should
be a required part of every school day. Even a small session
of exercise, but a regular one, can go a long way to
give a balanced body. The rest of the school day can take
care of academic studies. The common saying 'All work
and no play makes John a dull child' holds water here.
Also a balanced body allows one to have a balanced mind
on top of it. A small part of the day devoted to exercise
can take a long way in preventing future health risks.
Moreover in the age of fast-food getting rid of the couch
potato image is essential for today's young generation.
It can easily be reasoned that students have better concentration
if they exercise regularly. The mind runs fresh
only if the body supports it. Students always need a break
from the daily tedious lectures, and exercise can provide
it in the best way.
Another important reason to have daily physical exercise
is its long-term benefits. Researchers have shown that
daily dose of exercise can greatly reduce the risks of many
diseases, especially heart problems. Physical exercise can
act as a handy weapon against the rising obesity at school
students.
For maintaining good health, one always needs to do
physical exercise daily. So why not do it in the discipline
of the school? An entire day of academic studies can make
life dull for students, and exercise can act as a pleasant
escapade.
Topic 129 Business research vs. agricultural research
There are two kinds of opinions concerning the plan to
develop a research center in our country. One is to develop
a business research center and the other, a agriculture
research center. Taking consideration of the current
situation in China, I strongly recommend the former because
it will help to solve the urgent problems in our
country.
First of all, a business research center will help to develop
the economy. At present, the global economy is
slowing down and there is no evidence indicating that
the recovery will come any time soon. Our biggest trading
partners such as the United States and Japan fall into
economic plight. As result, the exportations to those
countries and direct investment from them are decreasing.
The most important task is how to keep the economy
growing healthily. The center will help to complete this
task by exploring new business opportunities to increase
exporting and helping enterprises adjust themselves.
Secondly, a business research center will help to solve
the problem of unemployment. With the reform of state
owned enterprises, more and more workers employed by
those enterprises lost their jobs. Our economic reform
and adjustment is going through a vital stage. A business
research center will help the enterprise figure out how to
solve this problem and the unemployed people will have
a chance to get jobs in new business fields.
Finally, it will help to solve China's rural problems. China
has a big population, and nearly 70 percent of its population
is farmers, namely, 700million farmers in China.
Now the rural problem is focused on farmers who have
been released from arable lands with the development of
new technology can get their jobs. A business research
center will help to develop rural economy in the industrial
and service fields that can absorb the enormous
number of farmers.
Based on the reasons I present above. I believe a business
center will play a strong role at present than a agriculture
research center does. As result, I support the plan to develop
a business research center in our country.
Topic 129 Business research vs. agricultural research
Since the announcement of the University's plan to develop
a new research center in our country, many people
have showed their concern for the project and expressed
their views of type of center it should be. It is now clear
that the diversified views have converged to two: a business
research center or an agriculture research center.
Now that we have to make a decision, I think we should
choose the latter without hesitation.
As everybody knows, our country is an agricultural country
whose farming produce is not enough to feed its own
people. We have no way out but to develop our agriculture
because agriculture is the foundation of our national
economy and because it would be a disaster to the whole
world if we rely on foreign food to feed the biggest population
in the world.
To develop our agriculture, we cannot just call on the
peasants to work harder because they have being working 
ToeflEssays.com
73
the hardest from generation to generation. What we
should do is to raise their educational level and provide
them with better seeds, more fertilizers, advanced machinery
and equipment, and up-to-date technical advice.
In short, we have to rely on science and technology to
develop our agriculture.
Some people would say that this couldn't be a convincing
reason because science and technology are needed not
only in agriculture but also in all other fields. My view is
that our situation in agriculture is the most serious and
the challenges are the greatest. Ours is a big country with
widely different climates and soil conditions. If we are to
assist the peasants, we have to study all types of crops
and all the farming conditions in this land. With a research
center, these problems can be studied and solved
systematically. But so far, no agriculture research center
worthy of the name has been set up while there is already
a business center in the southern part of the country.
Because of the above reasons, I strongly recommend that
we develop a research center for agriculture purpose and
I also strongly recommend this center be well funded. If
wee take this step and succeed in this endeavor, our agricultural
produce will be greatly increased and our whole
national economy will have a solid foundation.
Topic 130 Children and sports
Currently some young children spend a great amount of
their time in practicing sports. Most parents feel quite
happy because sports are good for their kids' development
and team work spirit, however they are quite worried
about some negative effects such as practicing sports
occupies too much time, distracts their attentions on
schoolwork and loses certain interests on other activities.
In my opinion, everything has its good side and bad side.
The important thing is to handle it properly.
Admittedly, practicing sports can help children's physical
development, which makes them grow faster and
stronger than before. As we know, during children's development
periods, especially from 10 to 16 years old,
sports are really helpful for children to develop. Sports
can create a strong body that reduces the possibility of
contracting some diseases easily. Definitely we believe
that children benefit from sports.
Another good thing is that sports teach us to learn how to
corporate with other members in a team. Most sports are
team work. If we want to play them well, we must master
some skills to care about what our team members are
thinking and how to adapt each other to achieve a common
goal. Sports are not an individual activity, it needs
corporation and mutual understanding. This is not easy
to master. Of course, for parents they are delightful to see
their children to get this skill from sports.
On the other hand, practicing sports seem to occupy too
much of children's spare time to concentrate their schoolwork.
As a student, one's major task is to study hard and
try to learn as much as possible, which needs students to
devote much time on study or their spare time. If children
devote themselves in practicing sports, it is not denying
that they cannot concentrate them on schoolwork
at the same time. The consequence of practicing sports
too much leads children to distract themselves, which
influences their future.
Actually, besides sports, there are still many kinds of activities,
such as drawing, collecting, good for their developments.
If a child is too concentrated on sports, it is
inevitable that he will lack of chances to explore other
activities and lose some happiness when engaged in different
experiences.
Overall, on one hand, we should encourage our children
to participate in sports activities; on the other hand, we
must also remind them not to be too engaged because
they should put study at the first place during their
school time. There is a limit of doing everything.
Topic 131 Money and success
Since people's criteria for success differ, there is much
debate over whether only those who make a lot of money
are successful. As far as I am concerned, in today's society
that stresses on individual achievement, money provides
the best evaluation of one's accomplishment.
To begin with, as a standardized measurement used for
comparing values, money is objective rather than subjective,
so it is considered an authentic reflection of one's
achievement. As different people hold different understandings
of success, assessing the amount of one's earnings
has become universally accepted as a rule to measure
one's success. Each year, Fortune Magazine publishes
a special issue to rank the top 100 most successful people
throughout the world according to their yearly income,
because there are no other methods to rely on.
In addition, the amount of money one makes is the consequence
of one's hard work and talent. To deny the accomplishment
wealth brings is equal to deny the sources
from which it springs. In the past, I only believed in spiritual
values and then leapt rashly to the conclusion that
the best thing in life involves no money at all. It is my
uncle who showed me the significance of money and
changed my opinion. He told me he respected money
and made it a goal to strive for in his way towards success.
Because he would have to pay a price for it in terms of
time, thought and energy. Gradually, I came to realize it
is the mental and physical labor he devotes in the process
of making money that paves his way for selfaccomplishment,
and thus deserves appreciation and
respect.
Finally, money is the most powerful possession in one's
lifetime. As everyone knows, success is the ability to do
whatever one wants to and to be satisfied with oneself.
There is hardly anything that can be done without a certain
amount of money. Indeed, with money, one can
meet his or her material demand in life, such as taking
effective medicines, living in magnificent houses, eating
various delicious food, and so on. Also, with money, one
can do a lot of meaningful things to benefit others, such
as donations to poor people. All these will not only satisfy
one's need for personal fulfillment, but also add grandness
to one's success.
In conclusion, money serves as a measurement of one's 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
74
achievement. But we should keep in mind that only those
who obtain money by hardworking and use it to benefit
the society are really successful.
Topic 132 A new product
I live in a place where the environment is being degraded
alarmingly and the desert is expanding rapidly. Subsequently,
the people around here are suffering a lot from
this vicious environmental vicissitude. So to change the
current situation is a great challenge for the people living
here. I believe to invent an electronic plant grower is significant
to curb the environmental degradation.
Firstly, weather condition is too severe to grow any plants
here. It is not efficient for us to afforest in such a vast area
either. Furthermore, if the plants could not get the basic
supplies like water, amicable weather conditions, it is
almost impossible for plants to survive. The invention of
electronic plant grower could be scientific enough, when
it plants grass or trees, it will automatically put solid ice
and other trace elements which could enhance the viability
of plants. Thus, the newly planted plants could easily
survive in it.
Secondly, the electronic plant grower could do a lot of
onerous works in the field and tolerate unfavorable
weather. It can extend to the most remote place to work
where there are no residents at all, but could build up
effective protection barrier to mitigate sandstorm. Furthermore,
the electronic plant growers consume no water,
which is precious resource in the desert. They can work
day and night and take full time of planting season to
plant as much as plants.
Thirdly, to afforest in such a vast and tough area, it needs
numerous manpower for planting in short season and
taking care of the plants. As an advanced robot, the invented
electronic plant growers could reduce the pressure
of manpower and keep the live human away from
the life limit area.
To rehabilitate the environment is important more than
anything else here, but the environmental rehabilitation
could not do without some high-tech duplicate of human
being like electronic plant grower. So I expect its birth
with great hope.
Topic 132 A new product
In most countries, people have to spend a lot of time
learning a second language while at school. However,
there're hundreds of different languages in the world, no
one can learn them all. One of the most famous philosophers,
Marx could speak more than ten different languages,
which is already extraordinary for human beings.
The difference between languages is a great handicap of
communication between people from countries all over
the world. A group of people planned to make a global
language and ask everybody to learn, but finally the plan
failed. Now there is a great need for an invention that can
solve this problem.
If I could invent something new, I would develop an electronic
translator. Unlike electronic dictionary, which can
just translate a word into different languages, it can also
translate a whole paragraph even a whole book into different
languages. What's more, it can even translate the
language you speak orally into other languages. For example,
when you speak " Hello" in English, it will say
"Nihau" in Chinese automatically when you switch it to
Chinese.
It's obvious that this kind of invention is needed, and
when it's invented, I believe it will spread out to everywhere
in the world immediately. Then people will not
have to waste a lot of time to learn foreign languages, and
the communication between people from different countries
will become much easier. Moreover, it will enhance
the speed of globalization, which benefits everybody in
the world.
For it to be invented, there's still a long way to go. But
the science and technology is developing and more and
more new things have been invented. In the future, the
electronic translator will be invented, and it will bring
people more convenience.
Topic 132 A new product
People will normally invent something that they want
very much in the real life if they had the ability. As a father
of a two-year-old boy, I would make a baby sitter
robot. The reasons are as follows.
In the first place, a baby-sitter robot can take care of my
baby when I go to work. There will be a dilemma in front
of parents when they have a child, who should stay at
home and who should continue to work, mother or father?
With a baby-sitter robot, they do not need to make a
choice. Parents will no longer give up their jobs because
of their child.
In the second place, a baby-sitter robot can make my
baby stay away from danger. A person cannot concentrate
on one thing 24 hours a day. It will be dangerous when
he/she is taking care of a baby. A baby is so unpredictable
that you never know what he/she will do in the next minute.
For instance, the baby may swallow a coin or fall to
the ground from the bed when you just do not look at
him/her for a second.
However, a robot does not have such a problem because
she is never tired. She can keep an eye on the baby all the
time. Any potential dangerous action will be prevented.
Even when the baby is sleeping, the robot can still watch
the baby if you want. In addition, a baby-sitter robot can
entertain the baby. Songs and stories can be inputted in
the robot's memory and replayed whenever the baby
needs them. It is so easy to change them that the baby
will never be bored on one song or story.
In conclusion, I would like to invent a baby-sitter robot
not only because it can take care of my baby for me, but
also because it can make my baby safe and happy.
Topic 133 Are childhood years most important in life?
A person's childhood years are indeed the most important
years of his life and I agree with this statement.
The initial years of childhood are the time when a person
learns a lot about himself and his family and the society.
A child's mind is impressionable and he imbibes values
and behavior that he gets to see around him. So the role 
ToeflEssays.com
75
of his family and school is of utmost importance.
It has been seen that children who get the love and support
of their parents and teachers in their childhood turn
out be mature and emotionally balanced teenagers and
adults. On the other hand, if we look at the childhood of
criminals and other anti social elements, we will find that
most of them have been through tough times as children.
They were deprived of proper care and upbringing. Delinquents
also have a history of abuse in their childhood
many a times.
Children are always inquisitive and willing to learn. When
they are provided a stimulating environment in which
they can develop their talents and learn to enjoy their
work, they become good citizens who are an asset to the
nation. Family is the most important institution in a
child's formative years because parents are children's role
models. Children develop their ethics, moral values and
temperament in tune with what they see in their parents
and elder siblings. The type of personality that a child
develops is difficult to change later.
So I firmly believe that childhood is a vital part of a person's
life that plays an important role in shaping his future.

Topic 134 Should children do household tasks?
Should children be required to help with household tasks
as soon as they are able to do so? People have different
opinions. Some people think that parents can do all the
household tasks without children's help, children are still
too young to do house work and sometimes they even
make things worse. Other people, however, argue that it
is very useful for children to take part in the household
work. As far as I am concerned, I agree with the second
opinion.
In the first place, children may have the sense of contribution
when they take part in household tasks. After a
child was born, the parents are always the part that gives,
such as feeding, changing clothes, and bathing the baby.
Others help children because they are too young to do
these tasks. When they grow up, they will gradually have
the ability to do something, such as washing clothes for
themselves, cleaning the room for themselves. If they are
required to do what they can do, after finishing their jobs
and looking at the result of their jobs, such the clean
clothes and the clean room, children will have a strong
sense of contribution and success, which will help them
form a good personal character.
In the second place, participating the household tasks
will teach children how to cooperate with other people.
For instance, When doing a house cleaning, one person
cannot finish it all by oneself. Different tasks should be
divided among several people. For example, dad cleans
the windows, mom cleans the kitchen, boys clean the
floor and girls decorate the wall. Gradually, children will
get to know that they need to cooperate with others to
make things done better and faster.
Topic 135 Should students wear uniforms?
I hate uniforms! It makes all the students look the same.
When I am trying to find my friend from a group of student,
I always make mistake because I cannot tell the difference
among the girls who are all wearing the same
clothes. Moreover, I am always nervous about my uniforms
since I may not have another one to change into.
The other one is still waiting to be washed or is still wet.
After P. E., you cannot identify which coat is mine, so I
just take one that looks like it. I am sure the coat I am
wearing now is not the one I had first. That is my life with
uniforms.
Because everyone is against it, my school revoked this
rule. Then, we could wear everything we want to. But
new problems came up. Everyone began to buy new,
brand name, expensive clothes and the campus because a
big stage in no time. At last, the uniforms came back to
our lives.
Undoubtedly, everyone has the freedom to choose what
to wear and, of course, everyone wants to make himself/herself
good-looking. But when we are just students,
study is our first important thing to do. Paying too much
attention to attire can influence our study. Furthermore,
we may spend too much money that is not earned by
ourselves but come from our parents' hard working.
The reasons above cause more and more schools make a
rule to forbid trendy dresses or make students wear uniforms.
It is not a good way but an effective way to solve
these problems.
If we want to get rid of uniforms forever, we must solve
these problems by ourselves instead of the schools rule.
We should earn school's trust by our behavior, then we
can thoroughly say goodbye to uniforms!
Topic 135 Should students wear uniforms?
When asked about what to wear to school-uniforms or
not, some people hold the opinion that to wear school
uniforms is better than to wear other clothes one want to
in many ways. Others, however, stand a very different
ground. Personally, I prefer to wear school uniforms because
it has more advantages.
There are numerous reasons for me to believe to wear
uniforms are better and I would in here explain few important
ones. The main reason is that to wear school uniforms
can make the students more concentrate on study.
It can be given a concrete example that students go to a
school that requires them wear their uniforms will surely
have less trouble in picking clothes to wear every morning.
And they will not pay their attention to the clothes
others wear; this means they can be more concentrated
on the study.
Another reason why I advocate the attitude of that wearing
uniforms is better lies in the fact that the uniforms is
specially designed for the students. I believe it suits for
them very much and can do well to the students at
school. On the contrary, some of the students do not
know what is good for them, and will choose some
clothes that do not suit them or even do harm to them. 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
76
All these demonstrate the undeniable fact that to wear
uniforms at school is better.
Of course, choosing to decide what to wear to school also
have advantages to some extend, this enable the students
to develop the habit of making choice all by themselves,
that is to make decision themselves. If all the factors are
completed, the advantages of wearing uniforms carry
more weight than that of not. From what we have discussed
above, we may safely draw the conclusion that
wearing uniform at school is better.
Topic 135 Should students wear uniforms?
It is a confusing question to decide whether to wear regulative
school uniforms or not. Although school uniforms
will not make everyone satisfied, the advantages of wearing
school uniforms outnumber those of the opposite
views.
An important function of school uniforms is let young
students focus on studying, not diverting to compete
with other classmates' clothes. If school uniforms do not
exist, being easily impressible, children will pay much
attention to what their friends and stars on TV wear to
show fashionable, fancy and stylistic pattern. It is reasonable
to make the young people wear uniform to prevent
them from diversion of studying.
Furthermore, school uniforms save money for students'
parents. Because of love, they hardly refuse to buy new
clothes for their children even though they really do not
need yet. The young consider little about money and
have small resistance to the temptations of the fashionable
T-shirts and jeans, and their parents usually spoil
their children. So school uniforms can help students
learn frugality, plainness and neatness are much more
worthy than fashion.
The last but not the least reason for school uniform is to
strength the spirits of students' organization and the
obeying of regulations. That moral practice will benefit
them to the preparation for future occupation and experience.

In short, school uniforms are in use of students' study
distraction, frugality, and moral benefits. We can safely
draw the conclusion that school uniforms are valuably
recommended.
Topic 136 Is winning important in a game?
The statement in the direction is a long-term consideration
of many people including me. Many people will argue
that playing a game is only fun when you win. I,
however, after thinking about it on many occasions, decide
to stand up against this view for the following reasons.

The first and the most important reason for my opposing
the idea is that playing a game, no matter you win or lose,
helps release a person from the heavy pressure, in most
cases, resulted from intellectual activities. There is no
better example than myself when I was trying so hard to
enter the university. At that time, when I was too exhausted
to memorize any single incident in the history
book, a play of badminton would refill me with fresh energy
to go back to my studies, though I hardly won any of
these badminton games as my partner is an excellent
player. Therefore, the biggest advantage of playing games
lies in the fact that it helps people relaxed.
Another reason for my disagreement is that one will find
out his or her capacity of making progress while playing a
game. When learning a new game, if your opponent is a
more mature player than you are, it is for sure that you
will not win him or her at the beginning, but in the process
of the game, if you are a conscientious player, you will
definitely learn to grasp the basic skills of a certain game,
which enable you to play better and better. Consequently,
the awareness of your ability in learning new things is the
best award you can find in game playing.
Therefore, I will conclude by saying that playing a game
itself is worthwhile and to win or not to win is not a matter
to concern since you could get rid of the feeling of
exhaustion and confirm your confidence as a learningcapable
being.
Topic 136 Is winning important in a game?
Recently, many people argue as if it is a general truth that
playing a game is fun only when you win. In various
games and matches, the main aim of players from both
sides seems to be winning. And winning is not only for
the players themselves, but also for the honor of their
team, and even for that of their nation. But to be frankly,
I cannot agree with them. There are numerous reasons,
and I would explore only a few primary ones here.
The main problem with this argument is that the real
meaning of a game is to enjoy the process of the game;
the result, whether it is win or lose, does not seem matter.
Think of the original games of our ancestors, the goal is
to show their love of sports, their physical strength and
celebrating the hunting. And the true intention of their
game is for relaxation and amusement. Another good
example is that children enjoy playing games more than
adults. When we watch children play, we can understand
that they are more concentrate on the game itself, and do
not care for the result. There are to young to realize the
importance of winning the game, therefore they enjoy it
more.
If the players play a game for winning, they will concentrate
on scores too much, and forget to enjoy the game.
In this society, everyone want to be winner, for they will
not only win the honor, but also win fame, money, and
so on. In the same way, the loser will lose everything. It
seemed that playing a game become a way to get material
comfort, but not fulfillment of spirit.
Furthermore, when players play a game for winning, they
face the stress from the team, even for the nation, and
they struggle to win. Sometimes, players do everything by
fair means or foul in order to win. They may use illegal
drugs, or bribe the judges. There are various scandals
about athlete almost in every international game, and this
thing become more and more serious. These are all because
the results of games have been linked to money
and the honor of a country.
General speaking, when you only want to win, you will
lose the fun of playing a game. Taking into account of all
these factors, we may reach the conclusion that, it is 
ToeflEssays.com
77
wiser to learn to enjoy playing without regard of the result
of game.
Topic 137 Should students choose subjects?
There are lots of debates among parents, educators and
students on the issue of whether or not to allow students
to study the courses that students want to study. It seems
to be reasonable to many people that allowing students
to choose the course they want can inspire their learning
interest and find their talents on certain subjects and
pursue further development. But if we take a deeper consideration,
it is not difficult to make the judgment that to
ensure the students have a comprehensive knowledge
domain is the main objective of high school education,
therefore I disagree with the idea of allowing students to
study any courses that they want to study.
As we all know, the main purpose of school education is
to provide a systematic education to all students. In order
to let students be educated in all aspects, the curriculums
have to be researched and predefined by professional
education institute. If we allow students to select course,
we cannot guarantee all necessary courses to be covered
in the regular class time. Moreover, both parents and
educators believe that high school education shall provide
each student a fundamental knowledge base that is
essential to their future development in the society. It is
the school's responsibility to enforce the rule and make
sure that all the necessary knowledge is to be taught.
On the other hand, we may consider introducing some
optional courses to the high school curriculums so the
students can choose some of the courses within the limitation
of a big syllabus. For example, for an art classes,
the school can offer music and painting courses and each
student can choose either one of them according to his
or her personal interest. But this is not to say that the
students should have the freedom to choose any course.
In conclusion, high school education is a standardized
process in which major courses shall be predefined and
we need to make sure students are educated in all necessary
fields and build a foundation for the development
after high school.
Topic 138 Member vs. leader
According to my opinion, it is always better to be a leader
than a follower. True leader show initiative. They take
actions and they assume responsibilities. A leader makes
a decision. Some followers may approve of the decision,
others may complain about it. However, these followers
all chose to follow, not to lead. They chose not to make a
decision. That's how I am different. I am not a follower. I
want to make decisions.
A good leader will not react to events, but will anticipate
them. A leader will start a plan of action and then will
persuade others to follow. For example, a class president
at a local college may feel that the relationship between
the community and the campus is not a good one. The
citizens may feel that the college kids make too much
noise on the street, litter public areas, and shop in other
communities. A good class president will recognize that
the community and the campus depend on one another.
The president will ask the student body to keep noise
down, help clean up the neighborhood, and work with
businesses to attract students. A good leader takes the
initiative.
Good leaders must be action-oriented. Having taken the
initiative, they must see the job though. They have to take
charge and lead the followers. They have to motivate and
encourage the followers. The followers (in this example,
the student body) must understand why good relations
with the community are necessary. The followers must be
persuaded to do something about it.
I enjoy taking the initiative, determining the direction,
and being responsible for my actions. I do not want to
suffer through other people's stupid decisions. If there
are going to be stupid ways to do something, let them be
mine. Would not you agree?
Topic 138 Member vs. leader
One of the most frequently confronted situations of modern
life is to be included in a group as a member or to
strive for the leadership of a group. A member will have
to follow the leader's order, an argument goes, but he
will feel less pressure, thanks to fewer responsibilities.
I'm afraid I can hardly agree with this argument as far as it
goes. For me, two advantages of the leadership stand out
with great force.
Firstly, common senses lead us to the conclusion: a
leader is the core of a group or an organization and has
the supreme power in it. Winner of the competitive elections,
a leader meanwhile wins the authority of dealing
with the affairs within the group in his own way. Generally
speaking, everyone will hope that his personal point
of views can be adopted to solve certain problems. When
it comes to members of a group, they may feel free to
propose an extraordinary variety of suggestions. No matter
how proper they may be, it depends on the leader to
turn them into final decisions or just to deny it. A CEO,
the head of a company, for example. No subordinate dare
start a project or invest in a program without his permission.
In contrast, the CEO will take risks in an unpredictable
deal, providing he considers it worthwhile. Obviously,
whether a leader or not would make a difference.
And secondly, a leader can make the best of his position
to have his working abilities and social skills developed.
Just recall our personal experiences, which will support
my statement about the second advantage, a more important
one. As we grow from children into teenagers, we
are proud of organizing a football match or being the key
figure of a game; as we leave adolescence behind and
enter adult life, we are eager to play a vital role in campus
activities or clubs. But why? The very reason is that we
believe it wonderful opportunity to prepare ourselves for
future careers by communicating with the people in and
out of the group and conquering the difficulties facing
the group. And so is the fact. An example is my uncle's
success as a businessman. Enthusiastic about being the
leader of any group he joined, say, monitor of his class,
he was always more self-confident than his peers and his
outstanding abilities in management won him good reputations.

Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
78
I think that such a closer look at the subtle advantages of
being a leader offers some startling surprises to those
advocates of being a member of a group. Why do you still
confine your attention to the temporary relaxed feeling of
a member? Why not seek for the benefit in the long run
as a leader? Please join us, and another prominent leader
will probably come into being among us.
Topic 139 The most important room in a house
What do I consider the most important room in the
house? Why is this room more important to me than any
other rooms? As the questions pops up before me, so do
the images of the various rooms in my house. I think that
I consider the dining room to be the most important
room of the house.
First of all, this is the room where all the members of the
family sit down together, at least for dinner. This brings
closeness among the various members of the family. It
also gives each of the members an opportunity to relate
his/her experiences during the day and share those of
others. It is here where tensions die down when mother
cracks a joke or dad relates a humorous incident of his
job.
Secondly, this is where we feed and nourish ourselves. It
serves as a point where you stop, even for a minute(like
morning rush hours),and grab your bread and milk. The
dining room serves as a showroom of the kitchen bringing
the not-so-good looking vegetables appear mouthwatering.
This is where you take your food normally.
Thirdly it is the room to which you turn too when a large
number of relatives arrive. Set up some more chairs and
you are ready to take care of all of them. Can you do this
in the bedroom or the bedroom? Some will suggest outdoors
as an alternative but do all people have the luxury
of a lawn? And what if it's raining? Turn to the dinning
room!
In concluding, I would like to say that the dining room
seems to be the most important of all rooms in the house.
It is a nourishment point, an expansion unit and a family
hub, all combined into one. I consider it as the server of
the modern home, networking all aspects into one entity.
Topic 140 Hand vs. machine
From my point of view, there are many factors affecting
whether to choose an item made by hand or by machine.
The main factor to make a judgment is whether we use
the item for our daily life or for collection and decoration
purposes.
For items used in our daily life, the choices we make depend
on the following factors: function, form, and price.
Function is the most important thing for us. If a product
is beautiful, but it is not able to perform the function, it
can only be called a decoration, or a piece of garbage. For
example, when we buy a TV, what we really care about
first it is the quality of the picture and sound, how many
stations it can receive, and whether it can be connected
easily to the VCR and DVD player at home. The second
factor that affects our choice of a product for daily use is
its form. Is the TV too big, too small, or too ugly? Will it
fit into the living room? Will it be compatible with the
colors of other appliances and the furniture? The third
factor we may consider is the price. Even if we are very
happy with the item, there is no meaning if we cannot
afford it.
So, in our daily life, there is really no difference whether
our clothes or furniture are made by hand or made by
machine. It just doesn't matter as long as they can perform
their function. For items for collection and decoration,
it is a completely different story. Ancient tools and
historical artifacts have more market and educational
value than modern day massively produced products, and
traditional handicrafts make good tourist souvenirs and
beautiful decoration for the house. Therefore, when it
comes to items for collection and decoration, I would
definitely choose items made by hand, because they are
just so special.
In conclusion, depending on different items and different
uses, I will make different choices.
Topic 140 Hand vs. machine
Although products such as furniture or clothes made by
hand are detailed and unique pieces, I consider that is
better to buy items made by machines. The main reasons
to do that are, price, and warranty, as well as standardized
methods to manufacture them.
The more automatic a production line, the lower the cost.
When we buy a made-by-hand pure wool suit, we are
buying a product with both more quality and more suited
for our specific needs. Nevertheless, such kind of suit is
often quite expensive than a suit made in an automated
manufacturing process. The same increase of price takes
place with shoes, cars, sweaters, toys, or any other item
built on a customized basis.
Another reason for me to choose an item generated by
machines is the standard. I know when a buy a car from
Ford Motor Company, that the parts of its engine compliant
the requirements of Ford, and have less risk of failures
caused by manufacturing mistakes. This is possible
because most of the production phases were completed
by machines such as assembling robots, sensors, and
computers. On the other hand, a Rolls Royce car, despite
the fact I do not have the money to buy one, is made by
hand, and such piece of detailed and beautiful work
probably might have little manufacture defects that
automation avoids.
Finally, because of the standardized methods used to
manufacture some item, producers can offer more extended
warranties to their products. A three hundred
dollars watch probably can work properly for over ten
years, and the producer can offer a warranty longer than
would offer a famous watch producer from Switzerland
who makes all of his watches by hand.
Technology has extremely benefited our contemporary
society. The use of machines on production processes
increase quality, decrease prices, and continuously provides
improvements to every product in the market. For
that reason, I think that items made by machine are the
best for me. 
ToeflEssays.com
79
Topic 140 Hand vs. machine
The preference of machine-made clothes or hand-made
clothes is a matter of one's personality. Some people who
like clothes produced by machine argue that the clothes
are much cheaper, and the machine work surely beat
those handmade ones. On the contrast, people enthusiastic
at handmade clothes hold the idea of "rare is good"
and they also believe that handmade items bear more
meaning in them such as love, concern and friendship. As
far as I am concerned, I would stand by the side of
handmade advocators and my reasons go as following.
First of all, I believe there are some advantages in machine-made
clothes, the main of which is their availability.
It saves you time and energy to buy a machine made
clothes in a department store rather than make a cloth by
yourself or your tailor. And low price is also an attractive
merit. As machine made clothes take advantage of whole
made and wholesale, the cost of which definitely much
cheaper than that of a single tailored one.
In spite of the above advantages of the machine made
clothes, however, I still prefer handmade clothes personally.
Handmade clothes have particular patterns and designs
that entirely tally with my own tastes. When wearing
the handmade clothing which is designed by myself, I will
never worry about running across a woman who wearing
the same dress as me. My clothes will be the only one in
the world, the thought comforts me most.
Furthermore, no wonder that handmade clothing is the
fittest clothing to you because it is totally tailor made for
yourself. Consequently it will make your figure look best
and make your appearance more confident.
Finally, a handmade cloth could be the most precious gift
to your parents or friends. The cloth will convey your
love and concern to the gift receiver.
In brief, the advantages of a handmade cloth outweigh
those of a machine made one so much that everyone
could draw the conclusion that handmade clothes are
better.
Topic 140 Hand vs. machine
There are many items that are either made by hand or by
machine. For example, clothes are made both by hand
and machine. My preference would be machine made
clothing because the most merchants would carry it for
sale during certain seasons and it is not as expensive.
There may be one or two disadvantages to the clothes
made by machine; however, I believe that there are for
more advantages. The reasons for my view go as follows.
One of the minor disadvantages of a machine-made clothing
is its quality. For instance, I would often purchase my
clothing that is imported from Hong Kong or Korea,
which has better quality than that made of my own country.
In general, machine-made clothes are produced in
large quantities according to season. When the season
changes, another line of fashion will be on its way out for
sale. Consequently, many businesses would not use
higher-quality materials to produce its' line of clothing.
The main disadvantage of a machine-made clothing is the
quality of the materials being used. But the advantages far
out weight hand made clothing because clothes made by
machines are produced faster. Due to the quicker production;
people can have access to the latest styles and
colors. For instance, swimsuits, pants, shirts, tops, etc...
have different types of styles, colors, and cuts. Due to the
seasonal trends, majority of the people does not worry
about the quality of the clothes.
The second advantage of machine-made clothes is the
price. Because these clothes are produced in larger numbers
and the quality is lower, the pricing will also be
lower than hand made clothes. Due to the mass production
of machine-made clothes, merchants will be able to
purchase a certain line of fashion in larger quantities.
With larger quantities of same fashion around, the prices
will also be cheaper. This will be a positive situation for
the consumers, whom would like to spend as little as
they can, but still wants to remain in fashion. )
Although I agree that there is a disadvantage to machinemade
clothes, I feel that the advantages are more important.
Machine-made clothes can bring the latest fashions
from Japan and certain western countries. In addition,
the price is lower. Therefore, in my opinion, these advantages
play an important role in the consumers' decision
to purchase clothes.
Topic 141 Change about your school
Talking of making an important change in my school, I'd
like to suggest that our education system put more emphasis
on the development of learning skills and applications
of theories into practice instead of simply learning
knowledge from books. The proposal is based on the
reasons as follows.
For one thing, overemphasis on academic learning poses
a threat because of confusing the purpose of learning. As
school credit is usually considered the major criteria of
academic learning, in a credit-driven school, one may try
hard to learn simply for learning's sake. In other words,
college students tend to blindly cram their brains with
numerous texts and formulas while do not have a clear
idea of what they really want to learn, why they need to
learn, not to mention how the things they are learning
are useful to the reality. An example is way that common
ESL students learn English: they may spend several years
in reciting grammar rules, but can hardly utter an English
word in front of a foreigner.
Another reason that causes me to make the suggestion is
the requirement of today's ever-changing knowledge
economy time. With the increasingly accelerated pace of
information explosion, one can hardly depend on knowledge
from books that he or she has learned at school.
Mastering learning skills and knowing how to apply the
skills into practice are becoming indispensable than ever
before. A recent survey conducted by educators shows
that most students in our country lack the ability of using
tools and solving problems compared with their counterparts
in the United States. This informs us to take a serious
look at our book-knowledge based education pattern.
In sum, it's high time for us to give a touch on our educa-
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
80
tion pattern concerning the narrowness of bookknowledge
learning as well as the necessity of practical
learning required by the contemporary world.
Topic 142 A gift for a child
People enjoy endless excitement and joy of receiving gifts
ever since they are very young. As reading this topic, I
recalled the sweet memories of my birthdays, a little girl
waiting beside the table expecting her gift from dear parents.
In turn, if I am a parent who is choosing a gift for
my deeply beloved child, what gift shall I give to my little
girl? Undoubtedly, I want my gift to be meaningful and
helpful on my child's way of life that is long and awaiting.
A book will be my best option since this chooses is testified
by my own experience.
Books give little children wings of imagination. I remember
my first favorite books were a series of cartoons
called "Ddcat" in which a mighty cat comes from the
world of future brings to a dumb little boy all the amazing
inventions. I laughed for the funny endings caused by
the boy's improper use of those inventions, and I cried
for the separating of these two dearly friends, but I was
mostly amazed by the wild imagination --- the ability that
was later revealed to be gained in my own writings.
Books are children's windows to the world. My own little,
limited world was so much extended by books, which
would take me to the North Pole of the Earth to visit the
people who live in the world of ice, which would tell me
the old tale from ancient time of how the beautiful princess
found her love, which would show me the miracles
of nature through the world of little ants. It was through
books I first acknowledge such a world I live in.
Books teach children the principles of life. When I first
cried for Snow White who was driven out into a wild forest
by her evil stepmother, I learnt what was good and
evil. When I went to my father to admit it was me who
dropped the plate after reading the tale that children who
lied would have long noses, I learnt that lying was a
shameful deed. When I was touched by the wisdom and
love in the book "The Greatest Salesman in he World", I
learnt to pursuit the meaning of my life.
A good book can give children the access to the world of
imagination, knowledge and truth. I believe that a book
can contribute to a child's development much more than
a soccer ball, a camera or an animal, which is convinced
by my own benefits from books. A book, with your love
and care, may be a gift of life for you loving child.
Topic 142 A gift for a child
Perhaps it is the happiest time for children when they get
a gift from others. When picking out presents for children,
probably different people tend to choose different items.
In my opinion, a gift can always contribute to a child's
development no matter it is a camera, a soccer ball or a
toy animal. However, as far as I am concerned, I would
choose fairy books to help him or her develop.
Firstly, fairy books can help a child improve his or her
mind and then learn to tell the right from the wrong. As
we all know, fairy stories are all written from an imaginative
perspective, which beautify the good and uglify the
evil to the full. So through reading fairy books, children
will definitely get to know whether a thing is good or not
as well as what they should do if they are caught in the
similar situations as what the stories put in the books.
And I believe it will be more beneficial for them to learn a
lesson from those vivid stories than just from the plain
words of their parents or teachers.
Furthermore, fairy stories can stimulate a child's incentive
to reading, which eventually will improve his or her communication
skills. All knows it that the communication
skills such as reading and writing ability are most important
in our daily life. Excellent reading ability helps a
child understand the reading materials better; in the
meantime, superior writing ability helps a child be understood
by others better. Meanwhile, the attractive plots
described in the fairy stories will always make a child
concentrate on the books for long. Therefore, it is obvious
that the children's reading and writing ability will get
improvement gradually then.
Altogether, fairy stories or fairy books not only can help
children improve their minds, but also can help them
better their communication skills. And such is right the
reason that I would choose fairy books as a gift to a child.
Topic 143 A long vacation vs. short vacations
It is a hot topic among educational institutions, parents
and students themselves about what kind of vacation students
should have. Some people want several short vacations,
while some others would like to have one long
vacation each year. If let me to choose, I prefer the latter
for at least three reasons.
For the first reason, to make use of a long vacation we
can do something that needs a long time to finish. For
instance, traveling far to several different interesting
places would be the favorite thing for many students with
heavy daily study burden. However, it is completely impossible
for students to do such things if time is limited.
Perhaps some students need to learn some new knowledge
that they are interested in as a hobby, such as going
to a dancing class, this period of time just provides them
the best chances.
For the second reason, with a long vacation, students
might be able to find a relatively fixed part-time job to
practice themselves using the knowledge they gained in
class which is beneficial for students' future careers as
well as saving some extra money for expenditures of the
new academic term.
The last but not least, long vacation means that the teaching
time is concentrated within a limited period that will
make the study more efficient. Such example is that
whenever we come back to school from holidays, it always
takes us quite a long time to get use to the study
environment, which reduces the effects of teaching. So, it
is reasonable to arrange the class in a concentrated time.
All in all, from the analysis above, I hope that the government
or education institutions can adopt one long
vacation instead of several short ones each year. 
ToeflEssays.com
81
Topic 144 A house vs. an apartment
Young people usually prefer living in a modern apartment
building as they often take consideration of the
fashionable things, while more experienced adults would
rather live in a traditional house as they like the feel of
family and the quiet atmosphere around the traditional
house. For my part, I would like to live in a traditional
house.
First of all, there must be a variety of old things in the
traditional house, owing to many years it has passed by.
In my opinion, every old thing has an old story. When
you take an old book from the bookshelf which your
grandfather has read, when you use the broom your
grandmother ever used to clean the house, when you sit
on a chair where your mother ever sat to make a sweater
for you, I am sure you will feel very warm from the bottom
of your heart.
Second, traditional house is often in a quiet district
where you can obtain a good chance to relax yourself and
think quietly after your work or study. After the temporary
relation, you will probably have more energy to put
into your job or study.
Third, since it is a traditional house, there must be a good
neighborhood around it. If you are in some trouble, the
neighbors would help you, and you will feel convenient
and joyful living in the traditional house.
On the other hand, if you live in the modern apartment
building, the relationship between your neighbor and
you is so aloof that you certainly cannot find warm help
as you do in the traditional house. Admittedly, living in a
modern apartment building has a few positive factors,
such as, it may be near your work place, you can save
time and money on transportation, you would live closer
to modern life, and so on. However, at the same time you
will not feel the warmness of the people's relationship.
So if we take a careful consideration, it is not difficult to
get he conclusion: living tin the traditional house is your
sagacious choice!
Topic 145 The role of advertisements
The issue of the role of advertising in our lives is a very
controversial one. Some people think that advertising
encourages us to buy things that we really do not need,
because they claim that advertisements have the power to
influence on our purchasing behavior. Nevertheless, my
point of view is that advertisements are incredible source
of information about new products that may improve our
lives.
First of all, these advertisements can help us to choose
things easier and also save our time. For example, as a
result of such an advertisement, a few years ago I bought
very useful tool to lose my weight. The only thing that I
needed to do was to attach it to any problem area of my
body for twenty minutes a day. Thus I did not to have do
heavy exercises to lose my weight. The additional advantage
was that this tool also helped me save time for my
favorite activities.
The second reason is that quite often advertisements tell
us about new products that can save our money. Again as
a result of such an advertisement I bought some special
micro fiber cloths, which could help me to clean my
apartment only by using water. Thanks to its specific
characteristics and possibility of long-time usage, I do not
need to buy any more different kinds of liquids or powders
for house cleans. Therefore the advertisement of this
kind of cloth saved my money.
Last but not least advertisements can tell us about new
products, which bring us new ways to cook healthier
food. Fore instance, after watching a television advertisement,
a friend of mine bought a special pot, with
which she can prepare meat and vegetables without using
any water or oil. This pot uses only the natural hot steam
to cook. Thus it helps to keep more vitamins and minerals
in the food, and get rid of the fat.
In conclusion, advertisements of new products definitely
improve our life, because they tell us about things that
make our life easier, save our time and money, and even
cook our food better.
Topic 146 Outdoors vs. indoors
Have you ever dived into a pool in the mountains? Have
you ever jogged through the quiet forest? Have you ever
enjoyed the sunshine on the afternoon beach? If you do
not have such exciting experiences in your leisure time,
you may sure lose something valuable that your life can
offer. That is why I prefer to be outside than to be inside
for my leisure activities.
At first, outdoor activities give me opportunities to touch
the nature. I can remember how I was impressed by the
beauty of the summit, which only successful climbers can
see. Standing on the top of the mountain, I could even
reach the blue sky. Outdoor leisure activities help us appreciate
the sights of nature, which is not available in our
ordinary routines, or indoor activities.
Secondly, outdoors activities are also beneficial for our
health. Plenty of oxygen will refresh our brains. The Fresh
air, the sunshine and the soft breeze are the basic elements
that contribute to a good health. There is no doubt
that the only way that we can access these elements is
through outdoor activities. After all, no one in the world
tend to refuse a strong body, therefore no one has a reason
to refuse outdoor activities.
Leisure activities outdoors provide both the chance of
appreciating nature and the most practical way to stay
healthy. Those indoor activities cannot compare with
them. So I prefer to do my leisure activities in the nature.
I act outdoors, therefore I exist.
Topic 147 How should your school spend a gift of
money?
Our educational objective is not only to fill students with
the knowledge, but also to improve their capacity and
skills of analysis, which will benefit the students all their
lifetime. So to achieve this ambitious objective, it is necessary
that the school shall have all sorts of laboratories
to facilitate various laboratory tests in the school. So
naturally, when my school receives a gift of money, I 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
82
think the best way for us to spend the money is to build
basic laboratories for the students and teachers.
Firstly, our school is not well equipped with such a basic
necessities. We have capable teachers and intelligent students
in our school, which created a strong academic
study atmosphere. But due to lack of necessary laboratories,
the teaching is only limited in the class. Students
learned a lot about the theory but no more practice,
which detracts the understanding of students and affects
building up of their capacity to apply the knowledge into
practice. Therefore, the educational quality is questionable.
This has impaired the fame of the school. Consequently,
brain drainage is a big problem in the school.
The excellent teachers and intelligent students are desperately
looking for well-equipped schools for their
teaching and studying. So to curtail the loss, it is the high
time to invest the fund to build up all these necessities.
Secondly, to spend the money on establishing laboratories
will benefit the school for good in the long run. Parents
assess the school according to the educational facilities
that the school possesses. Poor facilities will keep
students away from the school. So from the point of view
of attracting more students, building a first-class laboratory
is the prime task of the school. Furthermore, the
local education authority has also paid attention to the
problem of poor educational facilities. If the situation
maintains like that without any improving, I suspect our
school will be closed down by the authorities.
Last but not at least, if our school use the money on
building educational facilities, it will make the donators
more comfortable. By building a new laboratory, I believe
it can attract more donators.
In sum, to spend the gift fund to build up the laboratory
is a wise choice, which not only can satisfy the students
and teachers in the school, but also can make the parents
and the donators happy.
Topic 148 Does playing games teach us about life?
Playing games plays a significant role in people's daily life.
You can always see children playing soccer or basket ball
in parks, and adult enjoy themselves with the bridge
game in clubs. Game may become more and more complex
as we grow up, but our enjoyment has never
changed. It give us lots fun, meanwhile teach us about
life.
First of all, playing games teaches us about the strategies
which we can apply in our real life. In fact, most games'
original ideas come from real life. For instance, Chess
imitate the battles between two countries. During the
game of chess, we need to analyze what situation we face,
evaluate our assets, guess what our rivals would do in
next steps and make the best choice from several possibilities.
In real life, when we meet a challenge, we usually
analysis the situation and estimate our ability and decide
what to do next. Therefore, games are mirrors of real life.
Playing games also teaches us how to deal with other
people. We learn about teamwork during the game, if the
games are played in teams like soccer or basketball. Nobody
can win the game by himself even though he is
strong, and runs fast. Everybody should communicate
with his co-players. Also, in real life, no one can survive
without other people's help and cooperation. A man who
gets along well with his co-workers is likely to be successful
in his career.
Meanwhile, playing games also help us focus our mind
and energy to reach the goal, and teach us to divide a
difficult problem into several relatively smaller and easier
tasks and solve them one by one. Playing games also
teach us to adjust our plan when situation changes. Finding
a good job is always not easy, especially during an
economic downturn, as we are currently experiencing. At
this moment, we may go to school to pursue a higher
degree instead of job hunting. It is those games such as
chess that teach us to adjust our strategies and pace in
real life.
Life is not a game, but games surely teach us a lot about
life.
Topic 149 How would you use a free gift of land?
A fazenda? A playground? Or a garden? How would you
use the land that you have received to use as you wish?
Obviously, the answers of different people would be diverse.
As far as I am concerned, I would build the most
advanced hospital on this imaginary land, for the following
reasons.
Firstly, I think the health problem concerns everyone in
the world, and then a high-class hospital can favor everyone,
not just a portion. There is a common wish in the
minds of all people that I can live healthier, and the hospital
can meet this wish. Actually, we can live without
banks, playgrounds, fazendas, and so on, but none of us
can live without hospitals. To some degree, the hospital is
the most important building for human being. Therefore,
I will choose to build such an important building in my
imaginary land.
Secondly, a high-class hospital can be a scientific center
for researching advanced cures to some diseases which
cannot be cured now. A few diseases, such as AIDS, cancers,
and so on, have been torturing human beings for a
long time. People die for them. They separate fathers
from children, husbands from wives, friends from friends,
brothers from sisters. They have made innumerous
tragedies in the world. If I could, I would provide the
most advanced hospital to the most outstanding doctors
to find some therapies against those diseases. After that,
there would be fewer pains in the world. What a wonderful
world it would be.
Certainly, there can be more reasons to interpret my
choice besides the two cited above, but they are not away
from the central idea that my land should favor every
people as much as possible. What in my land can fulfill
this task? A hospital, of course.
Topic 149 How would you use a free gift of land?
Land is an invaluable asset and from time of immemorial
it has been regarded with respect and perhaps envy by
those who do not own any. Land is equivalent to money
in a tangible form and the potential of undeveloped land
has to be seen then to be believed. When it is given in the
form of a gift its value is infinite, because this is some-
ToeflEssays.com
83
thing that is stolid and eternal. I can let my imagination
run riot when I see the various uses it can be put to. As it
is a gift I am assuming that the land extends into a few
acres.
I have always wanted to live in a sprawling house surrounded
by gardens that are bathed in a riot of color. I
need space to breathe and the matchbox apartments of
the city make me claustrophobic. Long verandahs with
porticos must open into rooms where light and air reign
supreme. Luxurious bedrooms unmatched in size and
decor, lounges which exemplify what they stand for, salons,
elegant drawing rooms, a huge library, a study, studios
to pursue my hobbies and spiral staircase which lead
to the upper floors are what I envision as an abode.
That however is just the tangent of my dreams that
touches the periphery of the land. Moving out towards
the gardens I find I require even more space than I did
for the interior. I need a couple of summerhouses and
small private cottages to enable me to get away when I
want. A conservatory filled with plants and unusual flowers,
a huge swimming pool, a small gym and a spa would
be fitting as extensions.
It would perhaps be selfish to utilize all the land for myself.
I would like to do something for the people around
me. A free reading room and a circulating library is something
that many people do not have access to. This I
would like to construct for them. To culminate it all I
would like to use part of the land to construct a public
park and playground for the kids who do not have any
such facilities.
Dreams are nice and they sound even nicer when put
into words. If I get a piece of land as a gift these dreams
can become realities. I enrich my life style and those of
others too by bringing joy and spreading it too. I wish it
came true.
Topic 150 Is watching TV bad for children?
Everything consists of goodness and badness. People cannot
evaluate something only by its benefit or only by its
harmfulness. This is why I disagree with the point that
watching television is bad for children. I admit that if the
children do not watch TV properly, such as watching television
excessively or seeing something unfit for them in
TV, watching TV would do harm. However, watching TV
can benefits children if they make good use of it. Watching
TV can help children learn a lot of knowledge in an
interesting way, can be a good entertainment for children,
and can help children manage their time. In those senses,
watching TV is not bad for children.
First of all, most TV programs for children are designed
in an interesting way, which is easier for children to understand.
For example, a lovely presenter tells a beautiful
story with attractive frames on TV and at the same time
she introduces some knowledge to her young audience.
Thus, children can get knowledge by listening to a story.
Secondly, watching TV can be a different form of various
entertainments from what children are accustomed to.
Most children like animated cartoons that give them
charming images. Some children may enjoy their time in
children entertainment TV programs and may also enjoy
watching other children performing in TV. Hence, watching
TV is another entertainment for children.
Lastly, watching TV can help children make good use of
their time. Many TV programs have their certain times.
Children always know the show times of their favorite
programs. If they want to watch these programs on time,
they should complete others things by that time. In other
words, children have to be quicker in their other activities.
Thus, watching TV can be an active help when children
plan their time.
I do admit that watching TV properly needs direction of
the parents. Yet, we cannot doubt watching TV is good in
some ways for its teaching knowledge to the children, for
its entertaining the children and for its well effecting on
children's time. I believe most adults today can still remember
how their favorite children TV programs benefited
them when they were children.
Topic 150 Is watching TV bad for children?
Television has increased the speed at which news travels
and it can bring situations and images into our homes
that previous generations would not have had the opportunity
or regret to witness.
Television is commonly criticized as being bad for children
that an important fact sometimes gets overlooked.
In my personal opinion some types of television viewing
may actually enhance children's intellectual development.
Television contains an enormous variety of forms and
content. The effects of television viewing depend on program
content and genre. According to a research, young
children who spent a few hours a week watching educational
programs such as Sesame Street, Mister Rogers'
Neighborhood, Reading Rainbow, Captain Kangaroo, Mr.
Wizard's World and 3-2-1 Contact had higher academic
test scores 3 years later than those who didn't watch educational
programs. On the other hand, children who
watched many hours of entertainment programs and cartoons
had lower test scores than those who watched
fewer hours of such programs. Good educational programs
can provide lasting benefits to children.
Children are most likely to become actively engaged with
television content that is neither too easy nor too difficult
to comprehend, that is, content that provides some challenges,
but also allows a child to gain a sense of mastery.
Just like our muscles, the brain gets stronger when it is
used, and atrophies when it is not used. It seems that
lack of use also leaves it vulnerable to degeneration later
in life.
Of course, there are some bad sides for children to watch
TV. Our TV-watching children increasingly view life as an
entertainment extravaganza, in which they yearn to play a
starring role, and here the nasty content of so much
modern broadcasting comes into play. Besides, it is hard
to watch an evening of TV without encountering unspeakable
violence, whose perpetrators are celebrated.
Again, the effects of television viewing depend on program
content and genre, and parents should teach their
children on choosing the right TV program to watch. 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
84
Topic 150 Is watching TV bad for children?
With the advancement of technology, the greatest difference
between children now and in the past is that children
now enjoy more luxurious usage of newly invented
technologies. Nowadays, children virtually superfluously
spend their after-school life on watching television programs,
playing computer games and Internet chatting
apart from completing their necessary homework.
Though it is well debatable on if it is good or bad for
children to watch television, however, I do think that
watching appropriate amount of television programs is
good for the development of a child.
First of all, television programs provide an extensive
amount of information and knowledge for children to
learn on their own. It is a well-known fact that, with audio
and visual aid in a learning process, a child will pick
up knowledge more easily rather than broadly absorbing
whatever his teacher regardless of his interests delivers.
For instance, the Discover Channel provides services of
introductions to science and technology in a very comprehensive
manner. In fact, TV programs provided by this
channel convey knowledge by giving many detailed examples
from the actual world, instead of producing the
theoretical models. Watching television programs of this
kind does no harm to the children, but in fact, provides
more comprehensive education to them.
Further more, watching television widens a child's mindset.
In order for a child to grow into a matured adult, he
needs to have an astute brain to adapt to the society.
Television programs provide a lot of up-to-date news and
information on current affairs. By watching television,
one is able to receive information in a relatively shorter
period of time. Empirically, a better-informed child is
more likely to mature earlier than his peers. This also
enables him to gain experiences for his future work as a
member of the society.
However, in order for a child to grow in the right direction,
appropriate programs have to be selected for him to
watch. Otherwise, he may end up watching programs that
may misguide him in this global world. This may be very
dangerous to the physical and mental health of a child, as
a little bit of misbehavior may cause great harm to the
child. A good example is a TV drama series where a princess
demonstrated some dangerous actions to the audience.
Unfortunately, most audience of this series is children.
Due to their lack of mature mindset and appropriate
parental guidance, they ended up having followed the
action of the actors, and getting themselves into serious
injuries, and some even died. Hence, it is inevitable to
see that watching television programs without appropriate
guidance from parents may result in serious troubles
for children.
The advancement of technology has allowed children
now to have a more enjoyable life compared to their parents.
At the same time, children are able to pick up
knowledge from TV programs. However, parents need to
pay close attention to the programs that their children
watch to ensure that they are appropriate, so that their
children will grow up healthily.
Topic 151 The most important animal
My homeland Taiwan is well known for its great and diverse
possession of animals. However, among this great
variety of animals, Taiwanese deer is the most important
and unique animal. This beautiful animal saved my ancestors
from starvation in their pioneer days, and what's
more, it symbolizes the beauty of my homeland Taiwan.
When my ancestors first came to the Island of Taiwan,
they had nothing except a few pieces of clothing and
tools. As they were facing hunger, they caught the
glimpse of a beautiful deer in silky beige fur and snowwhite
spots. Astonished at the sight of such a stunning
creature, they appreciated God for bestowing them such
a precious gift. The deer saved my ancestors from starvation,
and hence, my people worship it as the gift from
God. Were it not for the Taiwanese deer, my ancestors
would not have survived, and I also would not be sitting
here writing this essay.
Moreover, Taiwanese deer symbolizes the dazzling beauty
of my homeland---the Taiwan Island. Taiwan has been
famous for the name "Formosa" which means "beautiful"
given by a Portuguese explorer in the1600's. Its beauty is
celebrated worldwide. Moreover, the Taiwanese deer is
widely recognized as one of the most beautiful kinds of
deer. It acquires silky fur of the color of cedar, covered by
little white spots that spread out like stars in the sky. In
addition, I can proudly and positively say the only place
on the Earth where you can find a Taiwanese deer is the
Taiwan Island. Every characteristic of the deer matches
my beautiful homeland perfectly, and the deer is the best
representative of my homeland.
Overall, although there are various animals living in my
homeland, Taiwanese deer is the most important one as it
was the food that saved my ancestors and it represents
my homeland. Unfortunately, this incredible creature
now is facing extinction. I genuinely hope by writing this
essay my voice can be heard and people will try to save
the Taiwanese deer.
Topic 152 Why should forest be saved?
What is clear is that forests provide humans with many
social, economic, and environmental benefits.
However, huge areas of the richest forests in the world
have been cleared for wood fuel, timber products, agriculture,
and cattle. If the current rate of deforestation,
about 80,000 square kilometers per year, is kept, they
may completely disappear by the year 2030. In Vietnam,
our country, according to the ministry of Natural Resources
and Environment, 1,054 forest fires occurred last
year, destroying 15,370 hectors of forest and causing
damage worth US $ 9,8 million. Particularly, Upper U
Minh, formerly a nature reserve, was mostly destroyed,
just after being re-classified as a national park.
In fact, like Vietnam, the countries with the most tropical
forests tend to be developing and overpopulated nations
in the southern hemisphere. Due to poor economies,
people resort to clearing the forest and planting crops in
order to survive. Therefore, the most effective conservation
policies are to relieve poverty and expand access to 
ToeflEssays.com
85
education, healthcare, and the most important, alternative
livelihoods. Allocating forests to farms and plantations
is also a sound one. In addition, stricter laws should
be issued to reduce the destruction of forests, which is
caused mostly by logging interests.
One of the greatest concerns worldwide is the loss of
natural resources, particularly forests. Many solutions
have been suggested to save forests from destruction.
However, many forests in the world remain unprotected.
Topic 152 Why should forest be saved?
Have you ever walked in a forest? How good it feels to
breath the cool fresh air! Every one should admit that
forests are very important to our life. But forests are disappearing
quickly all around the world. We should act
now to save them.
Forests are essential in protecting our land. In China the
government used to encourage people to cut trees to
meet the nation's demand of wood. Now people come to
notice that with the decline of forest area large amount of
soil is being washed off by rains and carried away by rivers.
Without forests deserts expand quickly. They are now
threatening the nation's limited agricultural land. Now
the government begins to realize the importance of forests
and is encouraging people to grow trees.
Forests are homes of many animals. Without forests animals
cannot live. Many species extinct and many more
such as pandas and tigers are endangered. The extinction
of animals will be a big problem for our ecosystem and
will even threaten our survival.
Forests also provide us with many useful things. Fresh air,
Juicy fruits, meat, milk and rawhide are only a small part
of what we gain from forests. How can we survive without
these supplies?
From the reasons stated above it is clear that forests are
one of the most important natural resources. so we
should do our best to protect them.
Topic 153 Is a zoo useful?
Every city has one or more zoos. For a while, people
think that a zoo is no useful purpose. If I were faced with
this issue, I would think that zoos are useful. In the following
discussion, I would like to reason and provide
evidence to support my viewpoint.
The first reason is that zoos are often used as places to
preserve the endangered species, such as the giant pandas
and tigers. It is the conservation of animals that is the
most important function of a zoo. With the advances in
reproductive technologies, which assist in breeding captive
animals, the zoo has become the most important
place for animal conservation. Thanks to zoos, certain
species of animals have been saved from extinction. Such
animals are bred in captivity and when they are ready to
survive in the wild, are reintroduced to their original
habitat - in the rain forests of Brazil, for instance.
In the second place, children can obtain direct knowledge
about a variety of animals by visiting zoos. They can
see what a tiger is like, hear various sounds of birds and
tell one animal from another. If there is no such a place,
how can they make contact with animals? They may never
have a chance to see various animals even though they
learn many from books. When I was a little girl, I liked
animals very much, especially birds. But I could not feed
them for myself, so the zoo which was located near my
home was the place I went to most frequent. And I really
love these places.
Finally, a zoo is a place for fun. In fact, this is why it is so
good at educating the public about the importance of
conserving wildlife and the environment: it puts fun into
education. Seeing pictures is not the same as seeing animals
at close up. What makes visiting a zoo so enjoyable
is our close contact with them. Therefore a zoo not only
attracts many tourists from other countries, it also allows
us to see, without having to leave home, big cats and exotic
animals of distant countries.
In summary, I believe that a zoo has some useful purposes
to serve: to preserve the endangered species, to
educate the public about wildlife, and for its visitors to
have fun. So a zoo of course is a useful place for us and
we should have them.
Topic 154 Is it right to ban smoking?
There is no doubt that we human beings are social animals.
Living in a society, we certainly cannot do whatever
we like. Putting ourselves in other people's shoes is a key
principal to live in a social group. Smoking in public will
violate this basic rule. Therefore, people should not allow
smoking in public places and office buildings.
It is widely believed that smoking is bad for people's
health. Since not everyone likes smoking, the rule banning
on public smoking should be enforced. It goes
without saying that public spaces such as office buildings,
department stores or classrooms are places for everyone
including adults and children. The second-hand smokes
produced by smokers may be more harmful for the health
of non-smokers according to the New England Medical
Journal published several years ago.
Moreover, smoking is bad for the health of smokers. The
rule might help the smokers who want to quit smoking.
The rule can reduce the opportunities for smokers to
smoke and gradually help chain smokers get rid of this
bad habit. Smoking is a habit that is not easy to quit. The
rule might use its legal power to assist the smokers to
protect their own health.
Smoking in public spaces might be dangerous because
there are a lot of careless smokers who forget to extinguish
the sparkles after they smoke. The irresponsible
action may lead to big fire and a great numbers of people
will be hurt in the accident. Nevertheless, enforcing the
rule can prevent the occurrence of accidents.
Some people might believe that it is their rights to smoke
wherever they please. However, I would say that people
who do not smoke have their rights not to inhale secondhand
smokes and risk their life in dangerous places.
Smokers still can smoke in their private places such as
their bedrooms or living rooms as long as no other people's
rights are not damaged. After all, the rule is used to
protect the personal liberty of everyone. 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
86
Topic 155 What plant is important in your country?
There are many kinds of plants in Thailand since Thailand's
land and climate are very suitable for agriculture.
As soon as I am asked what the most important plant in
my country is, I undoubtedly point out that rice is the
most necessary plant in Thailand for several important
reasons that I will detail in this essay.
Firstly, rice is the main kind of food in Thailand. Even
though there is much more food here such as noodle or
fast food, almost all Thai people still eat rice as their daily
traditional dish because we have eaten rice for a long
time from our ancestral age to the present time. Moreover,
rice still provides substantial energy to our bodies,
so we have enough energy to do our activities everyday.
For foreigners, they can have breakfast only with hams
and eggs. For me, if I have breakfast with no rice, I feel
that I am still hungry.
Secondly, as a agricultural country, exporting rice is the
main part of my country's revenue. Even though we sell
several kinds of plants to other countries, rice still makes
much more income to us than others. In addition, Thailand
ranks first in rice exports in the world. I cannot
imagine if we do not have rice as the vital economic
product, how could our country survive. I absolutely see
the significance of rice because even USA also eagerly
tries to develop and cultivate rice by itself in order to defeat
Thailand.
Obviously, no other plants can replace rice in terms of
the important food and the vital economic values at present
and in the future, even though several kinds of
plants are also cultivated here.
Topic 156 Which country would you like to visit?
If I have the opportunity to visit a foreign country for two
weeks, I would not hesitate to choose Gambia---a country
lies in West Africa.
I began to notice this tiny country at the time I was reading
the novel - Roots. It tells the story of an AfricanAmerican
family and a descendent finally found out his
roots in Gambia. I was quite impressed by the characters,
plots and interesting African life styles described in the
novel. The book gives me a totally different view about
Africa and it was my first time to take a close-up look into
an individual African country.
In the past when I think of Africa I think of poverty, disease,
and poor people, but never had I realized how
amazing Gambia is until I finished reading this novel.
They have lovely traditions. Every night, people from the
same tribe would gather together. Adults could talk about
things happened in the daytime while kids enjoy the stories
told by the elders. Teenagers go hunting every day
and compete for the most harvest. They never write
down their history, but the historians would take the responsibility
of passing it down by telling the following
historians these huge historical events. Everybody leads a
happy and serene life and live in harmony with the nature.
I can imagine the vast grass, wavy lake, cheerful
herds; it is a fairyland far from conflict, controversy and
war.
How can anyone be not attracted by Gambia after knowing
a little bit about it? If Pushkin had had the chance to
visit this fascinating country, he would probably say "Oh,
Gambia! How violently its name plucks at everyone's
heart!"
I have been dreaming to visit Gambia and joining those
villagers, sitting under a big tree, listening to the stories,
hunting the animals and being enlightened by the historians.
How I wished to go there!
Topic 157 Computers vs. traditional schools
Different persons will have different opinions about
studying at home or studying at school. I will prefer to go
to traditional schools because schools provide disciplined
learning, experienced teachers and good facilities.
Although learning from computer and television is comfortable,
it is void of disciplined learning environment
provided by schools. Schools provide balanced atmosphere
where each subject is given equal importance and
is taught on a regular basis. This leads to an overall development
of children. This discipline is absent in learning
through computers and televisions at home. We are
inclined to subjects which appeal us. Some children finds
art and crafts as interesting and devote most of their time
in them, while others find math and science more interesting
and avoid reading books on social sciences. This
erratic and unbalanced reading inhibits overall development.
Moreover children are too young to decide what
they should learn or should not. At this situation schools
prove to be beneficial where teachers knows their students
and give individual attentions to improve their
skills.
Not everybody can afford the best equipments and technology
available in the market. At this juncture schools
provide best-experienced teachers and best facilities available.
Schools invest on these instruments that students
can use while it is difficult to buy each and every piece
individually by yourself if you are learning at home. Also
there are instances where students are required constant
vigilance. For example while performing experiments in
chemistry, which involves lots of dangerous chemicals, an
experienced adult such as a teacher or a lab technician
must present. In these labs children are in habit of messing
with things. They try to experiment mixing every solution
they can find. So regular vigilance is required on
each student. Similarly while doing dissection of rats in
biology labs, from time-to-time guidance is required by
students to understand and complete the experiments
successfully. No television or computer can give such
attention to each individual.
While studying at school, children get to know each other.
They learn to work in team when they are given group
assignment. They learn to distribute tasks among themselves
according their strong points and complete their
tasks. Therefore a feeling of compassion is developed
among them, which is not possible in television learning.
Keeping all these benefits in mind, I would like to go to a
traditional school for my learning. 
ToeflEssays.com
87
Topic 158 Are celebrities' opinions right?
In today's commercial world, companies try to sell as
much of their product as possible. In this scenario they
try all means and methods to peddle their wares. One of
their methods is eliciting the good offices of famous personalities
such as actors, athletes and rock stars to endorse
their products. But why would they resort to this?
Past experience and research must have indicated that
this kind of propaganda does bear fruit and people are
lured by the opinions of such high fliers. In my opinion
blindly believing and following such opinions would be
quite foolhardy. It would be more feasible if one analyzed
the opinion using their own common sense and judgment
and made an informed decision. Hence we should
not totally disregard the opinions of these personalities
but listen and act upon them in a sensible and discerning
fashion. But blind faith without verification would not be
advisable.
Depending on the situation and the product being sold
or the message being propagated, we could choose to
follow or opinion or disregard the same. It would also
depend on the credibility of the person endorsing the
product. Even in the situation where the person is a big
wig with an impeccable reputation I would suggest corroborating
the authenticity of his/her claims before believing
the same. After all, we are thinking individuals
vested with the power of intelligence and the ability to
choose.
We must not abuse this right. In some cases, we find famous
people stating their opinions about a social cause...
In this case, they are being used to spread more and
more awareness and influence people into the bettering
the society they live in. For example, we find some of the
big shots in the entertainment industry rallying for AIDS
awareness... yet others who encourage people to donate
their organs after death. These are social messages for the
betterment of the society. One might choose to listen to
these messages and act upon the same, or disregard
them... but at least one can give it a thought.
On the other hand, lets take another example of an issue
that is still being hotly debated and is in the eye of a major
controversy. It has recently been revealed that aerated
drinks with coke as their basic ingredient contain harmful
chemicals & pesticides. As soon as this rumor began doing
the rounds, the relevant companies roped in the topnotch
film & sports personalities getting them to endorse
their product via equivocal statements about the safety of
their product. The Health board took umbrage to this fact
as it had not yet been fully proven that these drinks were
indeed devoid of pesticides. They declared that the public
was being intentionally misled. Thanks to the endorsements
by the famous stars, most people, a lot
amongst them being youngsters, disregarded the health
warnings of the Health board and continued consumption
of these drinks.
This example should lay bare the capricious nature of
opinions of these famous personalities. They may be
driven by financial and publicity seeking goals.
Hence in conclusion I would like to say that it is best to
hear out the opinions of famous personalities, but finally
make an intelligent and informed choice based upon our
own experience, information and intelligence.
Topic 159 What should be remembered?
Which invention was the greatest invention of the 20th
century has been discussed many times. Different people
have different views. Some think the greatest invention
was television; some think it should be cars. But as far as
I am concerned, the greatest invention of the 20th century
would be computers. The reasons for my opinion
are as follows.
First of all, computers save a great deal of efforts people
spend on calculating. Before computers were invented,
people had to calculate manually. Sometimes it took scientists
weeks, even months to have a result. Of course,
they might make mistakes during their calculation. That
affected the accuracy of data. But with the help of computers,
people are freed from heavy calculation. If only
takes seconds to have a result which used to take weeks
in the past.
Second, computers can simulate different environments
that cannot be created in real life. In the science research,
sometimes scientist need to have a simulation environment
to improve their theories or as a basis of further
research. Without computers it's difficult to have accurate
and reliable results. But computers can make everything
easy. Just input programs and data everything will be
done.
The reason I think is becoming more and more important
nowadays. That is computer is the way of access to the
Internet. The Internet was developed based on the local
area network (LAN) of computers. Today, the Internet has
become the fastest developing medium in the world. You
can find almost everything you need on the Internet,
communicate with friends, read news, watch movies, listen
to music etc. But you must do all the above things on
a computer. Cannot log in the Internet means behind
times today.
Although many other inventions of the 20th century
brought great convenience to human or changed people's
lives, computers have the most valuable contribution
to human, and it will have much more contribution
in the future.
Topic 160 Complain in writing vs. in person
I would actually prefer not to complain at all, and in
cases where it is really necessary to do so, I would most
likely complain by phone.
Although, in order to stay within the topic let us compare
two given possibilities; complaining in writing and complaining
in person.
Complaining in person enables us to interact personally
with a real person who represent the company where we
purchased a product from. This method of complaining
definitely gives certain advantages as opposed to complaining
in writing. For instance, one can always ask to
speak with a manager if he would find a clerk's answer 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
88
not good enough. And this approach also enables us to
take the reason of complaining with us and actually demonstrate
to the manufacturer or seller what is the actual
problem is.
On the other hand, complaining in writing has its own
advantages and could serve as a very powerful tool to a
sophisticated complainer who knows how to fight for his
rights. Firstly, words written on paper could serve as a
latter proof in court, if, of course, the dispute would go
that far. Also in some cases the company we purchased a
product from may not have live representatives available
in your region, and therefore, complaining in writing
could save you unnecessary long trip. Finally writing a
letter with complains could save you a lot of aggravation
that you always risk to get by complaining in person.
I personally prefer to complain as less as possible, although
if I had to choose from two forms of complaining,
I would choose to do it in writing.
Topic 161 Why do people remember their gifts?
I have never met a person who does not enjoy receiving
gifts or presents. In my opinion, the reason is that it
makes us feel special and loved. Sometimes we appreciate
more the attention of the person who gives us a present
than the present itself. However, definite gifts mean
much more than others; they have a great value for us
and they become precious pieces of our memories.
There are many celebrations in one's lifetime when he
receives presents - birthdays, anniversaries or any other
happy occasions. Some of them he remembers as more
special and important than others. Why is so?
One hand the reason could be that the present means
something really significant. It may also be truly expensive.
Moreover, the gift could be unique and invaluable
for the one ho has received it.
On the other hand we remember some gifts as special
ones because they have been given to us as a sign of endless
love and care. Furthermore, they could be given as
signs of appreciation and respect. Sometimes even the
trivial present given from somebody really special could
become a treasure. What is more - it could be remembered
as one of the most special gifts that we have ever
received. In other cases some presents are thought to be
special because they are given as a surprise without any
occasion and remind us that we are still truly loved or
not forgotten.
I consider that the answer to the question, why people
remember special gifts or presents that they have received,
is absolutely simple. It is because they
are…special. No matter what the reason is, every one I
know remembers his or her special presents and gifts.
I remember mine. And I am sure, dear reader, that you
remember yours, too.
Topic 162 Do starts deserve high salary?
Everyone needs money to support his family and enjoy
life. I believe that is one of the most important reasons
why people go to work. While an average person just
earns basic salary, some famous athletes and entertainers
earn millions of dollars every year. Why is that so? Do
these people deserve such high salaries?
Before answering these questions, let me ask you another
question, where did your salaries come from? From our
employers. Right! Those famous athletes and entertainers
made a lot of money for their own employers. Because
their skills and achievements on some specific sports or
entertainments, other people would like to pay money to
watch them playing games or acting in movies. This is
part of the nature of human beings. From this aspect,
they earned what they got. They deserve what they
earned.
In addition, those athletes and movie stars have some
special talents in a certain area. Athletes are experts at
some specific sports such as baseball, basketball, football
and so on. Movie stars are good at performance art. Average
people cannot reach that level, no matter how hard
they try. People who watch their games or movies can
obtain happy experiences and enjoyments, which can
enrich people's life and benefit people's health. Without
sports and movies, our life would be much boring and
less pleasant.
Furthermore, those famous people sacrifice something to
get what they have. For example, almost all athletes suffer
from injuries because of heavy trainings and physical
competitions to win the games. Movie stars have to face
the fact that the average people are not only interested in their movies, but also interested in their personal lives.
This is also integral part of human beings.
Do not be jealous of those famous athletes or entertainers,
although we all admire the millions of dollars they
made. They have talents, they made us happy and they
sacrificed something, either injury or privacy. They
earned their own paycheck.
Topic 163 The importance of reading and writing
For ages, reading and writing has been vital aids to the
intellectual, emotional and spiritual growth of mankind.
With rapid changes in the society and scientific advancement
of human race over the decades, the necessity and
importance of reading and writing has increased remarkably.
It has become a pivotal skill a person should
learn to be successful.
Several reasons account for the lesser importance of reading
and writing in the past. Firstly, education was restricted
to certain sections of the society and not everyone
benefited from its advantages. Only the learned few
enjoyed intellectual satisfaction. Knowledge was not
shared freely due to lack of proper means of communication,
thus preventing many from realizing the benefits of
education and learning. Secondly, technology was not so
advanced in the past. Hence the general pace of life was
slower than it is now and people did not feel the need to
keep themselves abreast of affairs around them. In other
words, the need did not arise for mass awareness and
participation in efforts for intellectual enlightenment
through reading and writing. Nevertheless, writing was a
more popular than reading since it was the most common
means of communication - in the form of letters.
However, at present the scenario has changed considerably.
Innovation and change are integral parts of life. Now 
ToeflEssays.com
89
advancement in technology marks the day. To cope up
with the rapidly evolving new ideas and concepts, reading
has become more important now than ever before.
Invention of high-tech gadgets and state-of-the-art information
systems in areas of communication, transport and
general business demands more awareness about contemporary
events and changes. With advancement in
technology, man's eagerness to succeed has increased.
Consequently the realization has dawned on him that
such dreams can be materialized through intellectual advancement
- a feat possible only through self-reading and
personal research. With the invention of computer has
commenced an age of electronic communication and
online commerce.
Although writing letters has decreased considerably with
the advent of electronic mail, it will take some time to
make our varied businesses paperless. Thus though reduced,
people still do some writing, wither in forms of
documents, memorandums, business contracts or research
papers. Education has made people more aware of
his potential and reading and writing has become instrumental
to man's success in today's competitive world.
Topic 164 What do you do for good health?
'Health is wealth' is very much true. One must try hard to
remain healthy. If we are healthy, we can easily fight with
other problems of life. But if we are unhealthy our most
of life will go in fighting with health problems. It eventually
leads us to failure.
People do many different things to remain healthy. Some
go for a healthy diet, other recommend exercise, and the
rest thinks that health awareness is important. But in my
view one must not think and act only on one aspect. People
must go for a healthy diet, exercise and health awareness.

A healthy diet is very important for one to remain healthy.
People must take care of their diet. Diet should be balanced.
Nowadays Americans are facing a very big problem
of obesity. This is due to their unhealthy diet. Most
American used to eat in fast-food restaurants. Obesity
leads to many health problems like heart attack, blood
pressure, cholesterol problem. Fat people can work less
and with less efficiency. I sometime eat food for my
tongue’s taste too. But most of time I stick to my balance
diet which contain fruits, green vegetable, and juices. I
always take care not to intake more oily food or sugary
food. Sticking to healthy diet put me in great shape and
healthy life.
Exercise is also important. Nowadays people make lots of
excuses for not do exercise. Some have time problem,
some have physical problem, some have space problem.
But I think these all are excuses. One can find little tome
for his or her self for healthy life. Everybody nowadays is
busy but taking few minutes out of this busy schedule
make lots of difference. I personally prefer Yoga. Yoga not
only gives physical exercise but also mental relaxation.
Meditation is my favorite. This helps me in concentrating
in my work as well as relaxing out of this stress full life.
Few minutes of exercise can make lot difference.
Health awareness is a factor why people are living more.
Nowadays life span of people is increased. People are
living longer. This is because of health awareness. Regular
medical checkup, clean –tidy life style, nutritious foods
are few examples. Previously people eat what they found.
But nowadays people read ingredients of food product as
well as how many vitamins it contains. I personally select
food product according to my needs of vitamins, minerals
etc. I also schedule appointment with my physician once
in a six month. And also take care of go to dentist once in
three months. In total I would love to remain healthy and
for that I’ll work what ever it takes. I also urge other people
to stick healthy lifestyle by taking healthy food, exercise
and regular medical checkup. I believe in ‘prevention
is better than cure.’
Topic 165 One thing to improve your community
Volunteering a few hours each week to some community
activity is an important way of investing in the future of
our society. I chose to spend my time working with elementary
school children helping them to learn to read.
Developing good reading skills will help these students
keep up with their classmates, open new worlds to them,
and help them succeed in life.
Students who are not good readers cannot keep up with
their studies. They will not understand the lessons; they
will come to school unprepared; they will not be able to
perform. By learning to read, students will be on equal
footing with their classmates. They will be active participants
in class.
Books on different lifestyles, occupations, cultures, or
governments will open new doors to students. Students
who cannot read will only know what they see around
them. Students who can read will be able to travel to new
worlds and experience new ideas without ever leaving
their classrooms.
Today, a person who cannot read is severely handicapped.
A non-reader will have to work at the most menial jobs.
Readers, especially good readers, have the whole universe
open to them. They will have the possibility to learn
any job that interests them.
By volunteering to help an elementary school child learn
to read, I am helping him or her not only today, but also
for the rest of his or her life. I am helping them keep pace
with their peers and explore the world and themselves
through books.
Topic 166 What events make a person an adult?
The difference between children and adults are very easy
to tell from their physical outlooks: children and small,
weak, have a poor judgment, and have to depend on
adults. On the contrary, adults are big, strong, and more
independent. Every child will grow up to become an
adult. What events make a person an adult? In my personal
opinion, there are a lot of events that mark the
turning point for a person to become adult.
In many countries, when a child becomes eighteen years
old, he or she legally becomes an adult. There will be a
big celebration and many best wishes from relatives and 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
90
friends; the young person may also have a great longing
for a bright future in his adult life. He may move out from
his parents' house and live alone; he may start dating and
doing activities which only adults can do, such as going
to a pub.
Graduation from college is another big turning point for
a person to become adult. In college the young person
may reply fully or partially on his parents for financial
support, but after he graduates, he must find a job for
himself, and live on his own. Graduating from college
and joining the work force can also make a person an
adult.
Marriage is also a big event to a person. Once become
husband or wife, the young person starts to take care of
others, and take responsibility for the family. Once the
young person becomes a parent, he or she should also
take care of the baby.
I believe that getting married and have children is the
most important event that turns a person into an adult.
Only after one gets married, does he or she take on the
responsibility to the family and the society.
Topic 166 What events make a person an adult?
What are the differences between children and adults?
After a short while staying with a couple of children and
adults, one may discover the answer in several aspects
such as the language skills, the analyzing skills and the
ability to get along with other people. Obviously an adult
acts much better in solving problems and working with
other people than a child does. But what events make a
person an adult? As far as I am concerned, two main
events are vital to the process of growing up: the experience
of education and the experience of social activities.
Firstly, the most remarkable differences between children
and adults are the language skills and the analyzing skills.
Education is the most efficient channel to help children
develop all these abilities. In grammar lessons, children
have the opportunity to master the rules of language
gradually until they are able to understand the ideas of
others completely and can fully express themselves.
Through training in the lessons of reading comprehension,
they learn to grasp the main idea, the structure and
the organization of an article effectively, which enables
them to absorb knowledge through reading in the rest of
their lives. Also, the lessons in sciences like mathematics
and logics contribute much to sharpen their ability of
analysis. This ability is potentially a powerful device in
solving all kinds of problems not only in their future careers
but also their daily lives as adults.
On the other hand, to get along well with other people is
a highly required skill for an adult. Children often encounter
obstacles with their friends in occasions like distribution
of toys. They frequently show insufficient care
about others and lack the strategy of compromise. Such
poor performances will be improved only by continual
social activities during which children will gain the precious
idea of team spirit and learn how to cooperate with
each other step by step, until eventually they become
competent group members, which is an essential demand
of adults.
Taking into account all the descriptions above, with the
two major experiences, as in education and in social activities,
children would turn into qualified social members,
namely adults.
Topic 167 Purchase computers or books?
The problem that whether school should choose to buy
books or computers can be controversial nowadays because
people often think that computers can replace
books soon. However, I would like to be on the side of
people who suggest that schools should books instead of
computers. There are several reasons of it and I will discuss
two main causes.
First, even though students can access the information
they want more easily, they often recognize that most of
the information in computers is apt to be inaccurate. Due
to the fact that many people send their information by
the Internet or email in order to get their own interests
such as money and fame, in this case, their information
are often distorted and biased.
Second, students who study their special area cannot get
a deep and wide knowledge through computers because
the knowledge from computers is inclined to be shallow
and introductive. If possible, students have to print them
out to study with long time and write something related
on it.
School's essential purpose, I believe, is getting student to
have a deep and wide knowledge to prepare for their
future lives in society. In this perspective, books are more
suitable to achieve this quintessence duty of schools than
computers. Therefore schools should choose to buy
books.
Topic 168 Why study abroad?
Recently, the rush of studying abroad has been gaining its
popularity at an amazing rate. More and more parents
have sent their children to western countries. Is it a benediction
or a malediction? In my view of point, I suppose
that the pros of studying abroad overweigh the cons.
Admittedly, we cannot ignore that studying abroad has its
drawbacks. For one thing, every year those who have
been studying in western countries have to spend approximately
15,000 US$ for tuition fees which are out of
budget of average families. Moreover, We have to face the
barrier of communication because of the dissimilar lifestyle
and teaching means adopted by the western universities,
which does engender many student involved in
disoriented rather than adapt to the local life.
Nevertheless, another side of coin of studying abroad is
definitely exciting. Firstly, most of western universities,
equipped with best facilities and well-educated professional
team, can help students to have easy access to the
latest knowledge of this society. It will undoubtedly dedicate
to students to enhance their knowledge of technology
and serve their homeland when they return to their
home countries.
Furthermore, a degree acquired in a western university
that are recognized by major countries, along with excellent
foreign language skills, undeniably would guarantee
a promising position in a joint venture company, which, 
ToeflEssays.com
91
to some extent, means high income and social status.
Last but by not least, living abroad for years, we may experience
a totally different life in contacting with people
from different cultural backgrounds. Therefore we will
have a chance to establish our individual networks that
will promote our business in the future.
To sum up, after all factors being taken into consideration,
we might come to a conclusion that the advantages of
studying abroad surpass its disadvantages. Albeit it may
cause some difficulties to students, which can be overcame
by arduous work, studying overseas will reward
those people a brilliant future.
Topic 169 Why is music important to many people?
Obviously music has inspired a seemingly endless stream
of fantastic productions such as CD, MTV, broadcasting,
concerts and so on, which we just cannot live without.
Today music is not just something for fun at all. It springs
out general human feelings, needs and desires at every
level.
Music can brings us information about cultures, history,
science, and religion all over the world. It is like the vase
that can collect every little dew in every corner in the
world and then pure it to irrigate people's hearts and
allow people to understand each other better regardless
of different languages, ages, and races.
Music provides an opportunity to reduce stress and help
us walk fearlessly towards difficulties. "Never give up
never give in. There can be miracles when you believe
through hope is fragile it is hard to kill. " In this rush
world it is inevitably that we sometimes feel so tired and
frustrated and even are going to lose our hope. When our
favorite tunes start playing filled with magic and power,
they are like the catalyst to refresh our heart and to enable
us to think on the right track In stead of beaten by
adversities, we can feel so optimistic that we will continue
being the truth seekers and rule our domain whatever
how hard it is.
Answered without hesitation, music is an exploration of
our deepest feelings and motivations and one of the
greatest of human treasure. Not only is it hard to measure
how much those musicians' masterpieces bring into our
society but also it is also difficult to imagine how long
they will continue to influence us. In conclusion, as music
can function as the roll to bring the world peace and
beauty, and bring people happiness and enjoyment, it is
self-evident that music is so important to us.
Topic 169 Why is music important to many people?
Music plays a very important role in our life. We can almost
hear music anywhere. Different music serves different
functions in our life. Why is music important to many
people? The reasons are presented below.
Music is a very important form of art. Like other arts, music
is ubiquitous and has become a part of our life. The
whole lifetime of people is accompanied by music. A baby
falls in sleep in the music of a lullaby; a young student
may learn to play a musical instrument and listen to music
from the radio, TV and a Walkman. There is music for
birthdays, for weddings, for Christmas, and for New
Year's Day. There is music for every single occasion in our
life.
We are surrounded by various kinds of music since we
were born and music has become an integral part of our
life. Interesting enough, music often serves as an important
part to other art forms, such as music in dancing,
drama and movies. As a matter of fact, many famous music
pieces come from dancing and movies, such as the
theme from "Love Story".
Music is part of the history. The history of music is almost
as long as the history of human civilizations. Music from
old times has become the great culture heritage to us.
One of the examples is classic music of Beethoven and
Tchaikovsky. People enjoy their music from generation to
generation.
Listening to music is one of the most popular forms of
entertainment. There are so many kinds of music that can
suit tastes of different people. Young people like pop music
and Rock-and-Roll and older people may enjoy classical
music and opera. Whether we are happy or sad, there
will always be music that we can listen to.
People can express their feelings and emotions through
music. Lovers often play soft love songs to show their
love and devotion to each other.
For the reasons presented above, we can see how important
music is to our life. It is hard to imagine a history
without music, and a life without music.
Topic 169 Melodic Memories
For as long as I can remember I have loved listening to
music. Whether I am simply walking to the store or going
on a trip around the world, I would need to take my
Discman. In fact, I would rather have my Discman than
my toothbrush. Music allows me to escape from reality,
alter my mood, and even remember events through association.

During a year away from home, I might have the need to
mentally escape from one thing or another. If, for example,
I had an extremely bad day due to losing my wallet
or suffering some sort of injury, I could use my Discman
as medicine. Merely put on the headphones and let the
righteous reggae of Bob Marley ease my pain. Music can
make us forget about our current circumstances, even if
only for a few minutes. This reason alone would make
me want to bring my Discman over anything else.
Closely related to music's ability to make people forget, is
its ability to alter moods. I can imagine that during my
year away from home, I might feel some form of homesickness.
It is inevitable for all travellers, let alone teenage
ones such as myself. If it ever happened to me, I could
simply put in a C.D. that reminds me of home and let it
wash away my worries. Music can make me go from sad
to happy and angry to relaxed. In this respect, Music is
better than any drug on the planet.
Finally, I can also use music as a tool to remember certain
events during my year away from home. If I was in Paris,
for instance, and I wanted to really remember what it was 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
92
like to walk down the Champs Elysee, I could listen to a
song by NOFX conveniently entitled Champs Elysee.
Then every time I listened to this song in the future, I
would remember what it was like to be there. This can
also work with totally unrelated songs. A song can help
you remember a certain trip or time just like the smell of
bacon sizzling can cause you to remember waking up
when you were little. Music can be a valuable memory aid.
If I had to spend a whole year away from home I would
not have to think very hard about what I would want to
take as my additional item. My Discman is my best friend,
my long-term memory, and my anti-depressant. I could
not live without music.
Topic 170 Why are groups or organizations important?
Human beings are social animals. One cannot live a good
life, if totally without others. Although people sometimes
may prefer staying alone to think and do their things,
generally, they have to join social activities. Obviously,
group activities are an important part of people's lives.
Since the ancient times, people learned to live together.
Compared with the cruel natural environment, human
beings seemed too weak and helpless. Wild animals
posed a threat to their lives all the time. If, instead of
fighting with the severe nature together, by living alone,
few could be successful to survive. People at that time
had to take part in-group activities.
Even in today's modern society, with the help of highly
developed science and technology, people do not need
to struggle for survive and life becomes no longer as
dangerous and hard as before, group activities are still a
necessary in many aspects. In my opinion the following
are some important arguments.
First, group activities help people to reach their goals. As
we all know, one piece of chopstick is easy to be broken,
but when ten pieces of chopstick are bound together, it
will be a tough job to break them. Suppose building a
house, one person may spend years to finish, but when
groups of people take part in, the building will be accomplished
more quickly.
Besides, group activities can help people when difficulties
arise. It is hard to imagine when a person, who never
joins in group activities, suddenly got sick, what he will
feel if nobody comes to help and take care of him.
The most important of all, group activities make life more
colorful. This can be testified in our daily life. It is fantastic
to take part in signing, dancing, or traveling groups,
after tight-stringed workdays. But all this activities will
lose their attractions and meaning if done by a person
alone. Suppose a very sociable person may be surrounded
by applause and respect. Absolutely this will
boost up his self-confidence, and therefore makes his life
more enjoyable.
Group activities have already become an indispensable
part of people's life. So how can you shun other people?
Go out and meet them!
Topic 171 What would you take for a trip?
Whenever I prepare for a long trip, I remember that there
is always one thing which I will remind myself to take
with me every single time, that is a photo of my whole
family, with my mom and dad and me in it. I know that
one will be enough for me, and I tell myself at the bottom
of my heart that this one photo will be my best companion
through the entire trip. It constantly brings me back
the warm feeling of home and it helps me overcome
those difficulties on my way.
Wherever I go, one family photo always tends to provide
me the familiar feeling of home and a sense of belonging.
For any person, especially a sensitive girl like me, the biggest
enemy is nothing but loneliness and fear. Immersed
by that wordless isolation and fear of the brand-new environment
you have to deal with. There are no friends by
your sides to talk to and there is no one or place you can
rely on. What do you need the most at this moment? I
may say a photo of your family, of all your very dearest
family members in it, your mom, dad and your brothers
and sisters. They are the biggest comfort one can feel so
directly and immediately. Their sincere smiles and their
soft and emotional eye-expressions soon remind you
again that familiar feeling of home and the power to assure
you that no matter where you are, you are not a
rambler in this cold world and you are not all alone by
yourself, you belong to them and to that home.
Also, a family photo helps one get through one's difficulties
when they are on a trip. What do we think of the
most when we are in trouble or in those tough situations
that we have to deal with? Is it not our own families?
What are we longing to see and hear the most? Is it not
their loving faces and their caring words? Well, why not
take a look at your photo in hand when they are not
around at those particular moments? For it has a incredibly
invisible power which can restore your inspiration
and your faith at that very instant when your eyes make
contact with your mom and dad. You feel as if you can
see through their eyes and hear their genuine suggestions.
Relief you from that desperate loneliness and comfort
you when without anyone around but those hardest
times come into life; that is what a family photo can do--
forever be a very best companion of you on your way of
that endless trip...
Topic 171 What would you take for a trip?
When you see a beautiful view of rising sun, when you
see a spectacular waterfall, when you enjoy the moment
you travel with your friends, at this time, what do you
especially want? I believe the answer is a camera. It is also
what I would take in addition to clothing and personal
care items when I plan to have a long trip.
The main reason for taking a camera is that a camera will
record everything that happens during a trip. If you see a
beautiful scenery, you can take a picture of it. If you meet
a humorous and nice person on the way, you can have
someone taken a picture for you and the new friend. If
you meet a girl you fall in love in the trip, why not ask
your friend to take a picture when you give a rose to her?
Let's imagine how disappointed it is if you do not have a 
ToeflEssays.com
93
camera with you at that time.
Another reason is that each picture is a memory. Maybe a
person will take many trips in his life, if you take many
pictures in each trip, you will find it is just like a novel
about your own life. When you are old, you will always
recall many things that happened long before. At that
time, you will take out the albums and look at them with
happy tears. You also can find how you loved the life and
what a pleasant life that god gave you.
Above the two reasons, you can find it is very important
to take a camera with your trip. And that is my choice
when I am preparing for a trip.
Topic 171 What would you take for a trip?
If I were supposed to leave my home for one year, I will
take surely with me, besides clothing and personal care
items, the picture of my girlfriend.
I will take my girlfriend's picture with me, mainly because
she is the most important person in my life. Also to be
able to see her all days and finally to remember that there
is something important to return my home.
My girlfriend is the love of my life. During all the time I
have spent with her, I have realized that she is the only
woman I want to be for the rest of my life. She brings me
both peace and security. Furthermore she gives me a reason
to keep enjoying this party called "the life." No matter
how, I will always try to be with her. That is why, carrying
a picture of her can be a way to see her during all
this long year. I could see her anytime I wanted to, no
matter what time it is. In the mornings I would receive all
her blessing thoughts just by looking to the picture. This
would give me the strength to start the day with happiness.
In the afternoons I could buy some food and eat in
front of her to feel that we are eating together. Finally
during the nights I could talk to the picture, pretending
that she is there in the same place with me, and tell her
all the experiences I got through the day, so that would
help me to go to the bed not feeling alone but full of
peace.
The picture would help me to remember that there is
someone in other place who loves me and who cares
about me. It would remind me that I have her to support
me and give me all the confidence I need to be a better
man in my life. In conclusion, If I have to choose one
thing to take with me in a one year trip, that will be without
a doubt my girlfriend's picture. Basically I would feel
that she is with me all the time, I would remember that
someone else loves me and that I love her too, and finally
the picture would bring me the strength and will to be a
better person and return eagerly to my home.
Topic 172 How can schools help new students?
Students always face problems when they move to a new
school. It might take a long time for them to get familiar
with the new neighborhood and the new environment.
And it is undoubtedly the responsibility of the schools to
help them out.
The most urgent task is to settle the newcomers down
and make them acquainted with the neighborhood. In
some public schools, the school-owned apartment is far
from adequate, therefore the schools may do something
to help the students find apartments, as well as provide
them with temporary accommodations. There is also little
time for students to learn where the laundry, the post
office, the supermarket, etc., are. Thus, it is helpful and
convenient of the school to provide information as above
for the new students.
Students do study. So it is also important for new students
to be familiar with the academic stuffs of the new
school. I believe it is the academic departments’ responsibility
to provider the students with such information.
Introductory seminars help students be aware of how do
the faculties to in their research work such that they can
choose their research field and advisor rationally.
What is more, it is also necessary for the newcomers to be
fully involved with the traditions of the new school. It is
well known than different schools have different traditions,
and these traditions should be a precious experience
of the students. Then it is always reasonable that the
schools provider some opportunities, for instance, holding
lectures.
To sum up, the schools may take various measures to
help the new students become acquainted with their new
neighborhood, and to give the new students adequate
information about the school, for example, academic information
and traditions. These make the students familiar
with the new schools as soon as possible.
Topic 173 Does borrowing money harm friendship?
It is claimed that developing a real friendship is a long
and complicated process. Maybe the reason is that firstly
people have to know each other very well. And after that
they begin to trust each other and to prove themselves as
real friends.
Unfortunately, it is as difficult to develop a friendship, as
it is easy to ruin one. One of the things that can test
friendship is borrowing money from a friend. I do agree
that sometimes it could harm or damage the friendship.
Money can destroy almost everything, in fact. Borrowing
and lending money can be considered as signs of mutual
trust. And if the money is not given back in time or not
given back at all it will embarrass both parties. Thus series
of misunderstandings begin which could actually
ruin the friendship.
Borrowing money is often comprehended as a simple act
of help and favor. But when the faith in the reliability of a
friend is lost it will harm and damage the friendship for
sure.
Friendship resembles a contract between two people,
although its rules remain unwritten. And when one of the
friends does not play by the rules the other one simply
quits the game called friendship. The result is a bitter
recollection from a damaged friendship. In conclusionwe
have a few real friends in our lifetime and it would be
a shame to lose some of them because of such banal
problem as money. In my opinion, money does not
worth as much as our friends do. And if we cause harm to
any of them and if we ruin something so important and 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
94
invaluable as real friendship because of money, it will be
one of the biggest mistakes in our lives.
So let's be wiser and never make a friend go because of
money.
Topic 173 Money and friendship
Friendship is the most beautiful thing in the whole wide
world. Money, on the other hand, is the most essential
thing in the whole wide world. So, while dealing with
these two very important and sensitive things, one has to
be very careful. Before giving my opinion about the topic,
I would like to discuss with you some of the reasons
which can harm the friendship and some which do not
harm friendship.
Friendship is a relationship based on give and take. So, as
long as there is both give and take, I don't think there
would be any fear of harming the friendship. Some things
to be kept in mind while borrowing money are- 1. Borrow
money from a friend who is financially stable and
doesn't mind sharing some bucks with you. 2. Return the
money before deadline, even earlier if possible. 3. Do not
make borrowing a habit. If these things are followed any
good friend will be happy to help and the relationship
will also be not hurt. After all, a friend in need is a friend
indeed.
Some of the things that may hurt the friendship are- 1.
Choosing a wrong friend to borrow money. Some people
do not like lending money to anyone. Such people will
lend the money if a friend asks for it. But then, they become
very nosey and keep nagging the friend asking him
to pay back. This attitude is very unhealthy for a good
friendship. 2. Making borrowing a habit. There are some
people who make borrowing a habit. It is ok to borrow
money once or twice or when there is real need for
money. If borrowing keeps continuing, it becomes very
annoying and thus harm friendship, because, too much is
always too bad. 3. Not returning the money on time. It is
possible that you lend money to a friend because he was
in need of money. As a good friend it is his responsibility
to return the money as promised, because you may be
having some other plans and be counting on that money.
So delay in paying back (especially when the donor is in
need), can be harmful to friendship.
Life is like a turning wheel. What goes up should come
down. So we can never say when we could be in need of
money and friends. So I think we should help real friends
who are in need of money. We can also borrow money
from good friends, but be careful in choosing the correct
friend and keep up the trust.
As far as my opinion about the topic goes, I think borrowing
money can ruin a good friendship. There are friends
who say that nothing can come in-between them and they
would do anything for friendship. But such ideas are only
good in stories. In real world, money is a very important
factor and can influence any kind of person. So chances
of hurting a relationship is very high. I think "Friendship
is like a golden chain. Once broken, can be mend again.
But the scar still remains". So it is not worth to take a
chance with the "highly influential money" and ruin an
otherwise long-lasting friendship.
Topic 174 Generation differences
Everybody talks about a conflict between generations.
This is a well-known expression, used as an explanation
for misunderstandings between people of different ages.
Although sometimes this is an excuse for not recognizing
who is wrong or right, it is certain that every generation
of people is different in important ways.
Even though everybody probably thinks this way, the differences
between my generation and my parents' generation
are striking. The technological progress is a certain
cause for these differences. My parents did not have access
to information as teenagers nowadays have. Television,
for example, was a luxury that not many people
could have afforded, and even if they could, the television
programs were very poor. I remember my mother mentioning
how eager they were to watch TV series like
"Samantha" or "The Giants' Planet." Those films seem so
trivial these days.
Another important difference between our generations is
caused by the type of political power that governed the
country. My parents grew up under a communist regime
whose main characteristic was censure. This censure prohibited
them to speak up their mind in public. Strict rules
must have been obeyed; otherwise they could have been
seriously punished. Nowadays, we live in a democratic
environment that cannot possibly be compared with the
pressure of a communist government. This means that
people are encouraged to think for themselves and not to
fear to express their true opinion. Of course, this leads
sometimes to violent acts from people who misunderstand
the role of the democracy.
Differences between generations have always existed and
it is natural for them to exist. Progress leads to differences
of opinions and points of view. My generation and
my parents' generation are different, but this does not
mean that one is significantly better than the other one. I
think we all should remember that before starting to
judge one another.
Topic 175 Should students talk on classes?
There is a growing public concern over education methods,
and the speaker in the title above advocates that
education will be truly effective only when it is specifically
designed to meet the individual needs and interests
of each student. By contrast, some people may argue that
the traditional teacher-centered way is more suitable for
education. On balance, I would like to side with the former
opinion.
First of all, the traditional teacher-centered education
ignores the individual needs and interests of each student,
which proves counterproductive. For centuries, we place
too much emphasis on the importance of teachers in education,
and take it for granted that it is the teachers' duty
to determine what and how to teach, meanwhile, the students
should accept what are provided to them. But recent
study committed by many experts of psychology and
education reveals that this traditional single-side education
method has low efficiency, because this way of teaching
puts students in almost a passive position. As our society
progresses every minute, old concept of education 
ToeflEssays.com
95
should be transformed, from teacher-centered to studentcentered,
which will help to achieve more quickly and
effective teaching and learning.
As a matter of fact, only earnest communication and interactions
lead to better effects of study, and they should
base on the acknowledgment of the differences from on
student to another. Since teaching is a process full of interaction,
a mutual understand helps teachers to adjust
the way of teaching and to let students represent their
reactions at the same time. Furthermore, every student is
a unique individual. They may differ from each other in
regards to reading, writing, comprehension, etc. Consequently,
when teaching the classes, a teacher takes diversity
of students into account is more likely to pass knowledge
to students than a teacher who ignores the difference.

In addition, student-centered education can most effectively
involve individual student in the learning process.
When student-centered education is introduced, students
will feel that they are be focused on, which may help
them to participate in the learning process, and this proactive
condition will contribute to effective learning. Not
only do the students benefit from this method, teachers
will soon discover that teaching is becoming a joyful
thing, not dull any longer. Another reason to advocate
student-centered education is the relationship between
students and teachers, or learning and teaching, which
was considered two separate things, are in fact two sides
of a coin. Once the harmony between these two things is
established, effective education will become reality.
However, when we suggest student-centered method,
winking at students' unreasonable desired would only
result in chaos in education. Like any method else, student-centered
education may also have some side effects,
if we do not make some rules to control students' behavior,
teaching will a tough job and leaning will like playing
games. Since these images are not supposed, appropriate
management should be introduced with student-centered
education.
In sum, it is very likely that people will never be able to
come to the same conclusion on this controversial issue
due to their different experiences and conflicting values,
public awareness of the various dimensions of the issue
discussed in the above argument will certainly contribute
to the thorough understanding of the problem. Though
different views exist, I insist than student-centered education
with effective management will enrich our education.
Topic 176 What holiday would you create?
If I could create a new holiday, it would be a holiday that
honors the freedom and progress of the Afghan women. I
would established the holiday to multiply efforts of the
Feminist Majority Foundation with the Campaign to help
Afghan Women and young girls to ensure that women's
rights are fully and permanently restored after the fall of
the Taliban regime, which symbolized the brutality
against the women in Afghanistan in the past years.
When the Taliban took control in 1996, they instituted a
gender apartheid for the women. They imposed strict
edicts such as banished women from the work force,
closed school to girls, expelled women from universities,
prohibited women from leaving their home unless accompanied
by a close male relative, forced women to use
the burga or chadari, paint windows of women's houses
black, prohibited women from being examined by male
physicians, while at the same time prohibited most female
doctors and nurses from practicing.
The reality for the women during Taliban control shows a
lot of horrors against the women who defied the rules of
the Taliban and were severely punished. For example
some girls were killed in front of their families because
they run to the schools; some women were brutally
heated because their ankle was accidentally showed from
underneath their burga. Two women accused of prostitution
were publicly hanged in the stadium.
Today, after the fall of Taliban, women can leave their
homes without the escort of a male family member. They
no longer have to cram into the back of buses and give
up their seats to men. They can get their hair and nails
done in beauty salons that have opened up all over Kabul.
Girls can go to school, and young women to universities,
where they sometimes even share classrooms with men.
Being a woman can sometimes be an advantage in the job
market. In Kabul, Indian models are admired for their
fashion, but many Afghan women still wear the traditional
burqa.
I would like that the people celebrate the new holiday by
publishing the advances of the campaign through web
sites, organizing some lectures about the progress of the
afghan women, promoting scholarships for women to
study, and encouraging the women from all over the
world to maintain the faith to pursue the dreams.
The reason why I would create an international holiday
for the Afghan women is because the international community
must now act to ensure that women's rights are
fully and permanently restored, to reestablish a constitutional
democracy in Afghanistan that is representative of
women and ethnic minorities, and to show an example to
women of the world of how can we solve difficulties in
this way.
Topic 177 A vacation or a car?
On the question of whether it is better to use one's savings
to buy a car or go on traveling, I, more often than
not, prefer to the latter decision.
It is true that having a car has a variety of advantages; I
must confess that I myself enjoy the fun of driving and
the strong sense of freedom gained from owing a car.
Superior as it is, nevertheless, it brings its own problems.
For one thing, private car burdens the traffic that has already
been over loaded. Every one of us must have experienced
the miserable feeling of being stuck at tollgate
on our way to office; only at this moment do most people
realize how bad the result of uncontrolled increase in
private vehicles can be. For another, it worsens the problem
of environmental pollution. The fun of driving is one
thing, while how to deal with the consequence of air pollution
is another. It is estimated that every year the gov-
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
96
ernment of China spends well over 12% of its fiscal income
to tackle the environmental damage caused by
automobiles.
As a matter of fact, the advantages of going traveling outweigh
any benefit we gain from having a car. First of all,
studies show that traveling is amongst the most desirable
alternatives of social activities. It is obvious that a person
fund of traveling must be healthier that one 'dwelling' in
his car. Hiking, mountain climbing, camping, skiing, canoeing
and all other tourism related exercises force us to
use our muscles, stretch our bodies and deepen our
breath. More over, the overwhelming joy of conquering a
mountain peak or lingering in one of the most famous
Middle East bazaars is surely out of reach in your car. In
addition, traveling fans hardly have to suffer from the
torture of sleepless which has long been bothering the
'white collars'. Still, the enchanting beauty of various
landscapes and folk cultures helps broaden your eyesight
and provides you with a brand new insight into the mysterious
planet.
From what has been discussed above, we may safely draw
the conclusion that it is not only wise but also socially
desirable for us to spend our money on tourism rather
than buying a car.
Topic 177 A vacation or a car?
The development of technologies and industries has
brought us many conveniences. With the help of modern
conveniences such as cars, buses, trains and planes, one
can travel a great distance in a short period of time. One
of my friends has received a gift of money. He is thinking
about using this money to buy a new car or go on a vacation.
Personally I would suggest that my friend buy a car.
The first and most important reason is that a car can
bring him convenience. Undoubtedly, nowadays people
rely on cars for transportation more than ever before. For
example, when he drives a car to go shopping, he may
feel more convenient and can pick up more groceries
than before because he can put groceries in the car trunk
instead of carrying them by hands. Furthermore, when he
wants to pick somebody up, or travel to a scenic spot, a
car will make him feel convenient.
Another great reason why I encourage my friend to buy a
car is that my friend will not spend much time on commuting
anymore. Everyday we waste too much time on
waiting for a bus or riding a bicycle to work. We all experienced
the frustration of taking a bus. After having
their own cars, such the problems will disappear automatically.

Of course, if my friend decides to use his money to go on
a vacation, I think that there are some advantages also.
For example a vacation may increase his personal experience
and knowledge, and may even reduce many troubles
that are related to a car. But if all the factors are contemplated,
I think that the advantages of buying the car
will carry more weight than those of going on vacation.
From what has been discussed above, I may safely draw
the conclusion that buying a car will be a right choice for
my friend.
Topic 178 Changes in the 21st century
About a decade ago, people were eagerly looking forward
to ushering the new century-the 21st century with the
hope of seeing a fresh beginning of human civilization.
There is no denying that with the development of the IT
industry and numerous other industries, people's life is
getting more and more convenient. However, I have to
act as a wet blanket here, unwilling though I am, to point
out that the blind "progressiveness" of human beings
have caused an irretrievable disaster that is revealing its
monstrous face in the new century.
The first sign of damaged nature appeared much earlier
without being noticed by us. As a result, nature continues
to be abused. My grandmother lives in the countryside.
Years ago, when I was still a little girl, there was endless
woods and crystal clear streams and rivers there, but now,
what you can possibly find are chopped down wasteland
and yellow-colored brooks. The environment is deteriorating
in spite of a few people's awareness of the danger.
Consequently, the deteriorated environment breeds a far
more moody climate than before. My hometown is a
beautiful seaside city. Living here for more than two decades,
I didn't see any sandstorm until this spring. I could
hardly breathe or see things clearly in the yellowish air. I
was in shock. Another example comes from a city afar
near the Mediterranean. Floods devastate the summerhouses
along the coast, aborting people's plans for the
summer and causing enormous damage to the economy
of those countries.
Therefore, I want to say when you are surfing on line,
browsing the messages sent through your cell phones
and busy in doing biotechnological experiments, do not
be overwhelmed by the benefits of the new century, instead,
you should think more about how to protect the
environment and thus improve the climate, which is indeed
the biggest change brought by the new century.
Topic 178 Changes in the 21st century
With the advent of the 21st century, the world is facing
many changes. There are incredible advancements in science
and technology fields. In my point of view, these
breakthroughs will bring more conveniences to people
and make our life easier.
First of all, one of the most significant changes is the use
of computers and robots. Using of such computers and
robots in industries can bring an increase in output and
accuracy. Also, these computer parts and robots are being
made so tiny that they can be built into both personal
and industrial equipments.
Moreover, there will be more innovations, inventions and
researches in different areas of science and technology,
such as more advanced telecommunication with a new
generation of satellites, faster means of transportations,
newer engines for planes, and quicker diagnosis of diseases
by using advanced auto analyzers.
On the other hand, a few disadvantages such as air and
water pollution, decreasing of natural resources cannot
be underestimated. Although these negative aspects are
almost negligible in comparison with great advancements 
ToeflEssays.com
97
of this new century, most scientists believe that these
negative effects are not overrated.
In conclusion, it can be concluded that not only does the
new century brings us many great advantages, but also it
brings a few disadvantages in which people have to deal
with.
Topic 178 Changes in the 21st century
The 21st century has just begun. Upon the question
"what changes the new century will bring," different
people have different opinions. Some may believe that
the new century will bring us more awareness on security
issues. As far as I am concerned, I agree with this point of
view. I believe that safety and security are more and more
important for our day-to-day life in this new century. In
the following I will try to make my position clearer.
One of the most significant events at the beginning of the
new century is the "9/11" attack. The terrorists launched
an attack to the United States, causing lost of lives and
huge damage to the world's economy. Since the "9/11",
there has been more and more worries and consciousness
about the security issues in our life than ever before.
For instance, when we travel abroad, we have to pass intensive
security-checks at airports and borders. The waiting
time at those places are much longer than ever before.
In addition, nations have to invest greater amount of
money to improve the security measurements during international
events such as the Olympic Games, in order
to protect personal safety of officials, reporters, athletes
and audiences from around the world. Moreover, everyday
we can hear from the news that some terrorists' attacks
and wars are happening somewhere in the world.
The world has become a dangerous place. As a result,
more and more people nowadays prefer to spend their
holidays at home. In a TV show, "Faith POPCORN- Report",
when people are being asked opinions about their
homes, they say “my home is my castle”. It is even said
that it is more secure to live in the wilderness than in the
city, due to the fact of crime, drugs and environmental
pollutions.
Security issues has changed our lifestyle dramatically. Life
will quickly become different for all of us. Therefore it
will be more important to reinforce our safety in the new
century.
Topic 179 Qualities of a good parent
Parents play an important role in the child’s upbringing.
However, it is not easy to be a good parent, much to the
surprise of those who think dealing with young children
is a piece of cake. In my view, to be a good parent you
have to meet certain requirements that I am going to discuss
further in the following paragraphs.
You should spend time with your child. Please do not
mistake me. By that I am not saying you must resign from
your job and stay at home with your baby all day; instead,
I am referring to quality time. To be a good parent you
need to know your child well; if you do not even have the
minimum amount of time to start with, how on earth are
you going to know your child? No matter how busy you
are, be you a businessman or a police officer, you must
get some time off work to be with your child. Knowing
how impressionable a child at his tender age is, you cannot
expect him to feel close to someone he barely see
everyday, much less play the role of a good parent. However,
I am not talking about large amount of time that
busy as you are, you may not be able to afford. Remember,
it is quality time, not quantity time. You can be a CEO and
still be a good parent if you make good use of the limited
amount of time you spend with your child. A small talk
after dinner or a little story before bed may well perform
the magic.
In order to be a good parent, you also have to be strict; it
is for the child’s own good. He may not like it of course,
who will? However, it is from strict parent that a child
learns discipline. Under certain circumstances I even
agree with the use of force. A good beating or a severe
scolding is far easier to remember for a little child than a
patient persuasion. He is too young for you to reason
with; but you can make him learn his lesson the hard way
if the little sweet talk fails. Though I think the use of force
is the last resort a parent should turn to, it is nonetheless
rather effective.
A good parent should be caring and loving. A strong
bond is formed between the parent and the child if there
is love. This is something magical and inexplicable but
both the parent and the child feel it. What makes a parent
so special and important is the unconditional love he/she
gives to his/her child. A loving and caring environment is
very crucial in a child’s growth. Statistics have shown that
those from happy families have a more optimistic view of
the world and generally live happy lives, while those from
broken families or families where both parents quarrel
often are more irritable and peevish. A child’s character is
easily shaped by the surroundings so it is a parent’s responsibility
to provide a loving environment to his/her
child.
A good parent should also be a good role model for the
child to look up to. A child learns many of his habits from
his parents and it is all up to a parent to choose what
kind of habits he/she wants his/her child to inherit. For
example, a parent should immediately quit smoking if
he/she notices his/her child has the tendency to pick up
this bad habit. All in all, a good parent should behave
himself in order to set good examples to his child. To be
a good parent is hard but not impossible; in fact I believe
all those who really put in a great deal of effort should
find themselves doing well in this job. After all what is
more important is the attitude; if one wants to be a good
parent, he can do it.
Topic 180 Why are movies so popular?
There is no denying that movies have inspired a seemingly
endless stream of fantastic and exciting issues that
we just cannot live without. In fact, the dizzying emergence
of movie production can create everything we can
imagine on screens and what's more they continue bringing
us the most wonderful stars and classic stories that
will be always remembered by us. Movies have not only
been a kind of entertainment we can enjoy, they but have 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
98
also helped build up an important part of our society.
With the high-tech development of electronic tools it is
possible to make everything we are eager to see, especially
something that people are always curious about
such as dinosaurs, spaceships and even something very
scary, unbelievable or gorgeous. For example, directed by
an impressive well-known story, The Lord Of The Rings
brings us to a supernatural world filled with miracles and
imaginations that impressed people a lot.
Based on nicely written stories perhaps the most important
thing is that movies introduce us those amazing actors.
Not only are they so pretty and handsome but they
also are the best artists that contribute to our world in
many ways. Because of all the celebrated characters they
personated, they are considered as the symbol of brave,
optimistic, strong-willed and pure-hearted people who
are dare to walk fearlessly towards the challenges. Encouraged
by them, we become more and more confident
and make our minds to be the truth seekers that will insist
on overcoming every difficulty to stop being mundane
and mediocre.
Even some stars were gone long ago they are still our
irreplaceable spirit's leaders such as Clark Gable, Audrey
Hepburn, and others. Movies are always not just be appreciated
by their dramatic pictures, they are deeply analyzed
by worthiness, humanity, ideology and the complex
influence they will bring into people's mind. In conclusion,
with gorgeous ornamentation and very valuable
themes it is no surprising that movies are extremely
popular overall the world. Known as the epitome of our
realistic society, movies can always dominate its place and
continue to bring us what we want to see in sight and
what we want to feel in heart.
Topic 181 Should lands be developed?
Just as our human beings came from nature, we would
return to nature sooner or later. It is self-evident that losing
our natural condition means that we are building up
a sepulcher for ourselves.
Nature is the original source of our food, house utilities
and industries. So we cannot live without her. Sucked the
nutrition from nature, we created a wonderful world. She
is our mother who we always turn back on. Wise and resourceful
are people to try their best to keep nature prosperous
and abounded.
Many people may hold the wrong opinion that spending
money in preserving nature is a big waste of money. Even
though, it is true that we cannot see much of the returns
in the near future, it is worthy in the long run. What is
more, nature itself can make money. The beautiful landscape
of nature that was saved will attract many visitors.
We also have many different famous places for people
who came from all over the world. In fact, it is a highprofit
business and will contribute to our economic in
the days coming.
Taking a look at our country's qoe-state, our agrarian land
is diminishing quickly. Nature areas are vanishing year by
year. We are just facing a thorny way that needs us to take
measurements on immediately. Thus, there is no reason
to neglect the fact that there is more need for land to be
left in its natural condition.
Burdening the great historical task, we cannot use up the
limited source to fulfill our unbounded desires. Housing
and industry but make us live a bit more comfortable
now. They cannot lead us go further. We should leave
what we have inherited from our ascendants to the descendants.

Topic 182 Is human relationship with pets useful?
Human has a long history of feeding pets. With the development
of human society more and more people have
pets in their families. They love to be accompanied by
their pets and they look them as their family members.
They eat with their pets, stroll with their pets, and even
sleep with their pets. And I think having a close relationship
with pets is very good for people, the reasons why I
say so as follows.
First, having a pet is very good for children. Children always
need someone to play with them, take care of them,
but their parents cannot do it all the time. When children
have a pet, for example, a dog, they will be attracted by it
and spend most of their time playing with it. The children
will not feel lonely when their parents cannot take care of
them. Besides, that also makes parents have their own
time to do something they need.
Second, pets are also good for adults, especially those
works under pressure. Now many people work so hard
everyday that they do not have time to relax and talk with
friends. If they have pets, whenever they get to home they
can talk to them, look them as persons, tell them what
they are anxious about. This would help people to reduce
their pressure and make them have a better mood.
Third, most of the owners of pets are senior citizens.
That's not a coincidence. Because youngsters leave home
for their new lives. They do not have much time to spend
with their parents. The old people feel so lonely when
they facing the empty rooms. Pets can reduce their loneliness.
Old people can take care of them, feed them, talk
to them just like taking care of their own children. And
the medical research shows that patting pets, such as cats
and dogs can reduce the blood pressure, this is also very
important to old people.
Although sometimes pets make your room a mess, break
your favorite vase, even some time they bite you, the advantages
of having a close relationship with pets overweight
the disadvantages. Have a pet if you like and enjoy
it.
For free essay discussion forums and more sample essays,
please visit http://www.toeflessays.com.
Topic 182 Is human relationship with pets useful?
Many pets are said to be men's best friends. Though being
only an animal or a bird, still they are considered to
be a part of the family. They share a special bonding with
the members of the family. I definitely believe that these
relationships are good. There are many reasons to it.
We see many families today with dogs or cats as their pets.
We get a variety of pets' food. These families feed their
pets with these foods available in the market and raise 
ToeflEssays.com
99
their pets like their own family members. Today the expenses
for raising a child and a pet are the same. Though
an animal cannot talk it can understand well and the
same as what human beings do. Many pets provide emotional
support to the family that they just do it by their
mere existence.
Dogs are said to be the best caretakers. They bark upon
strangers and welcome known people. In this way it
helps his family by guarding them against any dangers.
There have been many cases in the past were animals
have actually helped in preventing robbery or any other
unknown dangers.
These animals do feel the same as humans do. When the
family to which he belongs to is not there at home he
becomes sad and stops eating. In fact these animals show
different signs when they are happy. For example, dogs
wag their tail when they see their owners or any of the
family members. Since they have the same quality what
humans have they are bound to get close to family they
belong to and it's the same with the family too. They are
provided medication if not well, taken to veterans and
treated in the same manner in the way any other family
member would have treated if unwell.
Animals are said to be their best friends since they do not
stab the family they are in. There are movies that show
different relationships, which an animal shares with his
owner. These movies actually depict the real cases or the
real emotion of the animals as well as the family towards
them. They expect love and care, which their family gives.
Also in a family, when a child grows up he goes to high
school and then college. He no longer stays with his parents.
But the pet of the family is still there in that family
caring and being cared by the family.
Thus because of the human quality of kindness, emotional
and well being animals form an important part of
the family they belong to and the family treats them as
one amongst them.
Topic 182 Is human relationship with pets useful?
Pets have always been a part of human life structure.
Thus, each and every human culture contains different
morals and regulations on treating the pets. For my part,
I must argue in favor of treating pets almost like family
members. I am going to mention two reasons to support
the slightly altered idea.
First of all, I'd like to mention the fact, that no matter
human, animal or plant a living thing has needs and feelings,
which if not fulfilled, could have serious effects on
its physical and mental (or spiritual) health. Thus, although
one may criticize owning and keeping a pet, does
not bring as much responsibility as raising a child, the
concept of responsibility and caring remains the same in
both situations. Consequently I believe the owners
should be blamed in case they do not realize and accept
the pet's rights, and history of binding in the loving and
caring natural environment, which fulfilled all its needs,
and in case they keep and treat it as it were a mere source
of entertainment or labor. As I mentioned before, a pet is
almost comparable with a child. Taking the responsibility
to pet an animal requires determined commitment to
fulfill its needs and replacing the loving environment it
could have in nature, with another loving one. Therefore,
if accepted in the social culture as a member of the family,
the pet is more likely to receive what it deserves.
In addition to the necessity of the sensational bindings
and mutual relationships between the pet and its owners,
which makes it like a member of the family, there is a
disadvantage to this highly sensational binding. First, they
owners should always keep in mind to prioritize emotional
and financial needs of the human family members.
Secondly, most domestic animals have shorter life than
human beings, therefore the owners -in other word, human
family members- usually encounter its death during
their lifetime. As a result, I believe that the owners must
always keep this fact in mind in order to prevent deep
sensational damages. Consequently, although taking care
of the pet's health, the owners should be able to control
their emotional reliance on the pet. However, the unsafe
and corrupted human communication in our modern
world makes lots of owners so bound to their pets, that
they find living difficult after their loss.
A question has been raised on whether pets should be
treated as members of the family or not. The needs of
pets and the responsibility of the owners as well as the
fact that pets usually die before their owners and that
human family members must have higher priorities, make
me agree with the idea in case the word almost could be
added to the main question.
Topic 182 Is human relationship with pets useful?
I think that having close relationship with pets is good as
long as you do not over do it. Pets are friendly and loving.
Let me explain my point of view.
Pets can be our friends. Especially in old age when our
children go away from home to study we feel lonely, then
we can keep a pet. Pets could keep us busy and lessen
the feeling of loneliness. We can spend most of the time
with pets like feeding them, and taking them a walk. Pets
are healthy to keep if they could take our mind off of the
troubles of day. But on the other hand, if we worry unnecessarily
about the items such as food, clothes etc. and
behavior of pet, then it's not healthy for us.
Some animals like cats, parrots, and rabbit are very loving.
We can easily love these animals. But emotional involvement
with animals is not very good. Some people treat
pets as part of their family. They take pets to their own
bedrooms and give them place to sleep on their bed.
They give them seat on couch or take them in the lap. I
do not think all this is very healthy for us. We should have
separate utensils and space for pets. A few people try to
teach pets eating with spoon and forks, they are happy if
pets learn easily. Expecting pets to behave like humans
might not be good for pets, after all they are animals.
There are many store who sell all kind of stuff related to
pets such as pet food, pet clothes, pet toys, and pet
homes. Buying nutritious food and separate homes for
pets is necessary. We should even buy a few toys for entertainment
of our pet. Now a day's pet owners spend 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
100
hundreds of dollars on buying special types of pet food,
costly toys, and expensive pet homes. They try to get
luxurious things for their pets. I think these people
should donate some of that money to child food banks,
since many children in our country do not have food to
eat. I think spending extra money on pets is waste of
money.
According to me, pets can be friendly and feeling close to
them can be healthy, if we do not worry much about
them.
Topic 183 A country from its movies
I believe that every film contains a lot of information
about the county where it was made. Usually films show
us the great variety of cultural peculiarities about country
where they came from. Personally, I have learnt many
new things about different countries and their people
from watching their movies.
I remember, as a child I used to enjoy watching Indian
films. It was very exciting experience for a young girl who
was fond of Indian songs and the national clothes. From
Indian movies I learnt that the Indian culture is very rich
and colorful. I found out that they are mostly romantic
people who love to sing and dance. Also, it was interesting
to know that there are different religions and a plethora
of ethnic groups in India.
I would say that I learnt a lot not only about Indian traditions
and culture from watching its films. To tell the truth,
Russian movies were very educational for me too. If you
watch them carefully, you will probably notice that they
contain a great amount of information about Russian
people and their culture. For example, I realized that
Russians are incredibly honest people who like to celebrate
many events with a lot of food, and of course with
vodka. I learnt from Russian films about their hostility
and willingness to great and meet other people. Russian
movies show that all that is a big part of their traditions.
To summarize, I would say that from watching international
films we are able to learn many new things about
different nations. Moreover, films educate us about cultural
and traditional varieties of many countries.
Topic 183 A country from its movies
Movies are an important part of the culture of a country
where they are made. Watching a film, like listening to
music or reading a book can tell one a lot about things
that people value and the way they interact. In this essay I
would like to share my perception about the United
States that I gained by watching American movies.
My first observation is that the USA is a very rich country.
This is reflected in the types of average people shown in
the movies, most of whom are home-owners with a car
and a full-time job. They usually can afford to dine in fine
restaurants and travel around the world. For example, in
the recent movie "Just Married", a young couple from
America stayed in nice hotels and traveled all around
Europe for their honeymoon.
US movies are also high-budget movies with a lot of special
effects and excellent sound and picture quality. This
is another reflection of the amount of wealth in the country
that can produce movies such as "Troy", "Titanic" or
"Gladiator" that featured both multi-million budgets and
collections from the theaters around the world.
Another observation is that Americans are very individualistic
and independent people. Children leave the family
after the high school, since when they often do not receive
support from their parents and have to rely on
themselves to maintain their living. Many young movie
characters (such as in the movie "Bartender" have to
support themselves or their education by low-prestige
jobs such as waiting even if their parents are very
wealthy. )
The last feature of America that I observed from US movies
is that Americans are very direct in dealing with other
people. They quickly speak their mind regardless of the
other person's title or the social status.
I am well aware that movies may exaggerate some of the
features characteristic of the country they were made in.
Nevertheless I believe that in general they give a fairly
good picture of the country's traditions, norms and values.
I think that by watching American movies I gained a
good understanding of the Unites States, its society and
its people.
Topic 183 A country from its movies
As my number one hobby, movies take me to different
eras, atmospheres, feelings and nations, all the before
mentioned is in hand thanks to the technology available
nowadays.
The film industry can be observed and digested by many
angles, entertainment, documentary, science fiction,
comedy or drama. The magic of taking the time to observe
rather to watch a film produces a mind trip to every
way the camera was filming.
Issues such as costumes, politics, ignorance, and fear
need no passport while being filmed, the human condition
as well as its surroundings can be captured in the
memory thanks to filming and its up braking industry.
Simple daily basis activities, such as public transport, or
main social principals or prejudices such as apartheid or
racism, can be shown all over the world not only on a
printed basis such as a newspaper, book or magazine, but
by the whole image of it, not withstanding that images do
say more than words, but often help to diversify the truth
or the real facts of information. Close related to the before
mentioned idea, stands the interpretation that producers,
directors, actors and viewers make a truth of their
own, but isn't that the way that the world is known?
Definitely since the beginning of the film industry, the
movies have showed the existence of the different, the
opposed, the distant, but far away from it, movies can
help to break trough intellectual, political, and cultural
barriers, in order to know better our world.
Topic 183 A country from its movies
Since its birth, films always function as the main media
depicting the environments and people in details. Pondering
the specific aspects in the filmmaker and country,
we can achieve valuable and wealthy information. 
ToeflEssays.com
101
The first treasure we can dig is some social problems in
the country reflected by the film. Hollywood, the largest
dream makers' cradle, prefers to support some movies
revealing some serious current social problems confronting
in the United Stated society. Take the Oscar-winning
Film in 2001, The American Beauty, as an example. That
film received lots of admiration and compliments. We can
learn from the film that in the most advanced economy,
the normal American people's life still have some dilemma
such as marriage dissatisfaction, family cracking,
and moral suspicion.
On the other hand, we can learn from a film about the
country's history. Take the best foreign film, Crouching
Tiger, Hidden Dragon, for example, we can appreciate
the Chinese ancient melodious music, exotic costumes
and magic martial arts. A movie from a country with its
own history and tradition that totally different from those
in the western movies not only tells a romantic story but
teach something beyond as well.
Finally, the country's own culture will be revealed in their
films naturally. For example, another foreign film, Life is
Beautiful, made in Italy, tells a Jewish tragedy happened
in the Germany concentration camp in the Second World
War. Instead of using the sorrowful way to express the
plot, the inspirited filmmakers use obviously humorous
and romantic ways which probably are rooted in the Italian
culture. Culture usually expresses itself in the film
spontaneously.
All in all, we can achieve some current social context, or
specific historical tradition, or culture in the films. These
are the aims that directors, cinematographers, and actors
have been working for, and the most important, those are
factors why we go to the cinemas.
Topic 184 Self-study vs. group study
Studying is not just reading the content of the book. It
involves thorough understanding of the topic, which of
course involves good concentration and involvement.
This can be achieved either by studying alone or in
groups. There are both advantages and disadvantages in
both these ways. I would first like to outline some of
these pros and cons before putting forth my choice of
study.
Let me first consider group-study. No two fingers of a
hand are same. Similarly no two individuals can think the
same way. This is the key factor in group-study. It is both
advantageous as well as disadvantageous. It is advantageous
because difference in people's thinking gives rise
to many new solutions to the same issue. It is disadvantageous
because all the members of the group cannot learn
things at the same pace. Some members learn very fast
and others learn very slow. So the fast learner may feel
bored to repeat the same topic again and again. The slow
learner may develop inferiority complex and feel embarrassed
to ask for repetition everyday. The other disadvantage
of group-study that I would like to point out is gossip.
Even if one member of the group is not in the mood
to study, the whole group will be spoiled. He/she will
start commenting about a movie or a film star or some
unrelated topic and will lead to a big, unwanted discussion
consuming all the precious time. Group-study will
lead to competition, i.e., each member of the group will
try to excel other members. As long as this competition is
healthy, it is good for everybody, otherwise it can lead to
ego problems which is pretty bad. Punctuality is also another
problem in group-study, ie., even if you arrive first,
you cannot start studying. You have to wait for everybody
else to arrive. While waiting, you and your one friend may
start gossiping, and before you know it, that gossip will
be the topic of discussion for that day.
Now let us consider self-study.----- The main advantage of
self-study is that you can study in your own pace. You
don't have to wait for anybody else. You can start studying
as and when you are ready. In a group study, you can
just think in one angle because there are other members
in the group who would give an other view. But that is
not the case in self-study. Here you should only think in
all different possible views regarding one topic, and in
order to support that view you would have to read and
refer a lot of different books. So self-study improves your
thinking and researching ability. I think concentration is
one thing which can be distracted even if you are not in a
group. In a group-study gossiping may be one kind of
distraction. This kind of distraction is not found in selfstudy.
On the other hand, we can sometimes start daydreaming
and before we know it we would have spent a
lot of time thinking and dreaming about some irrelevant
topic. But I think the chances of distraction is more in
group-study, than in self-study.
Now, for my opinion on the subject. I, personally, would
prefer to read alone and not in a group. I believe in doing
everything myself. So if I am told to address an issue,
I like to think in various different angles, read a lot of
books and then come to a conclusion. Another reason
why I prefer to read alone is, I think group-study, by itself
is not enough. Let me explain what I mean by this. Let us
say, the topic of discussion is "Mahatma Gandhi's murder".
Group-study involves discussion and exchange of
ideas about this topic. But if I have to talk something
about Gandhiji's murder, first of all I myself should study
about that topic and be thorough with what I have to discuss.
So I think group-study is dependent on self-study.
Well, the bottom-line is, if given a choice, I would prefer
to study alone rather than in a group.
Topic 184 Individual learning vs. group learning
Every student has his/her own style of studying, in which
he/she finds most suitable for him/her to learn knowledge
at school. Methods of studying can be classified into two
major categories, namely, individual study, and group
study. Personally, I would prefer to study with a group of
students, and I will explain my opinion below.
The most obvious reason is that studying with a group of
students can help students gain more knowledge and
understand it more thoroughly. Group study offers students
a chance to discuss the problems and exchange
opinions with each other. In this process students can
clarify their misunderstandings and strengthen their understandings
of particular knowledge. 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
102
Furthermore, students will obtain more information
about how to study from their fellow students, because
apart from learning from teachers, students can also learn
from each other through group study. Each student has
his/her own strength in different areas of study. By studying
together, they can communicate with each other
about their methods of learning different subjects, thus
each student can find the best way to learn a subject with
the help of the group. Undoubtedly, involving with different
people can strongly widen one's horizon, mature
one's thoughts and enrich one's personality.
Apart from gaining more knowledge and information,
studying in a group can help students develop teamwork
spirit, which is crucial for a student's future success. No
matter in school or in the real world, we often need to
join efforts to finish a complicated task. For example, you
can hardly find one product that is completed by one
person, even by one company. Therefore, teamwork
spirit that can be developed through group study at
school is very important for students' development. On
the contrary, students cannot learn the importance of
cooperation by studying alone.
On the other hand, studying alone also has some advantages
to some extent, such as quiet studying atmosphere,
and a self-controlled pace. But form what has been discussed
above, studying in-group carries more weight than
studying alone. In conclusion, we may safely reach the
conclusion that it is better to study with a group of students.

Topic 184 Individual learning vs. group learning
We as human beings have different qualities, strengths,
and weaknesses. Same goes for studying. Every individual
has a different way of studying, where one finds it easier
to understand and comprehend the matter he/she is
studying in his or her own way of learning. However,
methods of studying can be classified into two major
categories, namely, individual studying, and group studying.

Some people prefer group studying, because for them
group studying provides them with diverse information,
that is to say, that each member in the group participates
and is able to provide different information on one subject.

Another reason is that if any member finds difficulty in
the subject, he/she can easily discuss the problem with
other group members, who will be most ready to help
each other. Then there is also the aspect of division of
work. For example, if students are given an assignment to
complete, and if each person in a group is responsible for
a different topic, then the load of work is divided among
the members of the group and will eventually not burden
any one person. On the contrary, many students prefer
studying alone, mainly because they want to do their
work on their own. Doing so really helps them, because
they alone are responsible for what they are studying,
and therefore are responsible for their own grades, this
evolves a sense of responsibility in the student. Also,
since there is no one to share their work with, they have
to do all their work on their own, which again is an advantage.
For example, a student who studies alone, when
given an assignment, does it entirely by himself/herself.
Doing so, each and every topic is familiar to the student
and the entire work is a product of his/her own effort. So,
if he/she gets a grade on such an assignment, the student
would know what his potentials, what his strengths and
weaknesses are.
I prefer to study alone, since in that way I get the proper
sense of what my weaknesses are and what my strengths
are. I get to improve my weaknesses. Although if I find
any difficulty I cannot take help from any other person
unlike students who study in groups, but then I can always
ask for help from a teacher. But I believe studying
on one's own is important because anyone can study in
groups but when it comes to individual studying it becomes
tough. And in the real world an individual is confronted
with situations that a person is responsible individually.
And a person can acquire such a sense of responsibility
only through working on his or her own.
Thus, it can be concluded that studying alone is more
effective than studying in groups. Although, the different
methods of studying mostly depend on what works better
for the student.
Topic 185 A house or a business?
Faced with the question whether to buy a house or a
business if I had the money, I came to the conclusion that
basically the two investments have a major difference that
radically influences my choice. I believe that spending the
money for developing a business, despite being somewhat
risky, is the more reasonable choice as it could
bring with it not only eventual profits but also valuable
knowledge and experiences to the person involved. In
contrast, buying a real estate such as a house can only
lead to future troubles and expenses.
Some people prefer to invest their money on things like
houses or automobiles because they like the sense of secure
and comfort that brought by such assets. But are
they really as secure as they seem to be at first glance?
First of all, rarely can anyone pay the whole sum for a
house at once. In most cases it requires monthly payments
for years as well as taxation. In addition keeping a
house in a proper condition also costs a lot no matter
whether it is used by the proprietors or tenants.
Second, in today's active world where people often move
from place to place in search of new experiences or better
career opportunities, it has become common for
many young people to perceive the place where they live
as a temporary hotel where one returns only for eating
and sleeping. So it is enough for it to be convenient and
affordable.
Investing in a business, on the other hand, is a very serious
initiative and a great challenge as well. Deciding to
start one's own business requires a certain sense of risk
and a strong desire to succeed by improving one's skills.
Specialized knowledge in the business field is very essential
too. Certainly, however, no one can do all the work
by him/herself. So a person who starts his/her own business
will have to learn more not only about accounting or
management but also learn how to hire the right profes-
ToeflEssays.com
103
sionals to manage some of the business affairs for him/her.
Furthermore, in spite of the fact that it may take many
years and numerous unsuccessful attempts, a business
could bring very profitable results as it could grow and
develop.
For all the reasons that I mentioned above, I believe that
by investing my money in a business I will find many new
opportunities for self-improvement and have the chance
to be financially independent. Then maybe one day,
when I am old and tired, I will buy my own house too.
Topic 185 A house or a business?
If someone were generous enough to give me sufficient
amount of capital to do one of the two things, I would
probably go in for purchasing a house. To me, a house is
one of the best securities one can have. Besides, I would
not describe myself as being particularly business-minded,
so given a choice between buying a house or starting a
business, a home would be more appealing to me.
I have several reasons for this choice. All my life, I have
lived in rented apartments, and am aware of the difficulties
that my parents had faced. The constant insecurity of
being asked to move out at short notice is one problem. I
have watched my parents hunt around for houses, the
worry and tension that has caused to them, and finally,
the relief and gradual sense of peace that settled in, when
we finally managed to buy a place of our own.
Buying a house is an excellent investment, if done properly,
and at the right time with respect to the market
situation. Having a decent bit of property on one's hands
is advantageous when there is a need for a loan during
emergencies. Banks generally ask for securities, the most
of common of which are houses and jewelry.
Also, a house is a source of ready money, since the market
today is more often than a seller's market. If a respectable
builder builds the house or building in a convenient
locality, it generally fetches a good price, since
these are the first two points that are considered by the
buyers.
On the other hand, in today's world, with rising prices,
inflation, an unstable economy, one can no longer be
absolutely certain of a success in business, unless one has
a sharp acumen, a sense of risk, and a true entrepreneurial
spirit. A business venture cannot be started halfheartedly,
just because of availability of capital. A lot of
hard work and enterprise is necessary to make a success
out of a business in this world of cut-throat competition.
I genuinely do not believe that I am cut out for it. My
field of study is science, and I am more inclined towards
a career that involves research.
Finally, I would like to say that it has always been my ardent
wish to have a home that I can call my own, which I
can come back to after a day's work, and this thought
alone is sufficient to allow me to make my decision.
Topic 185 A house or a business?
Nowadays the only thing people seem to be interested is
earning more and more money. Many people spend their
entire lives doing business and neglect their family and
friends. I do not want to be one of them. If I have to
choose between earning money and spending time with
my family I would choose my family. Therefore, if a have
to choose between buying a nice big house for my family
and me and a business that would take up all my free
time I would choose the house.
The business can make you a lot of money, however, it
cannot make you happy. The house, on the other hand,
can be a dream that have come true. It can be the best
place in the world for you where you can feel safe, calm,
and free. The place where you keep all the things that
you love and more importantly where the people you
love most live. It is also the place where you will spend
the happiest moments in your life.
Another reason to choose to buy a house is that it gives
you security. The business may fail, but the house will
always remain yours. You know that no matter what happens
you will always have a place to live. And if you cannot
earn enough money to make your living you may let
off some of the rooms.
Last but not least, I believe that a house is more valuable
heritage than a business. A house can always be sold for
its real price while selling a business can be quite difficult
and even impossible if it has not been profitable for the
past few years.
All things considered, there is no doubt that buying a
house is the best choice for me. But a house cannot make
me happy if I live there alone. When I picture my dream
house I always see my future children playing in it.
Part 2 Additional Sample Essays
Topic 23 Work and study
Work and study are two activities usually go side by side
in producing powerful population of youth. This is clear
by those advantages that work adds to any young student
need to build up his own life. From the other hand part
time work save many teenagers from a lot of traps that
they may suffer from in their empty life. As a result the
future society will be formed from a net work of young
men whom understand life on a right way.
Normally work and full time activity prevent a lot of people
especially young people from many mistakes and danger
they may face in their life. As a teenager wise, work
combined with study give no more time free for them to
even think about many bad things such as drugs. For an
example most places and institutions that provide work
and jobs for youth, prevent smoking inside it as well as
any class inside a collage or a school. Now it is clear that
any student, who works and studies will have no chance
to use such a bad habit, so that young person will just
concentrate in his own succeed.
Nowadays work for young students is a good opportunity
for those teenagers whom need to activate and build up a
good and a active personality. Usually this work gives
teenagers the power to prove them selves. From that
point of view, if we count those active and clever students
we will find most of them have a job in addition to their
studies. As a result of their experiences those youth become
able to achieve more and more in their future life. 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
104
Also by that self dependant they are saved from a lot of
life problems which is formed by time vacancies and
loneliness that a lot of those teenagers usually suffer from.
Does teenagers work affect the surrounding society? In
my opinion teenagers work has a great role in the formation
of civilized respectable and independent society.
Obviously building up those young men personality will
appear clearly on their action and reaction with the surrounding
community. Easily, we can realize that addiction
cases among working young people decreased. Also
crime average and suicide cases shrunk. What exactly I
want to tell is that for any person to be a responsible one
that means he will act with many benefits to his small
community as a family aspect, and also to that large
population surrounding him.
Finally, it is obvious that part time work add a lot for
those students' workers. And it could not be denied that
making youth time full with good productive activities
secure them from many troubles. Those troubles which if
they became involved in it they will never pass it over. All
of this leading to successful civilized society.
Topic 24 Move to my hometown
I live in the city of Kolkata- the city of joy. My city is one
of the four metropolitan cities of my country-India. It is a
big city with a huge population. Kolkata is the city of my
birth and no doubt it is my favorite city. Kolkata, like
many other metropolitan cities, have a number of features,
some of which will really attract newcomers while
others will keep them away.
Kolkata is a city- full of life. Here, unlike any other city,
people are cooperative and one can enjoy one's joy and
happiness in company of others. In Kolkata, help is always
available, even if one does not ask for it. This is
really a unique feature of Kolkata, which makes it a different
city. One can enjoy the festivals to the full extent of
one's desire. During the festivals people come closer
even if they are not known to each other. It is the mood
during the festivals, which brings all the Kolkatans together.
Similarly, people are also available to share each
other's sorrow and grief. Here, one will always find a
company if he/she searches for solace and comfort. If
someone is in distress people are always available to help
him/her whatever may be the time of the day.
However, inspire of the liveliness of Kolkata, it has some
features that may upset a newcomer. One of these is the
crowd. The roads here are crowdy enough and also the
buses on the roads. Its really difficult for a newcomer to
get adjusted to these congested roads. To walk on these
roads people have to jostle one another's arms and tramp
each others feet. There is a great rush on the roads during
the peak hours and a lot of traffic congestion. As a
result people are always late in reaching their destinations.
Here, the number of vehicles passing through the
roads is greater in comparison to the number of roads
available, which results in traffic congestion.
A person who is planning to move to my city will like all
its advantages but dislike all its disadvantages. Kolkata has
a number of drawbacks and suffers from a lot of disadvantages,
still it is my favorite city and will always be.
Topic 41 Save the environment
The ecosystem is complicated and vulnerable in which all
the species and environment are involved in a organic
relationship. The change of one element can result in
that of another. I will find myself more assured when
people leave the land for animals and plants instead of
depriving them of that land for farmland, housing and
industry.
What is the first? The balance of nature will be broken by
the deprivation. If the habitat of the snakes_ the natural
enemies of the harmful rodents such as rats_ is destroyed,
then the rats will emerge dramatically, damaging crops,
spreading diseases over and no one other than we humans
are directly affected by the disturbed nature.
Second, when being touched, ecological environment is
another influential factor. Take the Tanh Linh forest in
our country as an example of the forest that used to be
the home for an elephant population were deforested for
farmland and housing. Being deprived of living land, the
elephant got mad, causing several deaths. Do the locals
predict such consequences?
Along with the disturbance of nature, the destruction of
ecological environment is the loss of human ecology.
With the current rate of destroying environment, within
few decades, our next generation can only se the Bengal
tigers and the rhinoceros through the Discovery and in
the Red book. Is it a foreseeable price for doing so and
we humans should think of the verse: " For whom the
bell told".
Wouldn't we humans be so greedy when robbing all the
living lands of plants and animals for the so-called " development
of civilization"? Such action will wipe out all
life inclusive of man himself.
Topic 55 Making Decisions
An important decision is one on which the future depends.
Righteous decision-making is a skill that is gained
through experience and knowledge. However sometimes
even an experienced person tends to make wrong decisions
and this one wrong thing can destroy his whole
future. So, in my view a decision should be made with
the consultation of people around us and decisionmaking
should never be done alone.
Although, sometimes when we make a decision by ourselves
we may get it right but it doesn't mean that our
decisions will always be correct. Some people think that
the important decisions of their life should be made by
themselves, after all it's their life. The decision which we
make may seem to be right in our view, but we forget that
its not only us but also our family and loved ones who
get effected by it.
When we make a decision by consulting with our friends
and family we get better options because its not just one
mind but whole of our family thinking on it. A lonely
mind often tend to think in one direction and need less
to mention it assumes that the path which it choose is the
best way to go. But in many cases, unfortunately it not at
all true. Many people assuming that their decision is the
bets way out of the problem make blunders that cannot 
ToeflEssays.com
105
be mended. A person get good ideas and suggestions
when he is discussing his problem with his friends.
Consulting one's peers and elders help us avert serious
disasters .A father must consult his family while making a
decision , an administrator must decide with his personnel
, a figure head must take the opinion of his peopleotherwise
if the decision goes wrong it would bring dissatisfaction
to oneself and to others too. An individual
decision often misleads a person .An individual may have
his own bias and predictions which may color his thinking.
He may ignore certain vital points .So he id prone to
commit grave errors if he decides on his own. On the
other hand if a man take his decision with consultations
with others he will think on the other vital aspects of the
point and take into consideration the right and wrong
aspects of the decision .In this way by making a decision
considering the suggestions and views of others a person
can avoid making wrong decisions.
Therefore, according to me it is a wise decision to consider
others point of view and advice before making an
important decision.
Topic 84 The Internet
This century has seen a rapid pace of technology development
with many achievements. Especially, the advent
of Internet has brought about many changes in our life.
First, the Internet enables people from all over the world
to get access to all sources of information. Just type in
what you are fond of and click Enter, magically it will appear
in front of you in just a minute. So instead of going
to a library with limited and out-of-date sources, you can
just stay at home to do any kind of research. Here the
Internet has not only helped you save your valuable time
but also provided you with a tremendous variety of information.

Second, through the Internet we can keep in touch regularly
with our friends and relatives living far away. It is
meaningful to write your friend abroad a letter, but it
won't reach her until weeks later. Think about it and you
will choose an email. It takes no time at all for your email
to arrive in your friend's inbox. Even if you are type of
those who dislike writing emails, you can still manage to
contact that friend by chatting with her on Yahoo Messenger.
It is much cheaper than phone calls; moreover,
you are totally able to talk with many different people at
the same time. Nowadays long distances doesn't matter
anymore because we already have he Internet.
Finally, the Internet can also satisfy people with many
forms of entertainment. Teenagers today mostly listen to
music online so that they can keep up with the newest
hits and trends. They also like watching the most updating
movies which can be found only on the Internet.
For children their favorite websites mainly consist of animation,
games and comics.
In conclusion, the Internet has made such a considerable
impact on our today's life that it has become as common
to us as the television. No one can imagine how the
world would be without the Internet.
Topic 90 Favorite Star
There are many entertainers and athletes considered admiring
from history through today. Some of them were
loved for their smart and charming appearance. Some of
them were fancied for their outstanding achievements on
the stage or in the tournaments. Some of them were admired
for their noble temperaments and cultivations. In
my memory, there is one fair lady who was equipped
with all these three merits. Although she has gone to
glory, people will admire her beauty and disposition forever.
Her name was Audrey Hepburn. If I could meet
someone famous, I would absolutely choose her for the
reasons below.
Audrey was well known for her marvelous beauty. Not
only did she have a pair of soulful eyes, dainty skin and a
charming smile, but also a noble character. Nobody
would forget the lovely and innocent princess in the film
Roman Holiday. The ingenuous character of princess has
impressed thousands of audience in the world.
Further more, Audrey was outstanding in skills of acting.
No matter it was Roman Holiday or Breakfast at Tiffany's,
she has showed great talent and professionalism in acting.
One of her partners in the film mentioned her as the best
actress of the century. She received over fifty other
awards and international distinctions, including Oscars,
Academy Awards and Golden Globes for her contributions
to the film industry. If I could meet her, I would be
pleased to learn that how she cultivate the acting skills
and absorb others' advantages in cooperation.
At last comes the most important reason - her great devotion
to the world. Audrey had been trying to help others
all her life. She founded a foundation to help children in
Africa who are eager to get food and education. In 1988,
she became UNICEF's Goodwill Ambassador, playing as a
leading role to call for help from all over the world. Considering
just her humanitarian efforts on behalf of children,
Audrey was a truly great female.
So, if I had the honor, I would be glad to meet Audrey
Hepburn.
Topic 158 Opinions
Nowadays the media have monopolized the world. So,
who have more access to them can emphasize his opinions.
Who can't say his opinion on a TV , or radio, or a
newspaper can't arrive to many people so his opinion
many times is lost. And who have the major access to the
media?
The major access to the media is owned by a few class of
people like journalists, politicians, but even more often
by people such as actors, athletes and rock stars. These
people have assumed the total control of the media. So
their words can have great resonance and can reach many
people, but, on the other hand, people who can't have
this access can reach only few people.
So many times we give more importance to the word of
such people whom have importance not for their value,
but only for their visibility. And it can be a great risk. In
fact many times their words don't are filtered by the me-
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
106
dia, and even if they are absolutely wrong they appear as
good opinions. And this is the great risk of the organization
of the present public opinion.
So, it should be considered two different aspects. The
first one is personal. Each person should filter himself the
information coming from the media. The personal sense
of criticism should be entrained to understand the relevance
of who and how is speaking. The second is a moral
aspect of who have the access to the media. They have to
be conscious that their words can affect the public opinion,
so they should have more sense of responsibility
than other person, even if many times is the opposite,
and it is allowed more resonance to such people who
have few sense of responsibility and provide bad examples.

Topic 159 Changes of 20th Century
In the twentieth century humanity experimented important
changes, some related with cultures - like behavior
inside families and between families, other about human
rights - abolition of racism, human rights, economics
globalization show an example, science and technology
computers and Internet are typical examples.
In the next lines I will show some positive and negative
aspects of each one of these kinds of changes with the
intention of choose the most representative change in the
twentieth century.
Important changes took place in cultures of different
countries around the world. For example at the beginning
of the last century, violence was a common behavior
in the treatment between parents and sons, is well know
that parents used to punish their sons with strokes and
teachers used similar ways to punish students - forcing
students to carry heavy objects or hitting them with rules.
Whereas, nowadays we have laws that protected people
from violence in any context.
In addition people realized that violence is not the right
way to punish, on the contrary now we use the word to
teaching people and correct them.
Globalization represented other important change, now
economies of different countries are related between
them and cultures change ideas and beliefs around the
world. In my opinion globalization have important advantages
like culture interchange unfortunately another
point is that Third world countries are in disadvantage
respect other nations, their economies are weak and do
not have the same resources, so global economy nowadays
is not fair.
Similarly science and technology rose sharply in the
twentieth century and machines like computers were
created; moreover, important discoveries were made like
atom composition and light behavior. Nonetheless sometimes
technology advances are used in the wrong way for
example nuclear weapons.
To summarize twentieth century saw changes in almost
all views of human life, however some on this changes
brought with them important disadvantages like science
discoveries and globalization. On the other hand humanity
changed many beliefs in the right way, like the abolish
of racism and the creation of societies to defeat human
rights, admittedly, this change do not have any disadvantage,
so in my opinion it is the change that should be remembered.

Topic 160 In writing or in person?
Complaining about a product or a poor service is not
easy. You need to find the appropriate way to do it if you
want an affirmative answer to your complain. While some
people prefer to do it in writing, others prefer to complain
in person. I think that what is written cannot be
misunderstood, though I prefer to complain in writing.
To begin with, you can explain in a better way the reasons
of your complain. Because you can take your time to
think carefully about all the details and explanations you
should add to your letter in order to get a good answer
from the company. The more you can write, the better
for them to know exactly what it is going wrong with its
product or service. Thus, everyone will understand the
reasons of your request.
Then, if you complain about the poor quality of a product
or service in writing, you have a proof that you did it,
in case the company does not want to accept your request.
For example, if you go in person and tell to an
employee that you are not satisfied with the postal service
because it has an important delay in delivering the
mail, the employee will possibly respond to you that he
will notify his boss and that they will try to solve the
problem. The point is that if you have a delay again, you
will have to go to the postal service office, complain again,
but you do not have a proof that you did it before. Therefore,
under this way it becomes more difficult to get a
proper and soon answer.
Finally, companies can create a list of all complains that
receive from their customers. As a consequence, the firm
will be able to detect the root of the problems with the
products or services. Then, it will be easier and faster for
it to find a solution and notify it to its clients. As a result,
the company will better its customer service and the relationship
with the people, who will also be more satisfied.
To summarize, I prefer to complain about products or
poor service in writing rather than in person. The three
main reasons I find are, first, it is a more effective way to
do it because you can give more details and explanations
about the problem. Second, this is the only way to have a
proof that you did complain. Third, it helps the company
to be notified about what it is doing wrong, then they can
find a correct solution and inform about it to its customers.

Topic 164 For a good health
"Health is wealth", is a saying that carries a lot of weight.
As you age you come to realize the importance of this
saying. If one is not healthy, one is not able to enjoy any
thing in life. All the wealth, in this world cannot guarantee
good health. If you lose your health you lose everything.

Keeping these facts in mind I have always tried to maintain
a healthy lifestyle. Good health, no doubt a gift from
god can be maintained by making certain efforts. The first 
ToeflEssays.com
107
and foremost rule of staying healthy is eating right. It is a
proven fact that by eating right we can prevent a number
of diseases. So I make it a point to eat at least four to five
servings of fruits and vegetables. By doing so I get a regular
supply of required vitamins to boost my immune system.
I try to have fish at least twice a week for my cardiovascular
health. It has been observed that in communities
where fish is consumed regularly, the incidence of cardiovascular
disease is much lower. I all so try to have certain
nuts such as almonds and walnuts. Their consumption
in small amounts increase the good cholesterol.
Amongst the vegetables I like to consume yellow colored
and green leafy vegetables, they being a good source of
antioxidants vitamins.
Together, with good eating habits I try to exercise everyday.
I make it a point to take a long brisk walk everyday.
Exercising regularly not only helps me to keep my weight
in check but also help me get over stress. it has been
proved that walking can help you relax. In fact a walk in a
park away from polluted areas is good for our lungs. Another
form of exercise that I like is swimming. Swimming
is a good form of exercise for our joints, muscles, and
lungs. Sometimes I like to indulge in certain games where
I can exercise my brains by playing card games and scrabble.

I have realized that by developing healthy eating habits
and a daily exercise regime, I have been able to stay
healthy. Though am really thankful to god for this great
gift but I think my own efforts have also paid. In my forty
years of life I have seldom been to a doctor. My only visit
to the dentist was to get my teeth cleaned, in fact he was
really surprised that this was my first ever visit to a dentist.
Touch wood I still do not have a single cavity. I have
made this my mission of life to encourage people to
adopt a healthy lifestyle because as they say prevention is
better than cure.
Topic 164 For a good health
We are living in the "age of anxiety", as somebody aptly
expressed. We have very high expectation with our careers
and health these days and there is a notion that if
we are not attaining that than perhaps there is something
wrong. As a result of that, we feel overwhelmed, tired of
life, and depressed, suffer from mood swings, migraines,
and frequent flues caused by our weakened immune system
reacting to our unbalanced lifestyles, lack of exercise,
and a lack of nutrition resulting from our unbalanced diet.
Furthermore, our fast-paced environment causes us a lot
of stress. More often than ever before, many people
complain that they do not have enough time to take sufficient
care of themselves and that they have lost part of
their personal life.
There are many ways that help me to stay healthy, but let
me mention three that are, in my opinion, the most important.
Firstly, I have learnt to slow down and become
more relaxed. To keep my life in harmony, I set aside
time for myself only and set my priorities. Only those
things which are high on my priority list deserve my full
attention and effort.
Secondly, we are becoming a sedentary society and exercise
is becoming less and less a part of our daily lives.
Each morning, before the pressure of the day begins, I try
to spend at least half an hour on exercising. Research
findings say that a morning exercise is much more beneficial
than other times of the day because it speeds up our
metabolism more quickly and the release of endorphin
helps us start in a good mood, too. I am a walking proof:
When I exercise in the morning I feel energized, ready to
start the day. Certainly, my busy lifestyle often prevents
me from exercising at the time I prefer, nevertheless one
will gain benefits of exercising at any time of the day.
Finally, there is a balanced diet problem. Most of us with
busy lifestyles may sometimes skip meals and find it difficult
to always eat a balanced diet, not to mention junk
food. Our body is able to tolerate this irregularity as well
as shortage of nutrition for some time, especially when
we are young, however, from long time perspective, this
can be very harmful and that is what I keep in mind.
Our health is the most precious thing in the entire universe.
I do not have to have billions in a bank and a seaside
house full of full-time servants to be happy, as long
as I am healthy. There is a number of ways that can help
us to stay healthy. Most of them are very cheap, even free,
so why not to use them?
Topic 179 Good parents
Parenting is all about a good judgment on when one
must exercise control and when not to, and also to asses
how much of control is just right in any given situation to
get the desired emotional response from their child. Parents
must also note that their role in their child's life
changes as the child grows older. An infant would benefit
from an indulgent parent, whereas as a teenager might
find that invading his privacy. Parents need to exercise
control in varying styles as indulgent, restrictive, assertive,
directive depending on the situation at hand and the age
of their child, to aptly allow the child's psychosocial
growth. So I consider a sound judgment of control as the
first quality of a good parent.
Second role or quality of a parent is that of a good
teacher. Parents need to always remember that they role
in their children's life is to influence, teach and control
him. Parents who wish teach their children to maintain a
good character and exercise fairness under all situations.
May be it will be a good idea for parents to lead by setting
examples themselves. I feel, at a tender age children can
learn quickly by emulating their parents. So, it will be
very unrealistic if parents expect their children never to
lie, when they themselves are not true.
Third and the most influential at is the role of a parent as
a friend. I feel that a stage where a child is beginning to
discover the adulthood, parents need to try to maintain a
balance between their demands and the emotional responsiveness
of their child, as the child is beginning to
identify his individuality. For the overall growth of the
child, emotionally, academically, intellectually and socially,
parents need to inculcate faith and confidence in
their children in order to receive the same back. I feel
that this will strongly create an environment of mutual
respect and understanding, encouraging the child to de-
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
108
velop self-disciplinary tactics and mature at his own pace.
Parents bring their child into the world and sense of
pride of watching their children do well in all spheres of
life is immeasurably divine. And take pride in achievements
that he brings on with his own hard work. Being
tolerant to their mistakes and encourage them to start
over again will help them mature and give them opportunity
to learn from their own mistakes. Parents who do
not patronize their children and let them fight their own
battles, yet watching over them for fallings, give their
children their due which is a sense of achievement and
faith in his own abilities.
Parents who seek obedience must also be vary of being
too demanding and not refrain from giving explanation
for certain decisions they might make for their children. If
parents involve their children in decisions involving them,
prepare their child for lateral thinking and problem solving
which will help them in the long run when they are
ready to tackle their problems head on.
To conclude, I would say parents who are indulging, democratic
and authoritarian in turns, give meaning to a
child's future.
Topic 179 Good parents, good children
Parents are the life givers for there children. Parents are
the molders of the child, the environment in which a
child grow up has a most significant impact on him. As
they say "parents are the first teachers ", the important
qualities of a parent are having a good rapport with the
child, giving him a well livelihood and the most important
one to make the child independent i.e. make him
learn to do things on his own.
With the changing times there is a necessity for the
change in the relationship between the parent and the
child. The need of the day is that the parents provide an
atmosphere where the child is free to speak his heart out,
rather than a traditional relationship of parent and child
where the former had all power and authority over the
later. Today, the relation between parents and children is
more like a friend. A parent should provide the child with
the right to be involved in the decisions of the family and
his opinions should be considered.
A good parent is who provides his or her children with a
good livelihood. The parents are considered responsible
for the good up bringing of there children. A child
brought up in an environment with good manners and
sense of responsibility is more likely to grow up in to a
good human being than a child grown up in an irresponsible
manner. A parent should guide his or her children
and prevent them from going in the wrong direction. A
child should, at every moment, be aware of his responsibilities
and should not run away from it. Making a child
self-dependent and responsible is the most important
quality a good parent should posses.
To sum up, a good parent is a mixer of good habits, an
optimistic approach towards the relation between himself
and his child and should always be there to guide the
child towards the right path.
Topic 180 Why are movies popular
By the aid of the modern technology (Televisions, computers,
and Internet) movies can now travel across seas
and oceans and over the mountains, connecting north to
south and east to west. Movies are the mirror of cultures.
Movies can transport habits of one country to another
whether it is bad or good habits. All people watch movies
because different types of movies will certainly satisfy all
tastes and all desires.
Since movies are worldwide distributed, it can be considered
as a bridge between cultures. Movies can provide us
with sufficient information about different cultures; this
will certainly save the time and efforts needed for searching
in books and articles. Moreover, movies attract the
eyes and stimulate the brain to understand and to analyze.
Attracting the eyes by watching animation in the movies is
an advantage over reading in books, which is very boring.
Actually, there are varieties of movies; these include
drama, educational movies, scientific movies, documentary
movies, funny movies and cartoons. As a result of
this diverse collection of movies, people of all ages and
classes can find anything they like and they will be interested.

Finally, as a side effect of their popularity, movies will not
only reflect good habits, culture, and good qualities but
also reflect immoral habits. Since teenagers and children
constitute a high percentage of audience, lows of censorship
should be enforced in order to control the huge invasion
of immoral and offensive movies which conflict
with the main advantage of watching movies and films.
Topic 181 Natural lands
It became obvious that we should leave land on its nature.
This is proved day after day by nature revolutions like
earth quacks. So we should leave natural land as it is.
Whatever the need to build houses and communities it is
much more important to leave nature as its first creation.
In my country Egypt we have large surfaces of natural
lands, such as deserts. Normally those areas contain different
types of flora that is day by day become unique,
the matter which give us a red alert to be much more
careful while we open and increase our new communities
in desert.
By ecologist's opinion, any close system has internal resources
and complicated relation ships that shouldn't be
affected by human action. If man try to interrupt that ecosystem,
mostly that will lead to the destruction of the
whole system.
Our government and many of public associations now
call with leaving the mother land as it is with no interfering.

Some people ask the opposite under the control of the
population increasing idea. But for those they need only
to work out on another solution that provides good respect
to natural areas. For example in Japan now they are
trying to figure out a way to build houses and industrial
communities using large sea surfaces. I guess if we used
such ideas we can make the hard balance between population
increase and protection of natural lands from being 
ToeflEssays.com
109
invaded by man.
If we just think how much are natural lands so important.
As it is the shelter for people who need periods of relaxation
after long duration of work or illness. As well it is a
place which is purely free from pollution that person can
find when he fed up with cities polluted air. It is also a
great source for zoologists and botanist whom need an
open field for their researches on unique animals and
plants.
Under this circumstance, I guess natural land is a great
treasure that we should keep and protect.
Topic 703 A good teacher or good parents
There is no religion, culture and society in which parent's
role is not accentuated strongly. Our life and behavior
circulate around our relationship with our parents and
other family members. The way we behave when adult
and mature depends upon how we were nurtured during
our childhood and teenage. In my opinion, good parents
play a vital role in child's development and no other relationship
can ever take their position, not even a good
teacher.
People have different point of views to this question. One
group says as teachers are responsible for our learning
process and deal with a lot of different children, therefore,
they completely understand the needs and psyche
of each child. They know how to handle each child and
bring out good qualities and talent from him/her. Teachers
even know why a certain child is behaving unusually
and what strategy should be adopted accordingly to alleviate
bad habits or behavior. On the other hand if we
think rationally, we will realize the fact that a child hardly
spends few hours with his/her teacher and most of the
time is with his/her parents. Also, at school a child doesn't
spend his/her whole time with one teacher, each academic
subject has a specific teacher. Furthermore, teachers
normally focus on the subjects they are appointed to
teach and very few concentrate or care about the personal
or personality development of a child. For example
if I look back into my childhood I don't see a single
teacher who really cared about my personal development
or who ever tried to enhance my talent and creativity.
What they most cared for was my grades and how I am
behaving in a class with them and other students.
On the contrary, a child gets to spend all his/her time
with the parents. They are responsible not only to fulfill
the basic needs of a child like food, clothes and basic
education but also for the development of him/her as a
person. Most of all, there exists a strong bond of love and
emotion between a child and parents which drive them
to care for each other no matter what situation they are
in. Teacher is not always there to check whether his/her
student is behaving as he/she was taught to, whereas,
parents know almost everything about their child even
those things that they try to hide from their parents and
this is all because of love and care they have for their
children. Parents would never want his/her child to fail in
any walk of life because their children are part of them,
whereas, in some cases we do see prejudice and hostility
among teachers for their some students because there is
no emotional affiliation exists between them.
Parents not teachers are responsible for a child's spiritual,
physical and social needs. Although we can't deny their
role in our lives but our parents have the strongest impact
on our lives and not our teachers. A child takes most
of the habits from his/her parents this is because to
him/her they are his/her role model. Moreover, it is a
general law that a person is known from his/her company;
meaning even unconsciously one develops the habits and
behavior of the people he/she spends more time with and
same case is applicable to a child-parent relationship
To sum up, in my opinion a child's growth and development
in all respects depends significantly on his/her parents
role because of the emotional bond between them,
the time they spend with each other and responsibility
parents bear for their children can never be replaced
completely by any other relationship of this world!
Topic 704 Telling truth
Telling truth is no doubt the most important consideration
in any relationship. The foundation of any relationship
is truth and as long as people in the relationship be
truthful to each other, that relationship continues in a
smooth manner. So, it is good to tell truth to people with
whom you are in a relationship. However always telling
truth may not be good and there may be situations where
it is better not to reveal the truth for the benefit of other
people.
Every human being is into relationships throughout
his/her life. There are many kinds of relationships and
can be broadly divided into family ties, personal relationships,
professional relationships. Some relationships are
made right from one is born like the family ties. Here a
person has no choice. He has to live with his family and
maintain a good relationship with the members of the
family. Starting from their childhood, people are encouraged
to speak truth. Parents try hard to make their children
tell truth always. Here, it is important for the child
to tell truth and that helps him to develop his morals.
And when a child goes to a school, he/she has a teacherstudent
relationship with his teacher. And the teacher
insists that his/her students always speak truth. This is
good for the student to develop a sense of honesty and
efficiency in his early years of life which would make him
a perfect individual. A child, also develops friendship
with other students in school or other children in his
neighborhood. This a relationship where he has a choice
to choose the people of his choice. He can have this relationship
with those whom he likes in some aspect or
other. From here, he starts to make more relationships of
this type throughout his life. Here, it is not always necessary
to tell truth. But care should be taken that the relationship
is not spoiled because of not telling truth.
In this process, which continues for many years, the child
completes his education and develops into a fully-grown
human being. He/she gets a job and there, at the work
place he has a different relationship with his boss, coemployees,
clients or customers and that is professional
relationship. Here, when we say workplace we mean a
school, a bank, an industry, a hospital, a shopping mall 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
110
and many more. To maintain his/her job a person should
work hard and be faithful to the organization to which he
is working. Telling truth about his abilities, achievements
and loopholes is always important because, a sincere
employee is always looked high in any organization and
being sincere is important for a person's professional
growth.
There are situations where a person can do more good by
hiding the facts, than by revealing the truth. A doctor performing
an operation on a child patient may not be sure
about his degree of success in the operation, but the doctor
should give confidence to his patient saying the operation
would be a great success. Here, he can develop a
hope of life in the child by hiding the truth. Instead, if he
frightens the child saying about the horrible results that
may occur in the operation process, he can never make
the child enough courageous to accept for the operation.
And, the doctor should tell the truth in such cases to the
parents of the child.
Hence, we can conclude that in order to maintain relationships
it is always good to tell truth, but there may be
situations in which a person can do more help by not
revealing the truth.
Topic 704 Truth and relationship
Many people believe in the importance of the truth. Always
telling the truth to your friends can mean that you
are sincere to them. Meanwhile, some people may think
that it is unavoidable to sometimes tell the lie to their
friends in order to maintain their relationship. However, I,
personally, see the importance of not telling the lie to
other people.
We all know that sometimes it is hard to tell someone the
truth which can hurt them. Instead, telling the lie would
be more appropriate in the situation. For example, a
woman might want to lie to her boyfriend that she went
to a hair salon instead of telling the truth that she met
her ex-boyfriend by chance and had lunch with him. If
she told the true story, it could have caused a conflict
between her and her boyfriend. Or someone might want
to tell the friend whom he does not like a lie excuse for
not being able to go out with him. As I have said, I do not
agree with telling the lie to other people at all. Even
though the reason for telling the lie is to prevent hurt,
but when the lie is revealed, it will be more painful, and
you can lose the trust from the person forever. On top of
that, you will feel guilty with the fault you have done and
it will haunt you for a long time.
So what is the more appropriate approach we should do?
Although I am not such an expert in maintaining relationship,
but from my personal experience and observation,
I would say that avoid telling the full fact should be
put into consideration . You can try not to tell the full
story with can bring about pain. Instead, tell only the
acceptable parts. For the case of woman having lunch
with her ex-boyfriend. She can tell the story that she ran
into some old friend and had a conversation with that
person. From this, she does not tell any lie and will not
feel any guilty. Also, if she tells the lie, it would be easy
for her boyfriend to catch her from all the evidences that
might exist, such as her hair that looks the same, or her
expression when he asks her to have lunch with him.
(which she already had with her ex).
In sum, telling the lie should be avoided at all time. However,
it can be beneficial in some occasion too. For example,
a doctor might want to tell the lie to an about-to-die
patient that he will survive in order to encourage the patient
and increase the chance of survival. What we should
do is to try to avoid it as much as we can and only tell the
lie when in extremely necessary situation.
Topic 704 Truth about Relationship
The first and foremost things you give in any relationship
is 'Truth'. The foundation to a strong and lasting relationship
is laid only by telling the truth, otherwise little lies
keep building and by the time we turn back and see ,we
would have lost the person whom we cared so much
about. So if the foundation is not strong our worlds come
crashing around us eventually.
Many of us face situations like - A) We say the truth and in
the process loose a relationship. B) We hold back in order
to keep a relationship. Considering the situation
'A' ,there is no doubt that we may end up loosing a lot,
but at least we are free from the guilt of hiding facts and
there is a possibility, that the other person might understand
and even forgive you and accept us. Is starting a
relationship on the wrong foot really worth it?
Now lets consider the situation 'B', the question we really
have to ask ourselves here is "How long can anyone hide
the truth?" "How long can anyone keep denying facts?" It
is like a hidden fire, someday or the other it starts to
smoke. Eventually our lies come out of the closet and we
are suddenly staring at a point of no return. We loose the
person we love and now there is no hope that things will
ever get better or if that person will ever forgive us and
accept us back. We end up heartbroken. We loose our
dignity, the ability to face that person, our self-respect,
our courage. Surely we loose a lot more than we ever
thought. The person, who placed such immense trust in
us and our words, is also hurt badly in the process.
Things take drastic turns in life, turns that we would
never anticipate in our dreams, and we end up asking
"Did I deserve this? Was lying worth it?"
Truth is but a bitter pill to swallow, but it is still the best
medicine ever. We should always remember that one does
not loose but telling the truth, but only when he/she
holds back.
Topic 705 Co-operation and Competition
I believe that the best preparation for life encompasses
both, being co-operative and learning from others and at
the same time competing to produce better results. I will
support my position using examples from the university
and the country's economy.
Learning to work with others is beneficial for two reasons.
Firstly and most importantly, when we learn from others
we are using their experiences as a stepping stone to further
our own understanding of a subject. We need not
repeat the same mistakes and our rate and effectiveness
of learning increases significantly. This is how universities 
ToeflEssays.com
111
work. The teacher disseminates his knowledge so that his
students build on it and produce their own germinal results.

Secondly, when learning from others we focus more on
the underlying concepts rather than the goal. This is also
one of the reasons why learning from competition might
prove to be harmful. For, when we are competing with a
peer we focus on the goal and adopt any method or form
to attain the goal. This harms our understanding of the
subject itself. A related example would be, a classroom
scenario where a student learns scientific concepts by
rote rather than understand them only to outdo his competitors
for a better grade.
However, it is also true that learning to be competitive
will better equip us to meet the future. This is because
while doing so, we maintain the best quality of preparation
and strive to do better under any circumstance. An
example is a country's economy. A country will be ready
for competition from foreign countries only when it produces
the best products. The best products are produced
only from healthy competition between industries within
the country. In such cases, learning from peers is of less
value forasmuch as we might learn to manufacture in a
new method, we might not implement this method
unless forced to do so by competition from other manufacturing
industries.
Furthermore, it is also true that for a leader, the highest
form of competition is to compete with himself. This is
not only true for individuals but also for industries. A
company striving to improve its own business processes
prepares itself against an eroding bottom line due to
competition from other companies on the same turf.
In conclusion, the best preparation must involve working
with others co-operatively and at the same time maintaining
a healthy competition with these cooperating entities.
Topic 705 Co-operation and Competition
The world in the 21st century is more about cooperation
than competition. Although, we can consider cooperation
and competition as being two sides of a coin, it would be
hardly of any use if a person has within himself a spirit of
competition but lacks the spirit of cooperation.
Increasing number of people and industries today want
people who can work in teams, since a team can achieve
what an individual might not. So any job interview invariably
has a group discussion where the main aim is to
find out team players. Most people strive to work in a
group and see how well they can fit themselves in a team,
as that is one of the most important virtues anyone can
possess in the modern day. Teamwork and cooperation
are stressed in school activities, colleges, workplaces and
above all in management institutes. The truth is that an
individual is best suited to work in a team if he has the
spirit of competition in him because ultimately this spirit
will benefit the team as a whole and will reap rich dividends.

People may argue that being competitive is the best
preparation for life, and we can say they are not totally
wrong when they say that. The world is competitive and
there is no reason why one should not be the same. To
cite an example, consider a high school grad who is excellent
at academics and sports. He has the best grades in
his class, and is a champion at college sports. But the
only thing he lacks is the ability to work in a team. He
wants to have things his own way in a team and he does
not share a good rapport with his colleagues. Do you
think this boy will be successful in a multinational company
if say, he were to be made the managing director.
The answer is undoubtedly "No". A company director
needs to be a team man, he must give his colleagues an
equal chance to express their views, he must be ready to
hear to everyone on his team, he cannot have his own
way every time he pleases. Thus competitiveness without
the spirit of cooperation is of no use at all.
In my opinion, cooperation definitely prepares one better
for life than competition alone, but ideally a mix of
both these virtues would take one to great heights. Consider
examples of Bill Gates, John F. Kennedy, Churchill,
and many others who are or were successful in their respective
fields. It was neither competition nor cooperation
alone which got them there, rather, it was a mix of
both these qualities which enabled them to be successful
in their lives.
An individual may not have the spirit of competition, but
if he has the spirit of cooperation, it would be enough to
make him successful in his life. Take for example Mahatma
Gandhi and Mother Teresa. They never had to
compete with anyone, they just had cooperation from
people around them for a worthy cause, and this was
enough to make them immortal in the pages of history.
Thus cooperation prepares one for life better than competition.

Topic 705 Cooperation or competition?
If one would ask me, perhaps, during my college years, I
would go for competition. In the educational world, competition
is a must, since one must work for his or her
own grades and not for a team's grade. It is a bad thing,
however, to train people like that. In the workplace, this
type of conduit to learning harbors resentment from coworkers
and makes one person too tired due to tasks he's
supposed to do himself. Therefore, I'll go for being cooperative.

According to a Chinese proverb, behind every great man
are other great men. I have read several materials which
state that the most successful individuals didn't get to be
successful without connecting with other people. They
succeeded by providing their skills to those around them,
and in turn, those people gave their services and talents
in return. Dr. John C. Maxwell, America's leading figure in
leadership states that "Teamwork makes the dream
work." And for one to achieve his dream, it is essential to
get other members who share his vision. Being competitive
is much of a lower characteristic compared to cooperation.
The problem with people who take the second
statement described above, is that, they still believe in the
"Lone Ranger Myth." Clearly, even the lone ranger was
never alone. He had Tonto beside him in times of trouble.
The word competitive denotes to an action in which you 
Sample Essays for the TOEFL Writing Test (TWE) - Answers to All TOEFL Essay Questions
112
try to beat others up in order to achieve your goal. But
being competent, which has a different meaning, refers to
the potential of being able to perform things with excellence,
and thus is very much necessary for achievement.
Let me give an example. In Aesop's fable titled "The Rabbit
and the Turtle," the rabbit can be termed as competitive
since he's created to be fast and agile, yet very arrogant.
The turtle on the other hand is competent since he
knows, he has the mind-set of defeating the rabbit despite
his handicap. The rabbit, seeing the turtle is no
match to his attributes, slept near the finish line. As a result,
the turtle persisted and got ahead because he persevered
to reach the goal because he knew he had the potential
to get ahead. Additionally, the best preparation for
life begins with cooperation. It starts in the home. Could
you imagine a child growing up in a family wherein their
parents compete with each other? I wouldn't think that's
a good preparation.
Therefore, the best preparation for life is through cooperation.
It's seen everywhere. The only place where competition
works best is in the jungle, where one survives
by outwitting the other species. If you're very competitive,
perhaps, a lion is the best job description for you.
Topic 705 Cooperate or compete?
In this world nothing is permanent - everything changes.
Some people believe that in order to reach their goals
and dreams to become successful someday they have to
learn to be competitive, which I definitely oppose. I have
the same opinion that learning to work harmoniously
with others and becoming more cooperative will be the
best position in preparation to a better life in the future.
Foremost, I think gaining knowledge and understanding
to work with others in humane ways and getting cooperation
at the same time will be of great value in the preparation
of one's life. In this way, people tend to become
cautious the way they speak and act in order to have a
better understanding among her co-workers. The mission
of each individual will concentrate on how to achieve
certain goal for the benefits of many. However if somebody
focuses to be competitive in all his/her ways will
lead to possible disagreements among members of the
group. Competition prevails. Everybody wants to put
themselves higher than the other employees who set
them to a higher problem in the working area.
Another, to be competitive will create a negative impact
between the managers and subordinates. Professional
jealousies will create misunderstanding and quarrels
among the employees. Nothing will accomplish, even the
easiest task will put aside. The heart of a jealous man will
eats up her soul. All of his/her ambitions overcome her
because of the negative thoughts and mind implanted in
him/her. To learn to be competitive will diver its attention
and getting the benefits for himself/herself only not on
the welfare of the whole organization. Whereas, if you
learn to work at ease with your co-workers everything
will be smoothly done and finish in time.
Finally, learning to work with others whatever objectives
the organization have, everybody assures that the focus
will directed to one aim and that is accomplishment. But,
for those competitive person who learns to surpass other
opinion and ideas nothing tasks will finish in the end. In
a company the organization chart is very important to
determine the highest position such as the president,
vice-president, director, deputy director, administrative
officer, administrative assistant publication officer and
records officer. With this set-up everybody knows the first
authority and then the second. Everyone should follow
this kind of organization no one should be by-passed.
Respect the authority and know your position. Do not
think you are higher than other people do your best and
I know that promotion will come in.
In conclusion, it is nice to know that everyone is working
for the benefits of the organization. To increase the assets
and potential of a certain organization will be of great
help for everyone. Learning to work with others in positive
was and be more cooperative in early stage of life will
contribute for the success in the future not only for the
self-fulfillment also to reach the highest potential of the
organization as a whole. Professional jealousy will be
eradicated, meaningless talk against each other will not
be entertained and good ambience will be enjoyed so
much by the people which create a positive outlook in
life.
Topic 709 Government should not pay artists
More people need supports from the government such as
employment, healthcare provision and shelters. I think it
is not appropriate that out government prioritize to pay
more to the artist projects like painting sculptures in a
public places which costs large sum of money for the realization
of the projects. I obviously disagree because the
government misleading the nation by wrong prioritization.

As one of the government employees, I can see that there
are lot of issues need to give special attention and one of
them is to put on top the physiologic needs of people.
Living in the developing countries is not so easy because
of poverty. Many people suffer from hunger and various
disease and sad to say there is no help from the government.
To give employment and right salary that are due
to working people will be the main concern of our government
today. Malnourish children number increases,
tuberculosis stricken so many and will create a big problem
in the society and later own if not give right action
will lead to the lost of more lives.
Moreover, large sum of budget allotment on the artist
projects will create a great issue in the nation as a whole.
In the third world country, the game of politics is so demonstrative.
There are so many people who are hunger
in power and everything will be possible for them. They
will make issue and using media to promulgate whatever
propaganda they want to raise. With this, I think the prioritization
of government towards the sake of the people
again will turn down. The issue of artist projects will be
on top and give time to discuss in the senate and congress.
Time is important and giving time on this issue is a
waste of it. Every single day the percentage of infant mortality
rate increases and the government should focus on
how to prevent its occurrence rather than focusing the
attention of the legislative body on the artist issue. 
ToeflEssays.com
113
Furthermore, there are places appropriate for the works
of an artist. There is no need to show their works lavishly.
I am not against to their beautiful and enchanting hand
works but I really disagree that the government will grant
large budget for them just to make it known for the public,
the fact that the society is now deeply wounded and
feeling hopeless that their live will improve for the better.
Assurance for the people is necessary that the government
will help them and deliver them from poverty, sickness
and political game.
Overall, I believe that our government still challenges our
live to move on and to hold on to our faith that they will
be an instrument to uplift the lives of the citizens in all
aspects. By showing more projects for the sake of the
people and least attention on the artist work in public
places will lessen the heavy heart and burden of the society.

Topic 715 Investment in developing country
The development ratio in the third world countries or the
developing countries has always been a considerable
opinion for the United Nations and other such organizations.
These kind of countries get a considerable amount
of funds from the developed countries and the different
sectors of the United Nations to be invested in various
sectors so that these countries can also prosper and progress,
not just remain on the globe for the sake of it, but
to contribute towards the advancements which are ongoing
in other parts of the world i.e. the developed countries.

The question whether to invest in basic education or in
high technology, for example, these days is the field of
computers has many varying arguments supporting each
of the factors. Since, both of the factors i.e. the high technology
or the basic education is necessary, the governments
usually emphasize on both of these by allocating a
fixed percentage to each of them.
Basic education is the right of each citizen of every country,
and necessary steps should be taken in this regard. As
it is said that in building a house, the most important
thing that is kept in the mind is the foundation. Once the
foundation is strong, the building built will be good
enough and can survive in the toughest conditions as
well. Similarly, once the citizens of the developing countries
have a sound and strong foundation, they can be
molded towards higher-level technology to serve their
own country. A person can never acquire high level technological
education, training or experience until and
unless he has the required basic education. This is the
reason why the basic education, which is till Grade XII or
may differ for other countries is general. It is general in
the sense that irrespective of what a person is intended to
do in future or whatever field the student wants to pursue
is a matter of choice after that basic education is
completed.
High level technology should also be promoted in the
country, otherwise no advancement could be made a
higher level. Since, the developing countries are in their
developing stage, in my opinion, more attention should
be given to the basic education facility through the funds
which these countries receive from the international bodies,
and it should be ensured that these funds are used
for the benefit of the masses and that the citizens take full
advantage of these funds. Once the people have the basic
education, the next step would be to invest on higher
level technology fields like computers, robotics, etc.
In conclusion, more efforts and monetary support should
be given to the basic education in the developing countries
because the people in these countries do not have
access to the basic education in the first place, so how
can they contribute to the high technologies.
Topic 703 A good teacher or good parents
A child spends his/her initial five to six years at home with
his/her parents or caretakers At the age 5 to 6, while still
living with his/her parents, s/he starts to go to school to
receive formal education So who are the most important
to the child's development is an interesting topic
discussed among educators In my opinion, I agree with
the statement that good teachers are more important
than good parents
Good teachers are expert educators They received formal
training in various academic fields and teaching itself
They can provide students with knowledge in various
academic subjects In addition they have experience in
dealing with various types of students Furthermore,
good teachers not only teach children academic knowledge,
but also set a good example to children Many
children regard their teachers as role models Teachers
roles are irreplaceable
Schools provide a suitable environment for children's
growth Schools are equipped with qualified teaching
and supporting staff and adequate study and sports facilities,
all contributing to children's growth Schools also
organize field trips and practicum from time to time in
order to broaden students' views about nature and the
society At school, a child can appreciate the value of
friendship and teamwork by playing with their classmates
With the help of good teachers students can develop
their characters and social skills Therefore schools
with good teachers are the best place for children to receive
education and develop their characters.
While good parents play the crucial role of nourishing
the child helping build the child's
character, and helping develop the
child's hobbies such as music and
sports, they can do little to help with
the child's academic study, which is
the critical part of the child's development,
unless those parents are
themselves good teachers Therefore,
teachers are the most important people
for children's personal growth
and development Every child should go to school to
receive their formal education.